RAIL  SAFETY  REAUTHORIZATION 

S.  HRG.  110–1120 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  22,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

73–896 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 22, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Clinton, Hon. Hillary Rodham, U.S. Senator from New York  .............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hamberger,  Edward  R.,  President  and  CEO,  Association  of  American  Rail-
roads  ......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hyde, Kurt W., Assistant Inspector General, Surface and Maritime Programs, 
U.S. Department of Transportation  ....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schumer, Hon. Charles E., U.S. Senator from New York  ....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Siggerud,  Katherine,  Director,  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues,  U.S.  Govern-
ment Accountability Office  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Strang,  Jo,  Associate  Administrator  for  Safety,  Federal  Railroad  Administra-
tion, U.S. Department of Transportation  ...........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sumwalt,  Hon.  Robert  L.,  Vice  Chairman,  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Timmons, Richard F., President, American Short Line and Regional Railroad 
Association  ............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wytkind, Edward, President, Transportation Trades Department, AFL–CIO  ...
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
10 
1 
9 

2 
4 

72 
74 

34 
36 
5 
7 

41 
43 

10 
12 

28 
30 

87 
89 
57 
59 

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 

Edward R. Hamberger 
..................................................................................... 108 
Kurt W. Hyde  .................................................................................................... 106 
Jo Strang  ........................................................................................................... 101 
Hon. Robert L. Sumwalt  .................................................................................. 106 
Richard F. Timmons  ......................................................................................... 109 
Edward Wytkind  ............................................................................................... 107 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RAIL  SAFETY  REAUTHORIZATION 

TUESDAY,  MAY  22,  2007 

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND MERCHANT 

MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Committee will come to order. Today we’re 

focusing on the safety of our Nation’s railroads. 

This  Subcommittee  has  not  held  a  hearing  on  this  topic  since 
2002.  And  the  Federal  Rail  Safety  Program  which  is  designed  to 
keep  our  rails  safe  has  not  been  authorized  since  1994.  But  the 
safety  of  our  railroads  is  critical  to  our  national  economy  and  the 
well being of cities and towns across our country. 

Last year freight trains carried 100 million tons of food, 150 mil-
lion tons of farm products, 170 million tons of chemicals, and carry 
nearly three-quarters of the coal that’s carried, more than a billion 
tons.  That  provides  about  half  of  the  electricity  generated  in  our 
country. So, the role is a critical one. 

The increase in freight rail will take more trucks off the road im-
proving safety and decreasing congestion. The statistics for our Na-
tional  Passenger  Rail  System  are  no  less  impressive.  Amtrak  had 
record ridership in 2006 and the ridership is already up again this 
year by 5 percent. 

Last  month  the  bill  that  Senator  Lott  and  I  introduced  to  reau-
thorize  Amtrak  and  to  grow  our  passenger  rail  system  passed 
unanimously  out  of  the  full  Commerce  Committee.  I’d  like  to  see 
us bring that bill to the Senate floor very soon. 

Every  passenger  train  gives  thousands  of  commuters  a  choice 
other  than  their  car.  In  New  Jersey  alone  as  many  as  a  quarter 
million  commuters  take  the  train  each  weekday.  With  so  much  at 
stake  for  our  national  economy  and  for  individual  travelers,  the 
Federal Government must make sure that railroads are safe. 

The  number  of  train  accidents,  employee  deaths  and  highway 
grade  crossing  deaths  has  steadily  declined  over  the  past  few  dec-
ades.  But  there  has  been  an  uptake  in  recent  years.  We’ve  seen 
major  accidents  in  Graniteville,  South  Carolina;  Macdona,  Texas; 
and  in  Oneida,  New  York,  which  I  know  my  two  colleagues  at  the 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

witness  desk  are  very  much  interested  in.  These  accidents  caused 
fatalities  and  the  release  of  toxic  chemicals.  They  remind  us  that 
there’s much to do to improve rail safety. 

Employee  fatigue  is  a  serious  problem.  Under  the  current  law, 
train  crews  can  work  up  to  400  hours  in  30  days;  400  hours  in  30 
days and it’s simply not safe. And employees are either on-duty or 
off-duty, there’s no in-between. And yet the employers use a system 
they call limbo time. It’s a loop hole. 

And  during  limbo  time  employees  are  considered  off-duty  but 
they must remain at the job site. And this prevents them from get-
ting  sufficient  rest.  This  loop  hole  increases  the  problem  of  em-
ployee fatigue. And it’s got to be eliminated. 

Fortunately,  there  is  new  technology  available  to  help  prevent 
some accidents caused by human factors such as fatigue. This tech-
nology can also make train operations more efficient. For example, 
PTC,  Positive  Train  Control  Systems  have  been  on  the  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board’s  most  wanted  list  for  the  rail  indus-
try since 1990. These systems could prevent train collisions, speed-
ing derailments and other dangers that tragically kill or injure. Al-
though  the  industry  is  moving  toward  adopting  this  technology,  I 
don’t believe that it’s moving fast enough. 

Finally,  94  percent  of  all  railroad  related  deaths  are  related  to 
highway  grade  crossings  and  trespassing.  We’ve  got  to  do  more  to 
save  lives  at  these  crossings.  Grade-crossing  safety  is  an  area 
where  the  Federal  Government  and  the  railroads  should  be  doing 
more to prevent accidents. 

First  steps  involve  understanding  exactly  where  the  problem  lo-
cations  are  and  that  will  require  cooperation  of  the  states  as  well. 
So,  I  am  pleased  to  have  my  distinguished  colleagues  from  the 
state of New York. Senator Clinton and Senator Schumer are here 
to  share  their  thoughts  and  concerns  on  the  areas  of  safety  im-
provement in the rail industry. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  you  and  our  other  witnesses 
today.  Your  input  is  important  as  this  Subcommittee  develops  its 
rail  safety  legislation  later  this  year.  And  I  would  ask—Senator 
Smith,  whether  there  is  an  urgency  to  his  schedule  and  the  same 
for  Senator  Klobuchar.  Otherwise  we’ll  call  on  our  colleagues  and 
let them make their statements. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I’d  like  to  hear  from  our  colleagues,  Sen-

ator. Thank you. 

Senator SMITH. I would agree with that. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Alright, so, in order of seniority. 
Senator  SCHUMER.  Senator  Clinton  has  another  appointment  to 

go to. So I’ll defer to her and go after her, if you don’t mind. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Kindnesses are rare around here. Be care-

ful or it gets to be a habit. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Senator  Clinton,  we’re  pleased  to  hear 

from you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Senator  CLINTON.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Lautenberg, 
Senator  Smith  and  Senator  Klobuchar.  And  I  really  commend  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

for holding this hearing and conducting the oversight that is so ur-
gently needed. 

3 

I’m  pleased  to  be  joined  by  my  colleague,  Senator  Schumer.  As 
you  might  assume  from  our  both  being  here,  we  have  some  very 
important  questions  and  concerns  about  the  situation  of  our  rail-
roads in New York. 

As  you  said,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  railroads  transport  42  per-
cent of the Nation’s freight. And the U.S. Department of Transpor-
tation estimates that between 1998 and 2020 the amount of freight 
transported  by  rail  will  increase  by  50  percent.  At  the  same  time 
the  Federal  Railroad  Administration,  the  Nation’s  chief  rail  safety 
agency  is  understaffed,  overextended  and  has  the  capacity  to  in-
spect only 0.2 percent of the Nation’s railroads. 

While gains have been made in rail safety, the primary responsi-
bility  is  delegated  to  the  railroad  industry.  And  in  the  absence  of 
public  scrutiny  and  private  responsibility,  rail  safety  is  being  ne-
glected. And the consequences have been deadly. On December 10, 
2006,  a  64-car  CSX  freight  train  derailed  in  Cheektowaga,  New 
York. On December 14, 2006, a CSX carman with 30 years of expe-
rience was struck and killed at a CSX yard in Syracuse, New York. 
On December 19, 2006, a CSX carman with 15 years of experience 
was struck and killed by a train in Selkirk, New York. On January 
16, 2007, a 13-car CSX freight train traveling 62 miles per hour de-
railed near East Rochester, New York. 

Most  recently  a  CSX  train  derailed  near  Oneida,  New  York  on 
March  12,  2007.  The  train  was  carrying  liquefied  petroleum  gas 
and the accident resulted in a massive fire. Fortunately there were 
no injuries, but authorities were forced to enact a mile wide evacu-
ation of the surrounding area. If this train had been carrying chlo-
rine  or  any  other  extremely  dangerous  material,  the  result  could 
have  been  catastrophic.  Derailments  on  CSX  properties  in  recent 
months have occurred in Kentucky, Maryland and Ohio. 

On  March  27,  the  FRA  released  the  results  of  a  focused  inspec-
tion  on  CSX  properties  in  each  of  the  23  states  where  the  railroad 
operates.  It  found  3,518  defects  and  199  potential  violations.  In 
New  York  alone,  60  inspections  revealed  376  defects  including  13 
violations. It’s my understanding the violations cited in the inspec-
tion are still being reviewed by the FRA. 

I have met with and called on the Administrator of the FRA, Joe 
Boardman  to  expand  his  investigation  to  other  railroads  besides 
CSX. I don’t think that we want to sit idly by waiting for the next 
derailment to occur. And I commend the response of Administrator 
Boardman  and  the  FRA  in  light  of  these  troubling  accidents  and 
derailments in New York. The FRA is doomed to fail however with-
out  the  resources,  authority  and  support  to  properly  ensure  the 
safety of our Nation’s railroads. 

And that’s why it’s so important what your doing, Mr. Chairman. 
This  Congress  needs  to  fill  the  leadership  vacuum  left  by  previous 
Congresses  and  the  current  Administration  and  implement  mean-
ingful rail safety reform. The FRA needs more inspectors, more fre-
quent systemwide safety inspections of major railroads and routine 
use  of  new  technologies.  The  number  of  inspectors  has  remained 
flat in recent years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

As  of  July  2006,  FRA  had  657  full-time  and  part-time  safety 
staff, including 400 inspectors in the field. In contrast the railroad 
industry  has  about  235,000  employees,  219,000  miles  of  track  in 
operation,  158,000  signals  and  switches  and  more  than  1.6  million 
locomotives.  It’s  plain  and  simple.  In  order  for  the  FRA  to  ensure 
rail  safety  it  needs  the  inspectors  and  the  inspection  technology  to 
do its job. 

We should also do more to protect railroad workers. For too long 
fatigue  related  errors  in  the  rail  industry  have  contributed  to  rail 
work  injuries  and  deaths.  I  think  we  should  look  at  legislation  to 
create  safe  working  conditions  for  workers  and  in  turn  safe  condi-
tions for our railroads. 

The  FRA  needs  a  data  driven  evaluation  system  to  measure  the 
effectiveness  of  its  enforcement  program,  instead  of  relying  on  the 
railroads  for  compliance.  It’s  hard  to  correct  problems  when  the 
FRA  does  not  have  the  facts  about  what  is  being  fixed  and  what 
isn’t. 

The FRA must have stronger regulations and better enforcement 
to  hold  railroad  companies  accountable.  Its  entered  into  only  13 
compliance agreements and one compliance order over the past dec-
ade. And I urge the Committee to look into how these methods can 
be used more effectively. 

Finally,  this  Committee  and  Congress  should  explore  risk  man-
agement.  The  systematic  process  for  assessing  risk  and  managing 
risk helps us protect commuter railroads and pipelines in our coun-
try  as  well  as  Canadian  railroads.  Why  not  our  freight  lines  as 
well? 

So, Chairman Lautenberg and to the other members of the Com-
mittee, I appreciate the opportunity to come and share some of our 
concerns  from  New  York.  And  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you 
on  legislation  that  will  provide  the  FRA  with  the  tools  necessary 
to ensure the safety of our railroads. I look forward to your leader-
ship on this important issue. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Clinton follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Committee.  Chair-
man  Lautenberg,  thank  you  for  your  work  and  your  commitment  to  our  Nation’s 
transportation  systems  and  infrastructure.  I  am  pleased  to  be  joined  by  my  col-
league, Senator Schumer. 

Railroads  today  transport  about  42  percent  of  the  Nation’s  freight.  The  U.S.  De-
partment  of  Transportation  estimates  that  between  1998  and  2020  the  amount  of 
freight transported by rail will increase by 50 percent. 

At the same time, the Federal Railroad Administration (FRA)—the Nation’s chief 
rail  safety  agency—is  understaffed,  overextended,  and  has  the  capacity  to  inspect 
only 0.2 percent of the Nation’s railroads. While gains have been made in rail safe-
ty,  the  primary  responsibility  is  delegated  to  the  railroad  industry.  In  the  absence 
of public scrutiny and private responsibility, rail safety is being neglected—and the 
consequences have been deadly. 

New York. 

• On  December  10,  2006,  a  64-car  CSX  freight  train  derailed  in  Cheektowaga, 
• On  December  14,  2006,  a  CSX  carman  with  30  years  of  experience  was  struck 
• On  December  19,  2006,  a  CSX  carman  with  15  years  of  experience  was  struck 

and killed at a CSX yard in Syracuse, New York. 

and killed by a train in Selkirk, New York. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Maryland, and Ohio as well. 

On  March  27,  the  FRA  released  the  results  of  a  focused  inspection  on  CSX  prop-
erties  in  each  of  the  23  states  where  the  railroad  operates.  The  FRA  found  3,518 
defects and 199 potential violations. In New York alone, 60 inspections revealed 376 
defects,  including  13  violations.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  violations  cited  in 
the inspection are still being reviewed by FRA. 

I  have  called  on  the  Administrator  of  the  FRA,  Joe  Boardman,  to  expand  his  in-
vestigation  to  other  railroads  besides  CSX.  We  cannot  sit  idly  by  waiting  for  the 
next derailment to occur. 

I commend the response of Administrator Boardman and the FRA in light of these 

troubling accidents and derailments in New York. 

5 

near East Rochester, New York. 

• On  January  16,  2007,  a  13-car  CSX  freight  train  traveling  at  62  mph  derailed 
• Most recently, a CSX train derailed near Oneida, New York on March 12, 2007. 
The  train  was  carrying  liquefied  petroleum  gas  and  the  accident  resulted  in  a 
massive  fire.  Fortunately,  there  were  no  injuries—but  authorities  were  forced 
to  enact  a  mile-wide  evacuation  of  the  surrounding  area.  If  this  train  was  car-
rying chlorine gas or any other extremely dangerous material, the result would 
have been catastrophic. 

Derailments  on  CSX  properties  in  recent  months  have  occurred  in  Kentucky, 

The  FRA  is  doomed  to  fail,  however,  without  the  resources,  authority,  and  the 
support to properly ensure the safety of our Nation’s railroads. It’s time for this new 
Congress to fill the leadership vacuum left by the previous Congress and the current 
Administration and implement meaningful rail safety reform. 

The  FRA  needs  more  inspectors,  more  frequent  system-wide  safety  inspections  of 
major railroads, and routine use of new technologies. The number of FRA inspectors 
has remained flat in recent years. As of July 2006, FRA has 657 full time and part- 
time  safety  staff,  including  400  inspectors  in  the  field.  In  contrast,  the  railroad  in-
dustry  has  about  235,000  employees,  219,000  miles  of  track  in  operation,  158,000 
signals  and  switches,  and  more  than  1.6  million  locomotives.  It’s  plain  and  simple, 
in order for the FRA to ensure rail safety; it needs the inspectors and the inspection 
technology to do the job. 

We  also  should  do  more  to  protect  railroad  workers.  For  too  long,  fatigue-related 
errors in the rail industry has contributed to rail work injuries and deaths. We must 
look  at  legislation  that  creates  safe  conditions  for  workers—and  in  turn  safe  condi-
tions for our railroads. 

FRA  needs  a  data-driven  evaluation  system  to  measure  the  effectiveness  of  its  en-
forcement  program—instead  of  relying  on  the  railroads  for  compliance.  It’s  hard  to 
correct  problems  when  the  FRA  does  not  have  the  facts  about  what  is  being  fixed 
and what isn’t. 

The  FRA  must  have  stronger  regulations  and  better  enforcement  to  hold  railroad 
companies  accountable.  The  FRA  has  entered  into  only  13  compliance  agreements 
and  one  compliance  order  over  the  past  decade.  These  methods  should  be  explored 
and  I  encourage  the  Committee  to  look  into  how  these  methods  can  be  used  more 
frequently. 

Finally,  this  committee  and  Congress  should  also  explore  risk  management.  The 
systematic process for assessing risk and managing risk helps us protect commuter 
railroads  and  pipelines  in  our  country  as  well  as  Canadian  railroads—why  not  for 
our freight lines as well? 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  and  the  rest  of  the  Committee,  I  look  forward  to  working 
with you on legislation that will provide the FRA with the tools to ensure the safety 
of our Nation’s railroads—before the next catastrophe occurs. Our railroads, railroad 
employees, our economy, and the safety of our communities depend on it. 

Thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Clinton. 

Senator Schumer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CHARLES E. SCHUMER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Senator  SCHUMER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  too  add  my 
thanks  to  you  and  the  Committee  for  holding—Subcommittee  for 
holding this very important hearing. I want to thank my colleague 
from  New  York,  Senator  Clinton  for,  as  usual,  her  prescient  and 
right on the money remarks and analysis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Let  me  just  say  that  as  you  point  out,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  coun-
try’s rail system is a vital lifeline for many of America’s towns and 
cities. However, I believe that in New York and across the country 
we’re  on  the  brink  of  a  disaster.  We  can  no  longer  afford  to  have 
our tracks and trains be in such a dismal state of disrepair. 

We must make sure as it—it is as safe as possible; that rail com-
panies who refuse to make even the most basic repairs are held ac-
countable  for  their  actions.  Millions  of  Americans  who  live  in  com-
munities  and  neighborhoods  that  lie  near  freight  rail  tracks,  live 
life  in  the  crosshairs  fearing  that  the  next  derailment  or  accident 
could be a terrible disaster. 

Now,  thankfully,  many  of  these  accidents  are  minor.  But  each 
one  should  be  a  wake  up  call  to  overhaul  our  system  in  order  to 
prevent the next serious crash. Unfortunately the industry has con-
tinued  to  hit  the  snooze  button.  It’s  now  up  to  Congress  and  this 
Subcommittee to wake the industry up. And that is what this hear-
ing and the legislation I’ve introduced will hopefully do. 

I  have  said  it  before  and  I’ll  say  it  again.  The  railroad  industry 
has  turned  a  blind  eye  to  safety  and  allowed  our  Nation’s  rails  to 
degrade  year  after  year.  In  2004,  the  railroad  industry  made  over 
$42  billion  in  revenues  by  shipping  goods  1.66  trillion  miles  over 
America’s rail system. However, despite record business and profits 
the  industry—the  industry  safety  record  has  grown  deplorably 
worse. The record must improve immediately. 

The  number  of  derailments  that  have  occurred  in  the  first  quar-
ter  of  this  year  is  8  percent  higher  than  for  the  same  period  10 
years  ago,  jumping  from  280  to  over  300.  And  what  happens  is 
when  maintenance  isn’t  maintained  at  a  top  level,  you  don’t  see 
much change. And then all of a sudden you go off the cliff. And my 
worry, Mr. Chairman, is we’re getting close to that point where we 
might go off the cliff. 

In  our  own  state  of  New  York,  the—we  have  seen  the  effects 
more  than  in  many  other  states.  For  two  centuries  now  New  York 
has  relied  on  rail  lines  to  transport  its  goods  within  the  state  and 
all  over  the  country.  We  have  3,500  miles  of  track,  crisscrossing 
New  York  from  Buffalo  to  Albany—from  Buffalo  to  Albany,  from 
Plattsburg to New York City; 36 railroads operate in our state. And 
in 2000 to 2006, Mr. Chairman, there were 572 rail accidents caus-
ing  $34  million  in  damage.  Each  year  2.95  million  tons  of  haz-
ardous material travel through our state by rail. 

This  year  has  seen  a  rash  of  dangerous  derailments  across  the 
state that could have been worse. And Senator Clinton has outlined 
those. But I would mention this. On the Oneida accident where the 
people  had  to  be  evacuated,  there  was  a  huge  fireball.  And  praise 
God no one was injured. 

The  reason  for  the  derailment  was  a  crack  in  the  track  on  a 
heavily  traveled  line  that  should  have  been  discovered  long  in  ad-
vance  of  the  derailment.  It’s  another  sad  chapter  in  the  long  story 
of  railroad  negligence  when  it  comes  to  safety.  Your  FRA  report  of 
the  Oneida  derailment  faulted  CSX  with  79  different  problems 
within the tracks across New York. So it could have happened just 
about anywhere. 

On January 16, as Senator Clinton mentioned, the CSX train left 
the tracks in the Village of East Rochester. It landed just a few feet 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

from  the  homes.  The  week  before  20,000  gallons  of  methanol 
caught  fire  in  the  Selkirk  rail  yard  and  so  we’ve  had  serious  prob-
lems,  serious  problems.  And  it’s  because  of  the  situations  like  this 
that  I  reintroduced  the  Rail  Crossing  and  Hazardous  Materials 
Transport  Act,  which  I  hope  the  Committee  will  look  at  as  it  pre-
pares its legislation. 

Congress cannot allow rail companies like CSX to continue to sit 
idly by and let their tracks fall apart while they collect checks. We 
must hold their feet to the fire; send them a clear message that we 
mean  business  and  won’t  allow  this  behavior  to  continue.  My  bill 
would  dramatically  increase  the  fines  for  violating  the  FRA  rules. 
They’re too often right now a slap on the wrist. It will also update 
FRA  standards  regarding  hazardous  materials  and  increase  the 
fines  there  making  sure  that  we,  the  Federal  Government,  are 
doing our part. 

The  FRA,  in  part  by  design,  in  part  because  it  doesn’t  have  the 
necessary tools has become too much of an old and tired watch dog. 
But we can’t be the only ones stepping up to the plate. Rail compa-
nies  must  have—do  their  share  of  the  burden  in  insuring  that  our 
rail system is as safe as possible for the physical safety of our pas-
sengers,  motorists,  rail  workers,  pedestrians  and  for  our  own  safe-
ty. 

Congress,  the  Department  of  Transportation,  state  and  local 
agencies  and  the  rail  companies  must  all  work  together  to  mini-
mize  dangerous  spills  like  what  happened  in  Oneida.  Of  course 
train  derailments  are  not  a  phenomenon  limited  to  my  state.  We 
should not wait until fatalities to act. We have to act now. We must 
crack  down  on  sleeping  companies  while  at  the  same  time  help 
them improve the rail infrastructure of our Nation. 

That’s what my legislation is intended to do. It attacks this prob-
lem of rail safety head on and holds violators accountable for their 
action  and  lack  thereof.  It  would  also  help  state  and  local  govern-
ments  who  are  trying  to  improve  rail  structure  by  providing  $50 
million  in  grants.  Additionally,  the  bill  would  provide  financial  as-
sistance to such areas as Long Island and Westchester to close the 
very dangerous platform gaps that exist. We can’t wait any longer. 
So,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  this  Committee.  And  I  hope 
that  as  the  Committee  moves  forward  with  its  Rail  Safety  bill  it 
will consider some of the provisions in my legislation as well. 

Again I want to thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hear-
ing.  I’ll  be  submitting  a  more  extensive  written  statement  which  I 
would ask permission to put in the record. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. To be included. 
Senator  SCHUMER.  And  again,  rail  companies  must  be  held  ac-
countable for dropping the ball when it comes to rail safety. Thank 
you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Schumer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CHARLES E. SCHUMER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. First, I’d like to thank the Committee for holding this 
hearing  on  an  issue  that  affects  the  entire  Nation.  This  country’s  rail  system  is  a 
vital lifeline for many of America’s towns and cities. However, I believe that in New 
York  and  across  the  country,  we  are  on  the  brink  of  disaster.  We  can  no  longer  af-
ford  to  have  our  tracks  and  trains  be  in  such  a  dismal  state  of  disrepair.  We  must 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

make sure it is as safe as possible and that rail companies who refuse to make even 
the most basic repairs are held accountable for their actions. 

Millions  of  Americans  who  live  in  communities  and  neighborhood  that  lie  near 
freight rail tracks live life in the crosshairs, fearing that the next derailment or acci-
dent could be a terrible disaster. 

Thankfully,  many  of  these  accidents  are  minor,  but  each  one  should  have  been 
a  wake  up  call  to  overhaul  our  system  in  order  to  prevent  the  next  serious  crash. 
Unfortunately,  the  industry  has  continued  to  hit  the  snooze  button.  It  is  now  up  to 
Congress to wake the industry up and that is what this hearing and my legislation 
will hopefully do. 

I  have  said  it  before  and  I  will  say  it  again.  The  railroad  industry  has  turned  a 
blind  eye  to  safety  and  allowed  our  Nation’s  rails  to  degrade  year  after  year.  In 
2004, the railroad industry made over $42 billion in revenues by shipping goods 1.66 
trillion miles over America’s rail system. However, despite record business and prof-
its,  the  industry’s  safety  record  has  grown  deplorably  worse.  This  record  must  im-
prove immediately. The number of derailments that have occurred in the first quar-
ter of this year is 8 percent higher than for the same period 10 years ago, jumping 
from 280 derailments to over 300. 

The current crisis lies in the decrepit state of our Nation’s rail lines. No state has 
seen  the  effects  of  this  more  than  my  home  state  of  New  York.  For  two  centuries 
now,  New  York  has  relied  on  rail  lines  to  transport  its  goods  within  the  state  and 
all over the country. More than 3,500 miles of track crisscross New York, from Buf-
falo  to  Albany,  Plattsburgh  to  New  York  City,  with  36  railroads  operating  in  the 
state. In the period between 2000–2006, there were 572 rail accidents in New York, 
causing  $34  million  in  damages.  Every  year,  2.95  million  tons  of  hazardous  mate-
rials  travel  through  my  state  by  rail.  This  year  has  seen  a  rash  of  dangerous 
derailments across the state that could have caused serious harm. 

In March, a CSX freight train hauling liquid propane derailed in Oneida, NY. Sev-
eral of the cars were carrying dangerous chemicals, and they ignited, sending a fire-
ball  into  the  sky  seen  from  miles  away.  Thousands  were  evacuated,  and  the  FRA 
was  sent  in  to  investigate  the  crash.  Of  course,  the  reason  for  the  derailment  was 
a  crack  in  the  rail.  This  is  just  another  chapter  in  the  long  story  of  railroad  neg-
ligence when it comes to safety. 

The FRA report of the Oneida derailment faulted CSX with 79 different problems 
with  their  tracks  across  New  York.  And  it  is  not  just  the  Oneida  crash  that  has 
shaken the residents of New York. There are many other examples of rail companies 
asleep  at  the  switch  in  my  state.  On  January  16,  thirteen  cars  on  a  CSX  train  left 
the  tracks  in  the  Village  of  East  Rochester,  landing  within  a  few  feet  of  nearby 
homes.  No  one  was  injured,  but  at  least  two  motorists  were  nearly  hit  by  falling 
trailers  that  were  dislodged  from  their  train  cars.  The  week  before,  20,000  gallons 
of  methanol  caught  fire  at  the  CSX  Selkirk  rail  yard,  the  same  destination  as  the 
train that derailed on Monday. On December 10, a CSX train carrying canned goods 
derailed  on  an  overpass  in  Cheektowaga,  leaving  one  boxcar  teetering  on  the  edge 
of a railroad bridge and sending a second onto Union Road. 

It  is  because  of  situations  like  this  that  I’ve  reintroduced  the  Rail  Crossing  and 
Hazardous Materials Transport Act. Congress cannot allow rail companies like CSX 
to  continue  to  sit  idly  by  and  let  their  tracks  fail  apart  while  they  collect  checks. 
We  must  hold  their  feet  to  the  fire,  and  send  them  a  clear  message  that  we  mean 
business and won’t allow this behavior to continue. 

My  bill  would  dramatically  increase  the  fines  for  violating  the  FRA  rules,  and  it 
will  also  update  FRA  standards  regarding  hazardous  materials  and  increase  fines, 
making  sure  that  we—the  Federal  Government—are  doing  our  part.  But  we  can’t 
be  the  only  ones  stepping  up  to  the  plate.  Rail  companies  must  haul  their  share  of 
the  burden  in  ensuring  that  our  rail  system  is  as  safe  as  possible,  for  the  physical 
safety  of  our  passengers,  motorists,  rail  workers,  and  pedestrians,  and  for  our  own 
economic security. 

Congress, the Department of Transportation, state and local agencies, and the rail 
companies must all work together to minimize dangerous spills like what happened 
in  Oneida.  Of  course,  train  derailments  are  not  a  phenomenon  limited  to  my  state. 
We  should  not  wait  until  a  fatality  to  act.  We  must  act  now.  We  must  crack  down 
on sleeping companies, while at the same time help improve the rail infrastructure 
of our Nation. 

My  legislation  would  do  just  that.  It  attacks  this  problem  of  rail  safety  head-on 
and holds violators accountable for their actions—or lack thereof. It also would help 
state  and  local  governments  who  are  trying  to  improve  rail  infrastructure  by  pro-
viding  $50  million  in  grants.  Additionally,  my  bill  will  provide  financial  assistance 
to areas such as Long Island and Westchester to close very dangerous platform gaps 
that exist. We cannot wait any longer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  this  Committee  and  hope  that  as  the  Committee 
moves forward with a rail safety bill, it will consider my legislation, and the positive 
effect it could have on our Nation’s rail network. I thank the Committee for holding 
this  hearing,  and  will  be  submitting  a  more  extensive  written  statement  for  the 
record.  Rail  companies  must  be  held  accountable  for  dropping  the  ball  when  it 
comes to rail safety, but we must do out best to compensate for their shortcomings. 
Thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  both  very  much.  It’s  obvious 
that  the  things  that  you  talk  about  have  to  be  up  in  the  forefront 
of our minds because of the pitifully small number of safety inspec-
tors out there. Some 400 when you consider there are 700 railroads 
employing over 230,000 people with millions of miles of track. And 
railroads  are  adding  an  enormous  amount  of  efficiency  to  the  way 
our country functions. 

As  a  matter  of  fact  after  coal  the  next  largest  items  that  rail-
roads carry are truck containers filled and are carried cross country 
or to their destination with the least amount of congestion. And so 
we  thank  you,  as  our  neighbors  in  New  York,  I  am  pleased  at  the 
prospect  of  additional  rail  service  being  available.  For  example, 
coming  into  Penn  Station  from  Long  Island  and  another  available 
service tunnel in the Hudson River. 

So  we  thank  each  of  you  and  I’ll  assume  no  questions  from  my 
colleagues and we’ll excuse you to go on with your other important 
work. Thank you. 

And  with  that  I  would  ask  my  colleagues  for  their  brief  state-
ments. First, starting with our Ranking Member, Senator Smith. If 
you could contain comments to 5 minutes, it would be appreciated. 
We have several panels. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. It won’t take me that long, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
Senator  SMITH.  As  we  listen  to  our  colleagues  it’s  easy  to  think 
and conclude that the glass is half empty. But there’s another view 
that  the  glass  is  half  full.  And  that  is  in  no  way  meant  to  excuse 
any accident. And certainly the role of this Committee and the leg-
islation  we’re  considering  is  to  take  the  number  of  accidents  and 
drive them down further still. 

But it is interesting to note that since 1980, when the rails were 
deregulated  overall  train  accidents  have  fallen  70  percent  from 
1980  to  2006;  2006  was  the  safest  year  on  record.  And  I  think  it’s 
important  to  note  that,  so  it’s  not  all  bad.  But  certainly  we  can’t 
be  satisfied  with  any  accident  and  that  each  one  is  a  call  to  do 
more. 

As I look at what is being done regulatorily and to private indus-
try  initiatives,  I’m  encouraged.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  our  wit-
nesses on issues such as limbo time and to address rail worker con-
cerns  and  private  industry  initiatives  such  as  the  positive  train 
control to improve safety. We’re at the ten-year mark since the last 
reauthorization  of  the  Federal  Rail  Administration.  And  so  I  look 
forward  to  working  with  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  my  other  col-
leagues to go from where we are to even better. Thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  very  much,  Senator  Smith.  Sen-

ator Klobuchar? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for 

the work you’re doing on this issue both of you. 

Railroads are important to my state, the state of Minnesota. I re-
member growing up and my only vacations until I was about eight 
were  on  The  Milwaukee  Road  to  The  Milwaukee  to  see  my  grand-
ma. And I would record every stop we took on the train. And lately 
as we expand our ethanol and other products out of our rural area 
we’re relying more and more on rail. 

The good news, as Senator Smith was saying is that we’re seeing 
more  use  of  our  rail.  But  the  bad  news  is  we  recently  have  seen 
some  increased  accidents  and  facility  traffic.  And  we’ve  seen  some 
fatalities  as  well.  In  my  state  there  were  nine  reported  fatalities 
and 65 total collisions in 2005 alone. We’ve had a number of trains 
derail  near  populated  areas.  And  so  there’s  growing  concern  about 
what’s happening. 

So  I’d  like  to  commend  the  Chairman  for  his  work  in  this  area. 

And look forward to hearing from our witnesses. Thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you,  Senator  Klobuchar.  We  now 
want to call our panel to the table. That’s Ms. Jo Strang, the Asso-
ciate Administrator for Safety at the FRA. And Ms. Strang, please 
give our best to Administrator Joe Boardman and his family. We’re 
pleased  to  see  you,  but  we  understand  that  he  couldn’t  be  here 
today due to an emergency. And we look forward to your testimony. 
Mr.  Sumwalt,  Vice  Chairman  of  the  National  Transportation 
Safety  Board.  We  welcome  you.  And  Mr.  Kurt  Hyde,  Assistant  In-
spector  General  for  Surface  and  Maritime  Programs  at  the  United 
States  Department  of  Transportation.  And  Katherine  Siggerud, 
who  is  Director  of  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues  at  Government 
Accountability Office. 

Thank  you  all  for  joining  us  and  I  would  ask  you  to  limit  your 
testimony,  if  you  can  please,  to  not  more  than  5  minutes.  I  would 
ask if you can summarize your statements. Welcome. 

STATEMENT OF JO STRANG, ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR 

SAFETY, FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Ms.  STRANG.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  I  am  honored  to  appear  before  you  today  representing 
Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters and Federal Railroad Ad-
ministrator  Joe  Boardman  to  discuss  railroad  safety  and  the  need 
to  reauthorize  the  Federal  Rail  Safety  Program.  In  February  the 
Administration  presented  its  rail  safety  reauthorization  bill,  the 
Federal  Railroad  Safety  Accountability  and  Improvement  Act.  We 
are  very  grateful,  Chairman  Lautenberg  that  in  March  you  intro-
duced the bill by request for yourself and Senator Smith as S. 918. 
Mr. Boardman is home in New York dealing with family medical 
concerns.  He  particularly  regrets  not  being  here  today  as  enacting 
a  meaningful  rail  safety  reauthorization  is  his  highest  priority.  He 
has  asked  me  to  make  several  points  to  the  Committee  being  sure 
to emphasize that the future of safety is about managing risk. And 
that  FRA  needs  Congress  to  provide  us  the  authority  to  regulate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

hours-of-service  which  relates  directly  to  the  most  significant  risk 
facing the rail industry. 

In  making  these  points  I  wish  to  offer  a  little  context.  In  2006, 
the railroad industry had the lowest rate of employee casualties in 
its  history.  What  was  once  one  of  the  most  dangerous  industries 
from  its  employee’s  perspective  is  now  one  of  the  safest.  This  ac-
complishment is all the more notable when it is viewed in the con-
text  of  an  industry  that  is  moving  record  levels  of  traffic  over  sys-
tems  substantially  smaller  than  existed  30  years  ago  and  then  the 
hiring  of  new  employees  at  a  record  pace  to  address  a  major  wave 
of retirement. 

Further  improvements  will  require  an—approaches  however. 
While safety has improved substantially over the last three decades 
the  rate  of  improvement  has  slowed  and  significant  challenges 
must  be  addressed.  FRA’s  accident  statistics  indicate  that  human 
factors and track-caused accidents are the two leading causes of ac-
cidents  by  a  large  margin  over  other  causes  indicating  the  need  to 
rethink  our  role  in  supporting  key  elements  at  the  railroads,  the 
employees and the infrastructure. 

We  are  doing  research  to  determine  those  areas  where  stress  on 
the system, be it human stress or mechanical stress, increase risk. 
We  are  also  developing  technologies  that  can  monitor  stress;  and 
can  focus  the  attention  of  the  railroads  and  FRA  safety  inspectors 
on those areas where the risk is the greatest. 

Through  the  knowledge  we  gain  here  we  can  help  focus  the  ef-
forts  of  the  railroads  and  the  efforts  of  FRA  in  regulation  and  en-
forcement of those areas that represent the greatest risk. And thus 
present the greatest opportunities for safety improvement. 

One  out  of  four  of  the  most  serious  human  factor  accidents  ap-
pear  to  include  fatigue  among  the  causal  elements.  We  passed  the 
one  hundredth  anniversary  of  the  Hours  of  Service  Act  on  March 
4. And that substance has not been amended for over 37 years. For 
the  past  25  years  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  has 
been calling attention to the apparent role of fatigue in major train 
accidents. 

Last  November,  FRA  released  a  study  that  reported  the  largest 
body  of  fatigue  related  data  from  the  railroad  industry  ever  made 
public. The study documented the successful validation and calibra-
tion  of  the  fatigue  model  that  can  be  used  to  evaluate  the  sched-
uling  of  railroad  operating  personnel.  We  propose  to  sunset  the 
Hours  of  Service  Act  but  retain  its  protections  as  interim  regula-
tions.  We  would  then  convene  a  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Com-
mittee to develop new science based requirements that can help us 
reduce human factor accidents and casualties. 

We  will  need  revised  benchmark  limits  on  work  hours  and  re-
quirement  progress  periods  to  provide  simple  guidance  for  thick 
schedules where it will suffice. With the tools now available we will 
also be able to recognize fatigue management approaches to include 
careful  evaluation  of  a  variety  of  more  flexible  work  schedules 
using  validated  techniques.  I  would  expect  that  regulations  result-
ing from the Department’s bill would significantly reduce the allow-
able  hours-of-service.  This  is  necessary  to  improve  safety  but  it 
does not mean that employees will necessarily work fewer hours in 
a year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

We need to schedule smarter. Set reasonable limits on maximum 
hours worked in a given day and make sure off-duty time is propor-
tional  to  total  time  in  service  including  time  spent  awaiting  trans-
portation  and  time  in  transportation.  We  need  to  avoid  schedules 
that promote cumulative sleep deficits and limit rest interruptions. 
Track-caused  accidents  are  the  second  largest  category  of  train 
accidents  comprising  33  percent  of  all  train  accidents.  Some  of  the 
leading causes of track-caused accidents are difficult to detect dur-
ing normal wear and operations. We have taken many steps to im-
prove track safety that are detailed in my written statement. 

However,  we’ve  introduced  new  technology  with  a  high-speed, 
high-resolution  camera  to  detect  cracks  in  joint  bars  which  has 
proven  to  be  successful.  We  are  currently  modifying  the  software 
so that the crack identification will become automatic. We have im-
plemented  the  requirement  and  safety  rule  and  have  issued  new 
regulations for continuous welded rail. 

That  concludes  my  statement.  I’ll  be  happy  to  take  any  ques-

tions. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Strang follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JO STRANG, ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR SAFETY, 
FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  other  members  of  the  Sub-
committee, I am very pleased to be here today, on behalf of the Secretary of Trans-
portation  and  Administrator  Boardman,  to  discuss  the  reauthorization  of  the  Fed-
eral Railroad Administration’s (FRA) rail safety program. 

In February, the Administration presented its rail safety reauthorization bill, the 
Federal  Railroad  Safety  Accountability  and  Improvement  Act.  In  March,  Chairman 
Oberstar  of  the  House  Committee  on  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  introduced 
the  Administration  bill,  by  request,  for  himself  and  Ranking  Member  Mica  and  the 
leaders  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Railroads,  Pipelines,  and  Hazardous  Materials.  We 
are  very  grateful,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  that  in  the  same  month  you  also  intro-
duced  the  Administration  bill,  by  request,  for  yourself  and  Senator  Smith.  The  Ad-
ministration bill has been designated as H.R. 1516 and S. 918, respectively. 

In  addition  to  proposing  to  reauthorize  FRA’s  vital  safety  mission,  this  bill  calls 
for  important—and  in  some  cases  historic—substantive  changes  in  the  rail  safety 
laws  that  we  expect  will  materially  improve  safety.  I  look  forward  to  working  with 
you to help secure their enactment. 

Before I discuss the major provisions of the bill, my testimony will begin with an 
overview of how FRA is working daily to reduce both the frequency and the severity 
of  railroad  accidents.  My  testimony  will  then  highlight  the  real  and  substantial 
progress FRA has made in implementing our National Rail Safety Action Plan, and 
I  will  touch  on  our  passenger  safety  rulemakings  and  other  key  safety  initiatives. 
I. FRA’s Railroad Safety Program 

FRA is the agency of the U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT) charged with 
carrying  out  the  Federal  railroad  safety  laws.  These  laws  provide  FRA,  as  the  Sec-
retary’s  delegate,  with  very  broad  authority  over  every  area  of  railroad  safety.  In 
exercising that authority, the agency has issued and enforces a wide range of safety 
regulations  covering  a  railroad  network  that  employs  more  than  232,000  workers, 
moves  more  than  42  percent  of  all  intercity  freight,  and  provides  passenger  rail 
service to more than 500 million persons each year. 

FRA’s regulations address such topics as track, passenger equipment, locomotives, 
freight cars, power brakes, locomotive event recorders, signal and train control sys-
tems,  maintenance  of  active  warning  devices  at  highway-rail  grade  crossings,  acci-
dent  reporting,  alcohol  and  drug  testing,  protection  of  roadway  workers,  operating 
rules  and  practices,  locomotive  engineer  certification,  positive  train  control,  the  use 
of locomotive horns at grade crossings, and many other subject areas. FRA currently 
has  active  rulemaking  projects  on  a  number  of  important  safety  topics,  many  of 
which  will  be  described  later  in  this  testimony.  FRA  also  enforces  the  Hazardous 
Materials  Regulations,  promulgated  by  DOT’s  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials 
Safety Administration (PHMSA), as they pertain to rail transportation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

FRA  has  an  authorized  inspection  staff  of  about  400  persons  nationwide,  distrib-
uted across its eight regions. In addition, about 160 inspectors employed by the ap-
proximately  30  states  that  participate  in  FRA’s  State  participation  program  also 
perform inspections for compliance with the Federal rail safety laws. Each inspector 
is an expert in one of five safety disciplines: Track; Signal and Train Control; Motive 
Power  and  Equipment;  Operating  Practices;  or  Hazardous  Materials.  FRA  also  has 
18  full-time  highway-rail  grade  crossing  safety  and  trespass  prevention  specialist 
positions  in  the  field.  Every  year  FRA’s  inspectors  conduct  tens  of  thousands  of  in-
spections,  investigate  more  than  100  railroad  accidents,  investigate  thousands  of 
complaints  of  specific  alleged  violations,  develop  recommendations  for  thousands  of 
enforcement  actions,  and  engage  in  a  range  of  educational  outreach  activities  on 
railroad  safety  issues,  including  educating  the  public  about  highway-rail  grade 
crossing safety and the dangers of trespassing on railroad property. 

FRA  closely  monitors  the  railroad  industry’s  safety  performance,  and  the  agency 
uses  the  extensive  data  gathered  to  guide  its  accident  prevention  efforts.  FRA 
strives to continually make better use of the wealth of available data to achieve the 
agency’s  strategic  goals.  FRA  also  sponsors  collaborative  research  with  the  railroad 
industry  to  introduce  innovative  technologies  to  improve  railroad  safety.  Finally, 
under the leadership of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), FRA ac-
tively plays a supportive role in Federal efforts to secure the Nation’s railroad trans-
portation system. 
II. The National Rail Safety Action Plan (Action Plan) 
A. Genesis and Overview of the Action Plan 

As  detailed  in  Appendix  A  to  my  testimony,  the  railroad  industry’s  overall  safety 
record has improved dramatically over the past few decades, and most safety trends 
are  moving  in  the  right  direction.  However,  serious  train  accidents  still  occur,  and 
the  train  accident  rate  has  not  shown  substantive  improvement  in  recent  years. 
Moreover,  several  major  freight  and  passenger  train  accidents  in  2004  and  2005 
(such as those at Macdona, Texas; Graniteville, South Carolina; and Glendale, Cali-
fornia)  raised  specific  concerns  about  railroad  safety  issues  deserving  government 
and industry attention. 

As  a  result  of  these  concerns,  in  May  2005,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation (DOT) and FRA initiated the National Rail Safety Action Plan (Action Plan), 
a comprehensive and methodical approach to address critical safety issues facing the 
railroad industry. The Action Plan’s goals broadly stated are: 

• Target the most frequent, highest-risk causes of train accidents; 
• Focus  FRA’s  oversight  and  inspection  resources  on  areas  of  greatest  concern; 

and 

• Accelerate research efforts that have the potential to mitigate the largest risks. 
The  causes  of  train  accidents  are  generally  grouped  into  five  categories:  human 
factors;  track  and  structures;  equipment;  signal  and  train  control;  and  miscella-
neous.  From  2002  through  2006,  the  vast  majority  of  train  accidents  resulted  from 
human  factor  causes  or  track  causes.  Accordingly,  human  factors  and  track  have 
been  our  primary  focus  to  bring  about  further  improvements  in  the  train  accident 
rate. 

Overall, the Action Plan includes initiatives intended to: 
• Reduce train accidents caused by human factors; 
• Address employee fatigue; 
• Improve track safety; 
• Enhance hazardous material (hazmat) safety and emergency preparedness; 
• Strengthen FRA’s safety compliance program; and 
• Improve highway-rail grade crossing safety. 
Allow  me  to  discuss  the  progress  that  has  been  made  in  fulfilling  the  Action 

Plan’s objectives and how that is advancing FRA’s railroad safety mission. 
B. Implementation of Action Plan Initiatives 
1. Reducing Train Accidents Caused by Human Factors 

Accidents  caused  by  human  factor  causes  constitute  the  largest  category  of  train 
accidents,  accounting  for  39  percent  of  all  train  accidents  in  the  5  years  from  2002 
through  2006.  Preventing  such  accidents  is  a  high  priority  under  the  Action  Plan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

a.  Development  of  Rulemaking  To  Address  Leading  Causes  of  Human  Factor 

Accidents 

14 

FRA  has  been  concerned  that  several  of  the  leading  causes  of  human  factor  acci-
dents  are  not  presently  covered  by  any  specific  Federal  rule,  and  these  causes  can 
have serious consequences. As a result, in May 2005, FRA asked its Railroad Safety 
Advisory  Committee  (RSAC)  to  develop  recommendations  for  a  new  human  factors 
rule to address the leading causes of human factor accidents. This effort helped lead 
to  FRA’s  issuance  of  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  (NPRM)  in  October  2006,  to 
federalize  core  railroad  operating  rules  governing  the  handling  of  track  switches, 
leaving cars in the clear, and shoving rail cars. See 71 FR 60371. 

The  NPRM  proposes  to  establish  greater  accountability  on  the  part  of  railroad 
management  for  the  administration  of  programs  of  operational  tests  and  inspec-
tions,  and  greater  accountability  on  the  part  of  railroad  supervisors  and  employees 
for  compliance  with  those  railroad  operating  rules  that  are  responsible  for  approxi-
mately  half  of  the  train  accidents  related  to  human  factors.  FRA  believes  this  will 
contribute positively to railroad safety, by emphasizing the importance of complying 
with  fundamental  railroad  operating  rules  and  providing  FRA  a  more  direct  means 
of promoting compliance with those rules. 

The final rule is expected to be issued later this year, and it is intended to super-
sede Emergency Order Number 24, which FRA issued in October 2005, in response 
to  an  increasing  number  of  train  accidents  caused  by  hand-operated,  main  track 
switches in non-signaled territory being left in the wrong position and the potential 
for  catastrophic  accidents,  such  as  the  one  in  Graniteville,  SC,  in  January  2005, 
which  resulted  in  nine  deaths.  The  Emergency  Order  requires  special  handling  of 
hand-operated  main  track  switches  in  non-signaled  territory,  as  well  as  instruction 
and testing of employees in railroad operating rules pertaining to such track switch-
es,  and  is  expected  to  remain  in  place  until  the  final  rule  addressing  the  major 
causes of human factor accidents is promulgated and becomes effective. 

The  final  rule  will  complement  existing  FRA  regulations  that  address  other 
human  factor  causes.  For  example,  FRA’s  regulations  on  alcohol  and  drug  use  by 
operating  employees  were  the  first  such  standards  in  American  industry  to  incor-
porate  chemical  testing,  and  they  have  been  very  successful  in  reducing  accidents 
resulting  from  the  use  of  illicit  substances.  FRA  also  has  regulations  on  locomotive 
engineer  certification,  and  enforces  the  Federal  hours-of-service  restrictions,  which 
at present are wholly governed by statute. 
b. Launch of ‘‘Close Call’’ Pilot Research Project 

‘‘Close  calls’’  are  unsafe  events  that  do  not  result  in  a  reportable  accident  but 
could have done so. FRA is working to better understand these phenomena. In other 
industries,  such  as  aviation,  adoption  of  close-call  or  ‘‘near  miss’’  reporting  systems 
that  shield  the  reporting  employee  from  discipline  (and  the  employer  from  punitive 
regulatory  sanctions)  has  contributed  to  major  reductions  in  accidents.  In  March 
2005,  FRA  completed  an  overarching  Memorandum  of  Understanding  (MOU)  with 
railroad labor organizations and management to develop pilot programs to document 
the  occurrence  of  close  calls.  Pilot  programs  would  be  established  at  three  freight 
railroad  sites  and  on  one  passenger  railroad.  In  August  2005,  FRA  and  DOT’s  Bu-
reau  of  Transportation  Statistics  (BTS)  entered  into  an  MOU  stipulating  that  BTS 
will  act  as  a  neutral  party  to  receive  the  close-call  reports  and  maintain  the  con-
fidentiality of the person making the report. By studying and closely analyzing these 
reports, we hope to enrich our understanding of the factors involved in such events 
and  to  discern  whether  there  are  identifiable  patterns  that  influence  safety  out-
comes. 

Union Pacific Railroad Company (UP) signed an MOU for its North Platte Service 
Unit to be the first site for this project. The first report from this site was received 
in February 2007, and as of April 2007, BTS is receiving approximately two reports 
per day from this site. This rate of reporting close calls greatly exceeds expectations 
based  on  prior  close  call  reporting  systems,  and  indicates  that  the  implementation 
was  extremely  successful  at  this  site.  Canadian  Pacific  Railway  Ltd.  (CP)  and  rail-
road  labor  representatives  in  Portage,  WI,  have  recently  produced  a  draft  MOU  to 
implement a close-call reporting system, and FRA anticipates that this CP site will 
become active by the end of September 2007. BNSF Railway Company (BNSF) and 
several  labor  unions  have  been  exploring  participation  in  the  project  as  the  third 
freight railroad site, but a final decision is still pending. Several passenger railroads 
have also been considering participation in the project. FRA anticipates that all four 
sites will be active by the end of FY 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

c.  Development  and  Implementation  of  Promising  Technologies  To  Improve  Safety 

through Redundant Safety Systems 

15 

Technology can be a tremendous aid to safety, providing a safety net when human 

beings make a mistake or become incapacitated. 

• Positive Train Control (PTC) Systems. PTC systems are capable of automatically 
preventing train collisions (with positive stop protection), preventing over-speed 
derailments,  and  protecting  roadway  workers  within  their  authorities.  Recog-
nizing the safety benefits of PTC systems, as well as their potential to improve 
rail  efficiency  by  safely  increasing  the  capacity  of  high-density  rail  lines,  FRA 
issued a final rule in 2005 entitled, ‘‘Performance Standards for Processor-Based 
Signal and Train Control Systems.’’ See 49 CFR part 236. Earlier, FRA worked 
with  Amtrak  and  other  stakeholders  to  assist  in  the  development  of  PTC  sys-
tems in support of high-speed passenger rail. The results included the Advanced 
Civil  Speed  Enforcement  System,  which,  combined  with  cab  signals  and  auto-
matic  train  control,  safeguard  operations  up  to  150  mph  on  the  Northeast  Cor-
ridor.  In  addition,  the  Incremental  Train  Control  System  was  deployed  on  Am-
trak’s  Michigan  line  and  currently  supports  operations  up  to  95  mph  (planned 
for 110 mph when validation and verification work is complete on the final sys-
tem). 
• In  January  2007,  FRA  approved  operational  use  of  the  first  PTC  system  in-
tended  for  general  use,  BNSF’s  Electronic  Train  Management  System.  The 
rail  industry  is  actively  advancing  the  implementation  of  PTC  technology  as 
other  railroads—among  them,  UP,  Norfolk  Southern  Railway  Company  (NS), 
CSX Transportation, Inc. (CSX), and the Alaska Railroad—are all making sig-
nificant  strides  to  develop  PTC  systems.  The  Association  of  American  Rail-
roads (AAR) will play a critical role in finalizing interoperability requirements 
for these technologies. 
• Switch  Point  Monitoring  System  and  Other  Systems.  There  are  steps  that  can 
be taken short of PTC to reduce accident risk in non-signalized (dark) territory. 
In  November  2005,  FRA  partnered  with  BNSF  through  a  $1  million  Switch 
Point  Monitoring  System  pilot  project  to  develop  a  low-cost  system  that  elec-
tronically  monitors,  detects,  and  reports  a  misaligned  switch  on  mainline  track 
located in non-signaled territory. These mechanisms are designed to provide an 
additional  layer  of  protection  to  avert  the  consequences  of  an  improperly  lined 
switch.  The  project  involves  the  installation  of  wireless  communication  devices 
at  49  switches  along  a  174-mile  section  of  non-signaled  BNSF  track  between 
Tulsa  and  Avard,  Oklahoma.  Train  dispatchers  at  an  operations  center  in  Fort 
Worth,  Texas,  are  monitoring  the  devices  to  detect  when  the  hand-operated 
switches are set in the wrong position. If a switch is misaligned, the dispatcher 
directs  a  train  to  slow  down  or  stop  until  railroad  crews  in  the  field  confirm 
it is safe to proceed. Thus far, no unsafe failures have been reported, and BNSF 
plans expansion of this and similar types of systems to other non-signaled terri-
tory. Along with the human factors rulemaking, this new switch monitoring sys-
tem  may  prevent  future  train  accidents  such  as  the  one  at  Graniteville,  SC, 
which resulted from an improperly lined main track switch in non-signaled ter-
ritory. 
• BNSF  is  also  demonstrating  rail  integrity  circuits,  which  can  detect  broken 
rails and alert the dispatcher much in the same way as the switch point mon-
itoring  technology.  Both  of  these  technologies  are  ‘‘forward-compatible’’  with 
PTC,  meaning  that  they  can  be  integrated  into  PTC  as  it  is  deployed  on  the 
subject territories. 
• Electronically  Controlled  Pneumatic  (ECP)  Brakes.  During  the  1990s,  the  AAR 
led an industry effort to develop ECP brakes, which use an electronic train line 
to  command  brake  applications  and  releases.  ECP  brakes  apply  uniformly  and 
virtually instantaneously throughout the length of the train, provide health-sta-
tus  information  on  the  condition  of  brakes  on  each  car,  respond  to  commands 
for  graduated  releases,  and  entirely  avoid  runaway  accidents  caused  by  deple-
tion  of  train-line  air  pressure.  ECP  brakes  shorten  stopping  distances  on  the 
order  of  40  to  60  percent,  depending  on  train  length  and  route  conditions.  In 
turn,  shortened  stopping  distances  mean  that  some  accidents  that  occur  today 
might  be  avoided  entirely  and  that  the  severity  of  those  that  do  occur  in  the 
future might be reduced. 
• FRA  commissioned  a  study,  released  last  year,  that  identified  and  quantified 
significant  business  benefits  that  could  be  realized  with  this  technology 
through greater operational efficiencies. The study also suggested a migration 
plan that would start with unit train operations, focused initially on the Pow-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

der  River  Basin  coal  service.  Since  then,  FRA  has  been  working  with  the 
AAR,  railroads,  vendors,  and  the  coal  sector  to  generate  momentum  toward 
implementation  of  this  cost-saving  and,  potentially,  life-saving  technology.  In 
this  regard,  ECP  brakes  are  one  of  the  key  features  of  FRA’s  Advanced  Con-
cept  Train,  a  research-and-development  prototype  train  specially  designed 
and equipped with other improvements that is helping to demonstrate the po-
tential  of  these  new  technologies  across  the  Nation.  FRA  is  also  planning  to 
develop a revised set of requirements for train air brakes that are more suit-
able  for  this  new  technology,  by  issuing  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking 
sometime  in  the  near  future.  Until  a  final  rule  is  issued  amending  the  train 
air  brake  requirements,  we  remain  ready  to  review  and  respond  to  requests 
for relief from railroads interested in proceeding with ECP technology. 

» In  March  FRA  approved  a  waiver  request  from  BNSF  and  NS  to  install 
ECP  brake  systems  on  trains  to  demonstrate  the  safety  and  efficacy  of  the 
technology.  While  providing  that  proper  safeguards  be  in  place,  the  waiver 
permits trains equipped with ECP brakes to travel up to 3,500 miles with-
out  stopping  to  undergo  certain  routine  brake  inspections—more  than  dou-
ble the distance allowed by current Federal regulations. FRA will carefully 
monitor  the  railroads’  compliance  with  the  waiver,  which  will  enable  FRA 
to  gather  extensive  data,  including  data  that  could  be  useful  in  developing 
the rulemaking. 
2. Addressing Fatigue 

Fatigue  has  long  been  a  fact  of  life  for  many  railroad  operating  employees,  given 
their  long  and  often  unpredictable  work  hours  and  fluctuating  schedules.  Train 
crews  may  legally  work  an  enormous  number  of  hours  in  a  week,  month,  or  year. 
While commuter train crews often have some predictability in their work schedules, 
crews of freight trains rarely do. The long hours, irregular work/rest cycles, and lack 
of  regular  days  off,  combined,  have  a  very  deleterious  effect  on  employee  alertness. 
Railroads are necessarily 24-hour businesses, and the effects of ‘‘circadian rhythms’’ 
challenge  the  alertness  of  even  well-rested  employees,  particularly  in  the  early 
morning hours. 

The  hours-of-service  laws,  originally  enacted  in  1907  and  last  substantially 
amended  in  1969,  set  certain  maximum  on-duty  periods  (generally  12  hours  for  op-
erating  employees)  and  minimum  off-duty  periods  (generally  8  hours,  or  if  the  em-
ployee has worked 12 consecutive hours, a 10-hour off-duty period is required). How-
ever, FRA does not believe that the limitations in those laws are adequate to effec-
tively  control  fatigue.  The  hours-of-service  laws  must  be  replaced  with  sound,  sci-
entifically-based  regulations;  later  in  my  testimony  I  will  discuss  in  detail  the  Ad-
ministration  proposal  to  bring  about  this  long-overdue  change.  The  proposal  would 
allow for the use of modern learning on fatigue, including research FRA accelerated 
under the Action Plan. 
a. Accelerate Research on Railroad Crew Work History To Validate a Fatigue Model 

for Possible Use To Improve Crew Scheduling 

On  November  29,  2006,  FRA  announced  the  release  of  a  study  which  provides  a 
strong,  scientific  rationale  for  evaluating  railroad  employee  work  schedules  to  ad-
dress  worker  fatigue.  The  goal  of  the  research  was  to  determine  if  a  fatigue  model 
can accurately and reliably predict an increased risk of human error that could con-
tribute to the occurrence of a train accident. The study documents, for the first time, 
the  significant  circadian  influence  on  accidents  caused  by  human  factors  (there  is 
no  circadian  influence  on  accidents  not  caused  by  human  factors).  The  study  also 
documents  a  significant  linear  relationship  between  fatigue  predicted  by  the  model 
and the risk of a human factors accident. No relationship was found between fatigue 
and  accidents  not  caused  by  human  factors.  FRA  expects  this  information  will  aid 
the railroad industry in improving crew scheduling practices in order to reduce that 
risk. A model for detecting the point at which the risk of fatigue becomes hazardous 
could become an important part of a railroad’s fatigue management plan. A similar 
approach is currently utilized by the U.S. Department of Defense. 

The  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB)  has  emphasized  the  role  of 
sleep  disorders  in  transportation  accidents,  and  FRA  recognizes  that  providing  fa-
tigue  management  information  alone  may  not  be  sufficient.  In  October  2004,  FRA 
published a safety advisory in the Federal Register, urging railroads to address sleep 
disorders  through  progressive  company  policies.  Last  September,  FRA’s  RSAC 
adopted  a  task  to  develop  recommendations  on  medical  standards  for  safety-critical 
railroad  employees.  Parallel  with  this  RSAC  effort,  FRA  has  awarded  a  contract  to 
UP  to  conduct  a  sleep  disorder  assessment  project.  Findings  and  recommendations 
from  this  project  are  anticipated  to  be  completed  later  this  year.  Management  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

sleep  disorders  is  among  the  important  elements  of  that  effort,  which  is  now  well 
underway. 
3. Improving Track Safety 

Track-caused  accidents  are  the  second-largest  category  of  train  accidents,  com-
prising 33 percent of all train accidents. Some of the leading causes of track-caused 
accidents  are  difficult  to  detect  during  normal  railroad  inspections.  Broken  joint 
bars,  for  example,  are  a  leading  cause,  but  the  kinds  of  cracks  in  those  bars  that 
foreshadow  a  derailment-causing  break  are  difficult  to  spot  with  the  naked  eye. 
Similarly, broken rails account for some of the most serious accidents, but the inter-
nal rail flaws that lead to many of those breaks can be detected only by specialized 
equipment. 
a. Demonstration of New Technology To Detect Cracks in Joint Bars 

FRA is developing an automated, high-resolution video inspection system for joint 
bars  that  can  be  deployed  on  a  hi-rail  vehicle  to  detect  visual  cracks  in  joint  bars 
without  having  to  stop  the  vehicle.  In  October  2005,  a  prototype  system  that  in-
spects  joint  bars  on  both  sides  of  each  rail  was  successfully  demonstrated.  Testing 
showed  that  the  high-resolution  video  system  detected  cracks  that  were  missed  by 
the traditional visual inspections. The system was then enhanced with new features 
to improve the reliability of joint bar detection and to add capabilities to include the 
Global  Positioning  System  (GPS)  coordinates  for  each  joint  to  facilitate  future  in-
spection and identification. Additionally, software was developed to scan the images 
automatically, detect the cracked joint bar, and then send a message to the operator 
with an image of the broken joint bar. The new features were implemented and the 
system  was  tested  and  demonstrated  in  the  summer  of  2006.  This  year,  FRA  in-
tends  to  make  additional  enhancements  to  increase  the  operating  speed  and  imple-
ment a more rugged, simple, and robust detection system. 
b. Requirements for Enhanced Capability and Procedures To Detect Track Defects 

FRA is also addressing joint bar cracks on the regulatory front. As a direct result 
of  a  Congressional  mandate  in  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transpor-
tation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  and  of  NTSB  recommenda-
tions  arising  out  of  various  accidents  involving  cracked  joint  bars,  FRA  published 
an  interim  final  rule  (IFR)  in  November  2005  concerning  the  inspection  of  joints  in 
continuous  welded  rail  (CWR)  track.  Subsequently,  after  soliciting  public  comment 
and advice from RSAC’s Track Safety Standards Working Group, FRA issued a final 
rule in October 2006, which adopted portions of the IFR and made changes to other 
provisions.  The  final  rule  requires  track  owners  to  develop  and  implement  a  proce-
dure  for  the  detailed  inspection—including  on-foot  inspection—of  CWR  rail  joints, 
to  identify  joint  bar  cracks  and  joint  conditions  that  can  lead  to  the  development 
of  these  cracks.  Track  owners  must  now  also  create  and  submit  fracture  reports  to 
FRA  whenever  a  cracked  or  broken  joint  bar  is  discovered  in  CWR  track.  Based  on 
the  data  that  FRA  will  collect  from  the  fracture  reports,  FRA  will  establish  a  pro-
gram to review the root causes of joint bar failure. In addition, the rule encourages 
railroads to develop and adopt automated methods to improve the inspection of rail 
joints in CWR track. 
c. Deployment of Two Additional Automated Track Inspection Vehicles 

Subtle track geometry defects, such as rails being uneven or too far apart, are dif-
ficult to identify during a typical walking or hi-rail inspection. That is why FRA has 
developed  automated  track  inspection  vehicles  to  enhance  its  capability  to  identify 
problems,  and  ensure  that  they  are  addressed,  before  a  train  accident  occurs.  In 
April,  FRA  began  operating  its  two  newest  vehicles:  the  T19  (which  is  self-pro-
pelled),  and  the  T20  (which  is  locomotive-towed).  These  new  vehicles  use  a  variety 
of  technology  to  measure  track  geometry  flaws.  The  measurements  are  recorded  in 
real-time  and  at  operating  speed.  Problem  areas  are  identified  by  the  GPS  location 
and  shared  immediately  with  the  railroad  so  appropriate  corrective  actions  can  be 
taken in a timely manner. 

Along  with  the  T16,  T17  and  T18,  FRA  now  has  five  automated  track  inspection 
vehicles  that  will  allow  the  agency  to  inspect  nearly  100,000  track-miles  each  year, 
tripling the present capacity. In particular, FRA will be better able to focus its auto-
mated track inspection activities on high-volume rail lines that carry hazardous ma-
terials  and  passenger  trains  as  well  as  to  improve  its  ability  to  follow  up  more 
quickly on routes where safety performance by a railroad is substandard. 
4. Improving Hazmat Safety and Emergency Response Capability 

The  railroad  industry’s  record  on  transporting  hazmat  is  very  good.  The  industry 
transports  nearly  two  million  shipments  of  hazmat  annually,  ordinarily  without  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

cident.  However,  the  Macdona,  TX  accident  in  2004  and  the  Graniteville,  SC  acci-
dent  in  2005,  which  together  involved  12  deaths  as  the  result  of  chlorine  releases, 
demonstrate  the  potential  for  catastrophic  consequences  from  certain  train  acci-
dents.  The  agency  is  actively  engaged  in  a  variety  of  activities  intended  to  reduce 
the  likelihood  that  a  tank  car  may  be  breached  if  an  accident  does  occur,  comple-
menting our effort to reduce the likelihood of train accidents. Realizing that we can-
not  prevent  all  accidents,  FRA  has  developed  initiatives  to  ensure  that  emergency 
responders are fully prepared to minimize the loss of life and damage when an acci-
dent or release does occur. 

It  is  important  to  emphasize  that  these  safety  initiatives  are  in  addition  to,  and 
complement  efforts  by,  FRA,  DHS  and  its  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA),  and  PHMSA  to  provide  for  the  security  of  hazmat  transported  by  rail.  A 
major component of this effort has been PHMSA’s March 2003 regulation requiring 
each  shipper  and  carrier  of  significant  quantities  (placardable  amounts)  of  hazmat 
to adopt and comply with a security plan. See 49 CFR § 172.800 et seq. Last Decem-
ber,  working  closely  with  FRA  and  TSA,  PHMSA  published  an  NPRM  to  enhance 
the  safety  and  security  of  certain  highly  hazardous  materials  transported  by  rail. 
See  71  FR  76833.  Specifically,  this  proposal  would  require  rail  carriers  of  certain 
explosive, toxic inhalation hazard, and radioactive materials to assess the safety and 
security of the routes currently used for these materials and alternative routing op-
tions, and to make routing decisions based on those assessments. The comment pe-
riod  for  the  NPRM  closed  February  20,  2007.  PHMSA  and  FRA  have  reviewed  the 
comments,  including  comments  presented  at  two  public  meetings,  and  are  in  the 
process of drafting a final rule. PHMSA and FRA are coordinating with TSA to en-
sure regulatory consistency between the two rules. 

As  Administrator  Boardman  testified  before  the  Committee  in  January  on  the 
general  topic  of  rail  security,  the  safety  and  security  of  hazmat  transported  by  rail 
are  often  intertwined.  I  would  be  glad  to  update  the  Subcommittee  on  the  many 
other security-related initiatives in this area, such as the section 333 conference on 
ways  to  minimize  safety  and  security  risks  from  the  transportation  by  rail  of  TIH 
materials. 
a. Enhancements to Emergency Response Readiness 

Emergency  responders  presently  have  access  to  a  wide  variety  of  information  re-
garding  hazmat  transported  by  rail.  Railroads  and  hazmat  shippers  are  currently 
subject to the hazard-communication requirements of the Hazardous Materials Reg-
ulations. In addition, these industries work through the American Chemistry Coun-
cil’s  TRANSCAER  (Transportation  Community  Awareness  and  Emergency  Re-
sponse) program to familiarize local emergency responders with railroad equipment 
and  product  characteristics.  PHMSA  publishes  the  Emergency  Response  Guidebook, 
with  the  intention  that  it  may  be  found  in  virtually  every  fire  and  police  vehicle  in 
the United States. 

In  March  2005,  with  FRA  encouragement,  the  AAR  amended  its  Recommended 
Operating  Practices  for  Transportation  of  Hazardous  Materials  (now  Circular  No. 
OT–55–I) to expressly state that local emergency responders, upon written request, 
will  be  provided  with  a  list  ranking  the  top  25  hazardous  materials  transported  by 
rail  through  their  communities.  This  is  an  important  step  to  allow  emergency  re-
sponders  to  plan  for,  and  better  focus  their  training  on,  the  type  of  rail-related 
hazmat incidents that they could potentially encounter. 

In  July  2005,  again  with  FRA  encouragement,  CSX  and  CHEMTREC  (the  chem-
ical  industry’s  24-hour  resource  center  for  emergency  responders)  entered  into  an 
agreement  to  conduct  a  pilot  project  to  see  if  key  information  about  hazmat  trans-
ported  by  rail  could  be  more  quickly  and  accurately  provided  to  first  responders  in 
the  crucial  first  minutes  of  an  accident  or  incident.  The  project  is  designed  so  that 
if  an  actual  hazmat  rail  accident  or  incident  occurs,  CHEMTREC  watchstanders, 
who interact with emergency response personnel, will have immediate access to CSX 
computer  files  regarding  the  specific  train,  including  the  type  of  hazmat  being  car-
ried and its exact position in the train consist. CSX has advised that there has been 
sufficient  use  of  the  current  system  to  begin  evaluating  the  project.  FRA  is  also 
working  through  the  AAR  to  encourage  the  other  major  railroads  to  participate  in 
a similar project. 

Finally,  another  pilot  project  is  underway  to  evaluate  the  use  of  Railinc  Corpora-
tion’s  Freightscope,  a  program  that  provides  equipment  search  capabilities  for 
hazmat  shipments.  The  system  was  installed  at  CHEMTREC  in  December  2006, 
and  it  has  the  potential  to  more  rapidly  provide  information  about  hazmat  ship-
ments on shortline and regional railroads to CHEMTREC watchstanders to improve 
information  availability  and  reduce  delays  in  emergency  response.  The  pilot  project 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

is scheduled to last a year, and includes various tests to determine the system’s ef-
fectiveness. Two tests have already been conducted with good results. 
b.  Improvements  in  Tank  Car  Integrity  Through  Research  and  Development  and 

Rulemaking 

Prior to the August 2005 enactment of SAFETEA–LU, FRA had initiated tank car 
structural  integrity  research  stemming  from  the  circumstances  of  the  2002  derail-
ment  in  Minot,  ND,  which  involved  the  release  of  anhydrous  ammonia  from  tank 
cars  punctured  during  the  derailment.  Current  research  being  conducted  for  FRA 
by the Volpe National Transportation Systems Center (Volpe Center), part of DOT’s 
Research  and  Innovative  Technology  Administration  (RITA),  involves  a  three-step 
process  to  assess  the  effects  of  various  types  of  train  accidents  (e.g.,  a  derailment 
or  collision)  on  a  tank  car.  The  first  phase  is  the  development  of  a  physics-based 
model  to  analyze  the  kinematics  of  rail  cars  in  a  derailment.  The  second  phase  is 
the  development  of  a  valid  dynamic  structural  analysis  model;  and  the  third  phase 
is  an  assessment  of  the  damage  created  by  a  puncture  and  entails  the  application 
of  fracture  mechanics  testing  and  analysis  methods.  This  research  is  also  studying 
the relative strength of various types of steel used to construct tank cars. 

In  addition  to  research  on  strengthening  the  structural  integrity  of  the  tank  car 
to  reduce  the  potential  that  a  collision  will  result  in  release  of  a  hazardous  com-
modity,  the  research  is  also  evaluating  the  compatibility  of  new  designs  with  the 
existing fleet to assure that new hazards are not unintentionally introduced. Several 
accident  scenarios  have  been  defined  which  will  help  focus  research  into  improving 
the performance of secondary tank-to-tank impacts after an event has occurred. Spe-
cifically, work is concentrated on increasing the energy required to puncture a tank 
car  for  impacts  to  the  side  shell  or  head  of  the  tank  car.  For  impacts  in  yards,  the 
research is evaluating technology such as pushback couplers, energy absorbers, and 
anti-climbing devices, designed to prevent the train from derailing. 

With  the  assistance  of  this  ongoing  research,  FRA,  in  conjunction  with  PHMSA, 
is  working  to  develop  new  hazardous  material  tank  car  safety  standards  in  accord-
ance  with  Section  9005  of  SAFETEA–LU.  We  are  currently  consulting  with  rail-
roads,  shippers,  and  car  manufacturers  and  have  concluded  three  public  meetings 
to gather information and views. 

To  further  these  efforts,  FRA  signed  a  Memorandum  of  Cooperation  with  Dow 
Chemical  Company,  UP,  and  the  Union  Tank  Car  Company  to  participate  in  their 
Next Generation Rail Tank Car Project. The agreement provides for extensive infor-
mation-sharing  and  cooperation  between  ongoing  FRA  and  industry  research  pro-
grams  to  improve  the  safety  of  rail  shipments  of  hazardous  commodities,  including 
toxic inhalation hazards and high-risk gases and liquids. Full-scale destructive test-
ing of tank cars is also underway to establish a baseline for performance of existing 
cars  and  to  help  validate  and  refine  FRA’s  predictive  model  for  tank  car  crash-
worthiness.  Two  full-scale  tests  have  been  conducted  to  date  at  the  Transportation 
Technology  Center  (TTC)  in  Pueblo,  Colorado—the  first  on  April  11,  2007,  and  the 
second on April 26, 2007—and I would be glad to provide the Committee with addi-
tional information about this significant research. 
5. Strengthening FRA’s Safety Compliance Program 
a. Implementation of National Inspection Plan 

FRA  continually  seeks  ways  to  direct  its  inspection  and  enforcement  efforts  to-
ward the issues and locations most in need of attention. To this end, FRA instituted 
the National Inspection Plan (NIP), an inspection and allocation program that uses 
predictive  indicators  to  assist  FRA  in  allocating  inspection  and  enforcement  activi-
ties within a given region by railroad and by state. The NIP was fully implemented 
across all of FRA’s safety disciplines in March 2006. A reduction in both the number 
and  the  rate  of  train  accidents  is  expected  once  the  NIP  has  had  time  to  take  its 
full effect and FRA refines its application in response to actual experience. 
b. Revisions to Schedules of Civil Penalties for Safety Violations 

In  December  2006,  FRA  published  proposed  statements  of  agency  policy  that 
would amend the 25 schedules of civil penalties issued as appendixes to FRA’s safe-
ty  regulations.  The  proposed  revisions  are  intended  to  reflect  more  accurately  the 
safety risks associated with violations of the rail safety laws and regulations, as well 
as to make sure that the civil penalty amounts are consistent across all safety regu-
lations. 

Although  the  schedules  are  statements  of  agency  policy,  and  FRA  has  authority 
to  issue  the  revisions  without  having  to  follow  the  notice  and  comment  procedures 
of  the  Administrative  Procedure  Act,  FRA  has  provided  members  and  representa-
tives of the general public an opportunity to comment on the proposed revisions be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

fore  amending  them.  FRA  has  received  mixed  comments  on  the  proposals,  and  is 
currently  evaluating  all  of  the  comments  received  in  preparing  final  statements  of 
agency policy. 
6. Fostering Further Improvements in Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety 
Deaths  in  highway-rail  grade  crossing  accidents  are  the  second-leading  category 
of  fatalities  associated  with  railroading.  (Trespasser  fatalities  are  the  leading  cat-
egory.) The number of grade crossing deaths has declined substantially and steadily 
in  recent  years.  However,  the  growth  in  rail  and  motor  vehicle  traffic  continues  to 
present challenges. 
a. Issuance of Safety Advisory 2005–03 

In May 2005, FRA issued Safety Advisory 2005–03, which describes the respective 
roles  of  the  Federal  and  State  governments  and  of  the  railroads  in  grade  crossing 
safety.  It  also  specifically  reminds  railroads  of  their  responsibilities  to  report  prop-
erly  to  FRA  any  accident  involving  a  grade  crossing  signal  failure;  to  maintain 
records  relating  to  credible  reports  of  grade  crossing  warning  system  malfunctions; 
to  preserve  the  data  from  all  locomotive-mounted  recording  devices  following  grade 
crossing  accidents;  and  to  cooperate  fully  with  local  law  enforcement  authorities 
during  their  investigations  of  such  accidents.  FRA  is  also  committed  to  providing 
technical  assistance  to  local  authorities  in  the  investigation  of  crossing  accidents 
where information or expertise within FRA control is required to complete the inves-
tigation.  FRA  has  extensively  distributed  this  advisory  through  national  law  en-
forcement organizations and through contacts with local agencies. 
b. Development of State-Specific Grade Crossing Safety Action Plans 

In  June  2004,  DOT  and  FRA  issued  an  ‘‘Action  Plan  for  Highway-Rail  Crossing 
Safety  and  Trespass  Prevention’’  that  sets  forth  a  series  of  initiatives  in  the  areas 
of  engineering,  education,  and  enforcement  to  reduce  and  prevent  highway-rail 
grade  crossing  accidents.  As  one  of  these  initiatives,  FRA  began  working  with  the 
State  of  Louisiana  in  March  2005  to  develop  its  own  action  plan  for  grade  crossing 
safety, to address high numbers of grade crossing accidents and deaths at the State 
level. The action plan focuses on reducing collisions between trains and motor vehi-
cles  at  grade  crossings  where  multiple  collisions  have  occurred.  After  a  cooperative 
effort  between  the  Louisiana  Department  of  Transportation  and  Development,  Fed-
eral  Highway  Administration,  FRA,  and  other  stakeholders,  the  state  approved  the 
Action  Plan  in  April  2006.  FRA  is  encouraging  other  states  with  high  numbers  of 
grade  crossing  accidents  and  deaths  to  do  the  same,  and  is  currently  working  with 
the state of Texas to develop such a plan. 
c. Focus on Pedestrian Safety 

In  addition,  FRA  will  work  within  the  grade  crossing  safety  community  to  deter-
mine  appropriate  responses  to  pedestrian  fatalities  at  grade  crossings.  Early  in 
2006,  the  Transportation  Research  Board  devoted  an  entire  session  of  its  annual 
meeting  to  pedestrian  grade  crossing  safety  issues  in  order  to  capture  information 
on how to improve safety in this area. Later this spring, FRA will publish a compila-
tion of information on existing pedestrian safety devices currently being used in the 
Nation so that those making decisions on methods to improve pedestrian safety may 
have useful resource material available. 
d. Inquiry on Safety of Private Grade Crossings 

In  June  2006,  FRA  initiated  an  inquiry  into  the  safety  of  private  highway-rail 
grade  crossings.  Approximately  10  percent  of  grade  crossing  collisions  occur  at  pri-
vately-owned  crossings.  However,  there  is  little  governmental  safety  oversight  of 
these crossings, at either the state or Federal level. As a result, in cooperation with 
appropriate  state  agencies,  FRA  has  been  soliciting  oral  statements  at  a  series  of 
public  meetings  throughout  the  Nation  on  issues  related  to  the  safety  of  private 
grade  crossings,  including  current  practices  concerning  responsibilities  for  safety  at 
these  crossings,  the  adequacy  of  warning  devices  at  the  crossings,  and  the  relative 
merits  of  a  more  uniform  approach  to  improving  safety  at  private  crossings.  Four 
meetings  have  been  held,  and  the  final  meeting  will  take  place  in  Syracuse,  New 
York, on July 26. FRA has also opened a public docket on these issues, so that inter-
ested  parties  may  submit  written  comments  for  public  review  and  consideration. 
The statements made and comments received will help inform decisions on what ac-
tion needs to be taken to address the safety of private grade crossings. 
C. Passenger Rail Safety Initiatives 

While  the  National  Rail  Safety  Action  Plan  focuses  on  improving  the  safety  of 
freight  railroad  operations  and  grade  crossings,  FRA  has  also  been  making  impor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

tant progress on the safety of railroad passengers. Let me highlight the agency’s ini-
tiatives. 
1. Passenger Safety Rulemakings 

FRA is hard at work on several rulemakings specifically designed to improve rail 
passenger  safety.  First,  as  a  result  of  consensus  recommendations  from  RSAC,  in 
August  2006  FRA  proposed  new  passenger  rail  safety  standards  to  improve  evacu-
ation of passengers from trains, to provide additional ways for rescuers to access the 
passenger car in case of an emergency, and to enhance onboard emergency commu-
nication  systems.  FRA  is  in  the  process  of  preparing  the  final  rule,  which  is  ex-
pected  to  be  issued  sometime  in  the  near  future.  Moreover,  a  separate  regulatory 
proposal is also in development within RSAC, focusing on passenger car emergency 
signage,  low-location  exit  path  marking,  and  emergency  lighting.  That  proposal  is 
based  on  American  Public  Transportation  Association  (APTA)  standards  for  pas-
senger safety and is intended to augment current Federal requirements. 

FRA is also preparing a proposed rule to implement the RSAC’s recommendations 
to  enhance  structural  strength  requirements  for  the  front  of  cab  cars  and  multiple- 
unit  locomotives.  These  enhancements  would  include  the  addition  of  ‘‘energy  defor-
mation’’ requirements specified in revised APTA standards. 
2. Gap Concerns 

Recent attention has been focused on passenger safety at stations with high-level 
platforms  where  there  are  gaps  between  passenger  car  doorways  and  the  platform. 
On  August  5,  2006,  a  young  woman  fell  into  a  gap  between  the  platform  and  the 
Long  Island  Rail  Road  (LIRR)  commuter  train  she  was  exiting  from,  and  was  ulti-
mately  struck  and  killed  by  another  train.  FRA  staff  conducted  an  informal  survey 
of standards used for determining gap distance, and found a great deal of variation 
in  standards  among  commuter  railroads.  Visits  to  station  platforms  at  six  selected 
railroads  found  considerable  variations  in  gap  length.  Setting  and  maintaining  an 
acceptable  gap  is  a  complicated  process  affected  by  passenger  equipment  types, 
track maintenance, track curvature, and platform configuration. The gap is also af-
fected  when  freight  trains  or  specialized  equipment  must  use  the  same  track  used 
for passenger boarding. 

FRA  has  made  this  issue  a  priority.  FRA  has  established  an  RSAC  task  force  on 
General  Passenger  Safety  to  specifically  address  safety  concerns  associated  with 
issues such as platform gaps, safe boarding and debarking, and passenger casualties 
associated  with  the  ‘‘second  train.’’  The  full  task  force  has  met  twice  and  will  also 
address  other  matters  directly  affecting  passenger  safety  on  or  around  station  plat-
forms and make any necessary recommendations to FRA for regulatory action. 
3. Passenger Safety Research and Development 

• Crash Energy Management (CEM) Systems. Research has shown that passenger 
rail  equipment  crashworthiness  in  train-to-train  collisions  can  be  significantly 
increased if the equipment structure is engineered to crush in a controlled man-
ner.  For  several  years,  FRA  has  been  advancing  this  engineering  approach, 
termed CEM, with strong support from the Volpe Center. First use of this con-
cept on the North American continent was in design of Amtrak’s Acela Express 
trainset. In March 2006, FRA successfully conducted a full-scale passenger train 
crash  test  at  the  TTC  to  evaluate  new  CEM  technology  that  might  be  applied 
to  conventional  equipment.  In  this  test,  a  passenger  train  that  had  been 
equipped with a CEM system that included sacrificial crush zones in unoccupied 
spaces,  pushback  couplers  designed  to  retract  and  absorb  energy,  and  specially 
designed  anti-climbers  to  keep  the  train  in  line,  better  protected  the  spaces  in-
tended  to  be  occupied  by  passengers  and  train  crewmembers.  Also  tested  were 
new passenger seats with special padding and new tables with crushable edges, 
to  help  prevent  and  mitigate  passenger  injuries.  Use  of  this  integrated  CEM 
technology  is  expected  to  save  lives  by  more  than  doubling  the  speed  at  which 
all passengers are typically expected to survive a train crash. 
• The Southern California Regional Rail Authority (Metrolink) is in the process 
of  procuring  a  new  fleet  of  cars  utilizing  CEM  technology.  Metrolink’s  pro-
curement  is  being  facilitated  by  the  completed  work  of  the  CEM  Working 
Group, specially tasked in May 2005 to develop a detailed technical specifica-
tion for implementing CEM technology in passenger rail cars. The South Flor-
ida  Regional  Transportation  Authority  (SFRTA)  has  joined  Metrolink  in  pro-
curing  equipment  using  this  specification,  and  FRA  expects  other  passenger 
railroads to include the specification in future procurements of their own. 
• In  addition,  FRA  is  working  with  APTA  in  developing  industry-wide  stand-
ards  for  applying  CEM  technology,  such  as  push-back  couplers  and  deform-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

able anti-climbers, to conventional passenger cars. To help support this effort, 
a  full-scale  impact  test  of  a  multi-level  passenger  car  into  the  rigid  barrier 
at  the  TTC  is  planned  for  July  2007,  as  testing  to  date  has  involved  single- 
level  passenger  cars.  Data  obtained  from  this  test  is  expected  to  help  specify 
the  performance  of  multi-level  passenger  cars  in  conjunction  with  push-back 
couplers or deformable anti-climbers, or both. 
• Rollover Rig. In May 2006, FRA unveiled a state-of-the-art Passenger Rail Vehi-
cle Emergency Evacuation Simulator, also known as a ‘‘Rollover Rig.’’ It has the 
unique  ability  to  roll  a  full-sized,  commuter  rail  car  up  to  180  degrees,  effec-
tively turning it upside down, to simulate passenger train derailment scenarios. 
The  Rollover  Rig  is  already  enhancing  the  ability  of  researchers  to  test  strate-
gies for evacuating passenger rail cars and to evaluate the performance of emer-
gency  systems  in  the  cars,  such  as  emergency  lighting,  doors,  and  windows.  In 
addition,  first  responders  nationwide  now  have  a  unique  training  tool  to  prac-
tice  effective  passenger  rail  rescue  techniques  safely  when  a  rail  car  is  on  its 
side. FRA developed the Rollover Rig at a cost of $450,000. New Jersey Transit 
Rail  Operations  donated  the  commuter  rail  car  used  by  the  Rollover  Rig,  and 
the  Washington  Metropolitan  Area  Transit  Authority  agreed  to  house,  operate, 
and  maintain  the  simulator  at  its  emergency  response  training  facility  located 
in Landover, Maryland. 
4. Collision Hazard Analysis 

‘‘Collision  Hazard  Analysis’’  is  a  specific  type  of  safety  review  that  seeks  to  iden-
tify  collision  hazards  and  to  develop  reasonable  solutions  to  eliminate  or  mitigate 
these  hazards.  Collision  hazards  include  conditions  and  activities  that  increase  the 
risk  of  collisions  between  trains  or  other  on-track  equipment,  between  trains  and 
motor  vehicles/pedestrians,  or  between  trains  and  fixed  objects  along  the  right  of 
way. FRA strongly believes that the performance of a Collision Hazard Analysis will 
strengthen  and  support  the  passenger  rail  system  safety  process  that  grew  out  of 
the  combined  experience  of  the  agency  and  the  commuter  railroads  under  Emer-
gency  Order  No.  20.  FRA  and  the  Volpe  Center  have  partnered  with  APTA  to  con-
duct  important  pilot  projects  regarding  Collision  Hazard  Analysis.  During  the  first 
pilot  project,  FRA,  the  Volpe  Center,  and  APTA  worked  cooperatively  to  train  and 
mentor a hazard analysis team at Tri-Rail, SFRTA’s commuter service, which volun-
teered  to  be  the  first  commuter  railroad  to  conduct  this  analysis.  The  Tri-Rail 
project proved very successful and served as the model for a Collision Hazard Anal-
ysis  pilot  project  on  the  Virginia  Railway  Express,  completed  last  fall.  The  effort 
was also very successful and provided further insight into the collision hazard anal-
ysis  process.  Based  on  positive  experiences  on  both  pilot  projects,  FRA  strongly  ad-
vocates  that  all  commuter  operators  undertake  a  Collision  Hazard  Analysis.  The 
analysis  is  especially  useful  for  ‘‘New  Start’’  rail  projects  where  design  and  oper-
ational decisions can be readily influenced. 
III. Administration’s Rail Safety Bill (H.R. 1516, S. 918) 

The  Administration’s  rail  safety  reauthorization  bill,  the  Federal  Railroad  Safety 
Accountability  and  Improvement  Act,  would  reauthorize  appropriations  for  FRA  to 
carry  out  its  rail  safety  mission  for  4  years.  FRA  has  made  a  full  copy  of  the  pro-
posal  available  on  our  website  at  http://www.fra.dot.gov/us/content/48,  including 
the supporting analysis for each section. Let me take this opportunity to discuss the 
major  provisions  of  the  Administration  bill  and  how  they  will  further  FRA’s  safety 
efforts. 
A. Authorizes Safety Risk Reduction Program and Protects Confidentiality 

of Risk Analyses Produced 

In order to enhance the accountability of railroads in assuming full responsibility 
for  their  own  safety,  the  bill  would  authorize  appropriations  for  the  addition  of  a 
safety  risk  reduction  program  to  supplement  FRA’s  current  safety  activities  and 
seeks Congressional endorsement of this pilot program. Since rail-related accidents, 
injuries, and deaths are already at low levels, FRA needs to augment our traditional 
behavior-based  and  design-specification-based  regulations  with  a  robust  safety  risk 
reduction  program  to  drive  down  those  key  measures  of  risk  at  a  reasonable  cost 
and in a practical manner. 

In the safety context, a risk reduction program is intended to make sure that the 
systems  by  which  railroads  operate  and  maintain  their  properties  are  adequate  to 
meet or exceed safety objectives. FRA continues to place greater emphasis on devel-
oping  models  of  how  railroads  can  systematically  evaluate  safety  risks,  in  order  to 
hold  them  more  accountable  for  improving  the  safety  of  their  operations,  including 
implementing plans to eliminate or reduce the chance for workers to make mistakes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

that can lead to accidents or close calls. A safety risk reduction program could unify 
previous voluntary efforts in the human factors arena while extending similar tech-
niques to management of risk in other arenas such as track safety. 

To  encourage  railroads  to  produce  thorough,  as  opposed  to  superficial,  risk  anal-
yses,  a  companion  provision  in  the  bill  would  bar  public  disclosure  by  FRA  of 
records required under the safety risk reduction program, except for Federal law en-
forcement  purposes.  Also  in  order  to  promote  the  preparation  of  serious  risk  anal-
yses  by  railroads,  the  provision  would  forbid  discovery  by  private  litigants  in  civil 
litigation  for  damages  of  any  information  compiled  or  collected  under  the  program, 
and would forbid admission into evidence of the same information in civil litigation 
by private parties for damages. An example would be a commuter railroad that un-
dertakes  a  hazard  analysis  and  has  a  crossover  near  a  bridge  abutment.  It  is  un-
likely that the railroad would be able to remove the hazard (a derailment could send 
the  cars  into  the  fixed  structure)  but  it  could  mitigate  the  risk  by  reducing  speeds 
and training. 

FRA  is  mindful  that  any  restriction  of  public  access  to  information  may  be  con-
troversial  and  requires  careful  scrutiny.  However,  we  are  convinced  that  assuring 
confidentiality  is  essential  to  promote  full  disclosure  by  the  railroads  and  their  em-
ployees to make such programs meaningful and bring about tangible improvements 
in safety. 
B. Grants Rulemaking Authority Over Hours-of-Service 

As discussed earlier, human factors cause more than a third of all train accidents, 
constituting  the  largest  category  of  train  accident  causes.  Fatigue  is  at  least  a  con-
tributing factor in one of every four serious human factor train accidents. We believe 
that fatigued crewmembers have played an increasing role in railroad accidents over 
the  past  decade  through  poor  judgment,  miscommunication,  inattentiveness,  and 
failure to follow procedures. Our challenge is to ensure that crewmembers have ade-
quate opportunity to rest, are free of disorders that can disrupt sleep, and are fully 
engaged in maintaining alertness. 

However,  the  statutory  provisions  that  govern  the  hours-of-service  of  railroad 
train  crews,  dispatchers,  and  signal  maintainers  are  antiquated—essentially  a  cen-
tury  old—and  woefully  inadequate  to  address  present  realities.  For  example,  under 
those laws, train crews may work 8 hours on duty and 8 hours off-duty perpetually. 
Engineers  and  conductors  often  work  60  to  70  hours  a  week,  and  may  be  called  to 
work  during  the  day  or  night,  which  may  disrupt  sleep  patterns  and  reduce  their 
ability to function. See Appendix B. 

Moreover,  those  hours-of-service  laws  contain  no  substantive  rulemaking  author-
ity.  The  lack  of  regulatory  authority  over  duty  hours—authority  that  other  DOT 
agencies  have  with  respect  to  their  modes  of  transportation—has  precluded  FRA 
from making use of scientific learning on this issue of sleep-wake cycles and fatigue- 
induced  performance  failures.  Behavioral  science  has  progressed  to  the  point  that 
computer models can accurately predict the likely effect of given sleep and rest pat-
terns on employee performance. The models provide useful guidance to aid employee 
scheduling,  and,  as  I  discussed  earlier,  FRA  published  a  validation  report  of  one 
such  model  in  2006.  Yet,  only  UP  is  making  use  of  a  sleep  model  to  evaluate  its 
own  crew  scheduling  practices.  Most  railroads  have  yet  to  integrate  use  of  such 
models  in  their  operations  and  have  refrained  from  making  public  commitments  to 
use  this  capability  in  the  future.  Further,  over  the  past  15  years,  the  history  of  at-
tempts by rail labor and management to improve fatigue management has not been 
marked by sustained progress. 

We  recognize  that  specific  amendments  to  the  hours-of-service  laws  might  miti-
gate fatigue. Yet, we believe that sincere attempts at short-term relief can also cre-
ate  constraints  and  unintended  consequences  that  may  limit  the  ability  to  provide 
optimal  solutions  downstream.  Treating  limbo  time  as  on-duty  time,  for  instance, 
may force carriers to reduce the length of many assignments to avoid the possibility 
of  ‘‘violations’’  under  circumstances  where  safety  could  not  be  seriously  com-
promised, and may increase the cost of any further reforms. Hours-of-service issues 
are surprisingly complex, and they need to be properly considered within the overall 
context of fatigue prevention and management. FRA is committed to making signifi-
cant progress in this area, but we need the regulatory authority to do so. 

We  strongly  recommend  that  the  existing  hours-of-service  laws  be  replaced  with 
flexible  regulations  based  on  a  modern,  scientific  understanding  of  fatigue.  Today, 
I am here asking for your support for legislation that will permit us to put into ac-
tion  what  we  have  learned.  The  Administration  bill  first  proposes  to  sunset  the 
hours-of-service laws, but retain their protections as interim regulations embodying 
their substantive provisions. Next, the proposal calls for FRA, as the Secretary’s del-
egate,  to  review  the  problem  of  fatigue  with  the  assistance  of  the  Railroad  Safety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Advisory  Committee,  and  to  develop  as  necessary  new,  science-based  requirements 
that  can  help  us  reduce  human  factor-caused  accidents  and  casualties.  We  believe 
revised ‘‘benchmark’’ limits are needed on work hours, and requirements for rest pe-
riods, to provide simple guidance for fixed schedules, where that will suffice. 

The bill would also authorize FRA to permit railroads to comply with an approved 
fatigue management plan as an alternative to complying with the ‘‘benchmark’’ lim-
its in the regulations. With the tools now available, we will be able to recognize fa-
tigue  management  approaches  that  include  careful  evaluation  of  a  wide  variety  of 
more flexible work schedules by validated techniques. In fact, we believe most safe-
ty-critical railroad employees would be protected by performance-based fatigue man-
agement programs that will enhance safety while holding down costs. 

For  public  and  employee  safety,  it  is  time  to  make  a  long-overdue  change  and 
grant  us  the  rulemaking  authority  over  hours-of-service  to  directly  address  the 
major cause of far too many train accidents. 
C. Promotes Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety 

Accidents at highway-rail grade crossings account for more than a third of all rail- 
related  fatalities.  The  bill  seeks  to  prevent  highway-rail  grade  crossing  collisions 
and make crossings safer through two main provisions. 
1.  Requires  Reports  by  Railroads  and  States  to  DOT  on  the  Characteristics  of 

Highway-Rail Grade Crossings 

Currently, reporting to the DOT National Crossing Inventory is strictly voluntary. 
FRA  is  the  custodian  of  the  inventory  and  the  quality  of  the  data  is  only  as  good 
as what states and railroads have historically reported. Too much data in the inven-
tory has been outdated. The bill would remedy this by requiring that railroads and 
states  provide  the  Secretary  with  current  information  regarding  the  country’s  ap-
proximately 230,000 highway-rail grade crossings. Mandatory reporting would make 
this  unique  national  database  more  up  to  date  and  complete,  which  would  help  (i) 
States  better  rank  their  crossings  by  risk  and  channel  resources  to  the  most  dan-
gerous crossings first, and (ii) DOT and transportation researchers identify the most 
promising ways to reduce crossing casualties. The bill would therefore require initial 
reports on all previously unreported crossings and periodic updates on all crossings. 
2. Fosters Introduction of New Technology To Improve Safety at Public Highway-Rail 

Grade Crossings 

Fewer  than  half  of  the  140,000  public  highway-rail  grade  crossings  have  active 
warning  devices,  which  are  expensive  to  install  and  maintain.  Perversely,  improve-
ments at one crossing are often cited in tort actions to prove the inadequacy of pro-
tections at another crossing. Under the Administration bill, if the Secretary has ap-
proved  a  new  technology  to  provide  advance  warning  to  highway  users  at  a  grade 
crossing,  the  Secretary’s  determination  preempts  any  state  law  concerning  the  ade-
quacy  of  the  technology  in  providing  the  warning.  FRA  believes  that  this  proposal 
would help encourage the creation and deployment of new, cost-effective technology 
at  the  Nation’s  approximately  80,000  public  grade  crossings  that  still  lack  active 
warning  devices.  For  instance,  under  an  FRA  waiver  the  Twin  Cites  and  Western 
Railroad Co. and its supplier successfully demonstrated a warning system designed 
for  lower-volume  roadways  and  rail  lines  using  dedicated  locomotives.  The  system 
uses  GPS  and  a  data  radio  link  between  the  locomotive  and  each  crossing.  This 
product is now being commercialized by a major signal supplier. 
D.  Expands  FRA’s  Authority  To  Disqualify  Individuals  Unfit  for  Safety- 

Sensitive Service 

Another provision of the bill would expand FRA’s existing disqualification author-
ity  to  cover  individuals  who  are  unfit  for  safety-sensitive  service  in  the  railroad  in-
dustry  because  of  a  violation  of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations  related  to 
transporting  hazmat  by  rail.  Currently,  FRA  may  disqualify  an  individual  only  for 
a violation of the rail safety laws or regulations, not the Hazardous Materials Regu-
lations,  even  though  violation  of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations  may  involve 
a  greater  potential  accident  risk  or  consequence  (in  the  event  of  an  accident).  This 
proposal  would  logically  extend  our  disqualification  authority  over  railroad  employ-
ees  and  complement  current  initiatives  to  strengthen  FRA’s  safety  compliance  pro-
gram. 
E. Protects Rail Safety Regulations From Legal Attack on the Ground That 
They  Affect  Security  and  Repeals  Statutory  Requirement  for  DHS  To 
Consult with DOT When Issuing Security Rules That Affect Rail Safety 
The  bill  would  also  bar  legal  challenges  to  DOT  safety  regulations  on  the  basis 
that  they  affect  rail  security.  In  many  cases,  rail  safety  and  security  are  inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

twined,  and  part  of  the  justification  for  certain  DOT  regulations  is  that  they  en-
hance rail security. The bill would clarify the scope of the Secretary’s safety jurisdic-
tion and help deter or quickly rebuff any challenge that DOT has exceeded its statu-
tory authority in issuing such regulations. 

Of course, DHS would continue to exercise primary responsibility for the promul-
gation of rail security regulations. In this regard, the bill would repeal the statutory 
provision that, when issuing security rules that affect rail safety, DHS must consult 
with  DOT.  We  believe  the  provision  is  unnecessary  and  confusing  in  light  of  other 
statutes,  executive  orders,  and  existing  inter-Departmental  cooperation  under  the 
DOT–DHS Memorandum of Understanding and its related annexes on rail security. 
F.  Clarifies  the  Secretary’s  Authority  To  Issue  Temporary  Waivers  of  Rail 

Safety Regulations Related to Emergencies 

The  bill  would  clarify  that  FRA,  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate,  may  grant  a  tem-
porary waiver without prior notice and an opportunity for public comment and hear-
ing, if the waiver is directly related to an emergency event or needed to aid in recov-
ery efforts and it is in the public interest and consistent with railroad safety. While 
FRA’s normal practice is to set aside time for public comment and hearing on waiv-
er  petitions,  this  appreciably  slows  down  issuance  of  waivers  necessary  for  emer-
gency response and recovery efforts. Yet granting a waiver without such procedures 
risks  legal  challenge.  The  provision  would  free  FRA  from  this  dilemma  and  allow 
the  agency  to  support  emergency  response  and  recovery  efforts  by  dispensing  with 
prior  notice  and  an  opportunity  for  comment  and  hearing,  and  by  otherwise  expe-
diting  the  process  for  granting  waivers.  Further,  the  relief  granted  would  be  tem-
porary (a maximum of 9 months), and the normal waiver procedures would have to 
be followed to extend the temporary relief granted should doing so be necessary. 
G. Authorizes the Monitoring of Railroad Radio Communications 

Currently, FRA is permitted to monitor railroad radio communications only in the 
presence of an authorized sender or receiver, such as a railroad employee. Yet, when 
railroad  employees  know  that  FRA  is  present,  they  tend  to  be  on  their  best  safety 
behavior.  Therefore,  FRA  cannot  be  sure  whether  the  level  of  compliance  observed 
is normal, and we are less able to identify what are, under ordinary circumstances, 
the most frequent and serious instances of noncompliance. Access to candid commu-
nications offsite would yield a truer picture of compliance levels. 

The bill would address this concern by letting FRA safety inspectors monitor and 
record  railroads’  radio  communications  over  their  dedicated  frequencies  outside  of 
the  presence  of  railroad  personnel  for  the  purpose  of  accident  prevention  (including 
accident investigation) and, with certain exceptions, to use the information received. 
The  exceptions  would  be  that  the  information  (1)  may  generally  not  be  used  as  di-
rect  evidence  in  any  administrative  or  judicial  proceeding,  and  (2)  may  not  be  re-
leased  under  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act.  The  information  may,  however,  be 
used as background material for further investigation. Nor should there be concern 
that  the  information  communicated  is  personal  information.  Railroad  operating 
rules  and  procedures  already  require  that  all  radio  communications  relate  to  rail-
road  operations  and  prohibit  railroad  employees  from  using  the  radio  for  personal 
use. 

As FRA’s objective of accident prevention is ordinarily fulfilled daily by conducting 
safety  inspections  of  railroad  operations  and  enforcing  the  rail  safety  laws,  moni-
toring  of  radio  communications  would  not  only  help  achieve  that  objective,  but 
would greatly improve the efficiency of those inspections, the accuracy of the results, 
and  the  effective  deployment  of  FRA’s  limited  inspection  resources  based  on  those 
more accurate results. 
H.  Clarifies  and  Relaxes  the  Existing  Statutory  Provision  on  Moving 

Certain Defective Equipment for Repair 

Finally, I would like to mention that the bill would amend a complicated statutory 
provision  that  states  the  conditions  for  hauling  a  railroad  car  or  locomotive  with  a 
safety  appliance  or  power  brake  defect  for  repair  without  civil  penalty  liability,  in-
cluding the requirement that equipment be back-hauled to the nearest available re-
pair  point.  Back-hauls  required  by  statute  can  be  both  unsafe  (because  of  the  haz-
ards  related  to  switching  a  car  out  of  one  train  and  into  another  train),  and  ineffi-
cient  (because  the  car  is  stopped  from  moving  toward  its  destination  and  forced  to 
go  to  a  different  place  that  is  physically  closer  than  the  next  forward  point  for  re-
pair).  The  proposal  would  allow  the  equipment  to  be  moved  to  the  next  forward 
point  of  repair  under  clear  regulatory  safeguards  for  moving  defective  equipment 
that are more consistent with the movement-for-repair provisions applicable to vehi-
cles with other types of defects, such as Freight Car Safety Standards defects. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Further,  the  bill  would  also  define  some  key  statutory  terms  and  then  provide 
FRA,  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate,  with  rulemaking  authority  to  define  others.  Cur-
rently, FRA may provide only guidance on the meaning of these terms, and this has 
contributed  to  an  atmosphere  of  uncertainty  about  the  requirements  of  the  statute 
in day-to-day application. For example, FRA has received many complaints over the 
years  that  cars  have  been  hauled  past  a  repair  point  that  FRA  does  not  consider 
to  be  a  repair  point.  This  proposal  would,  therefore,  help  dispel  such  uncertainty 
and  promote  understanding  and  compliance  with  the  provisions  governing  the  safe 
movement of equipment with a safety appliance or power brake defect. 

The  Administration’s  bill  does  not  include  a  provision  that  would  revise  the  pre-
emption provision at 49 U.S.C. § 20106. While this is a very important issue, of inter-
est  to  many  on  the  Committee,  I  would  ask  that  the  Committee  oppose  the  provision 
included as Section 3 of H.R. 1401. This provision would overturn longstanding Su-
preme  Court  precedents,  and  ultimately  be  detrimental  to  railroad  safety.  It  would 
eliminate national uniformity of regulation. It was clearly the intention of Congress 
in  enacting  section  20106  to  establish  national  uniformity  of  regulation,  which  is  a 
fundamental  keystone  of  the  railroad  safety  statutes.  Railroads  would  instead  be 
forced  to  attempt  to  comply  with  an  endless  number  of  ever  changing  and  poten-
tially conflicting state and local standards adopted by individual juries. If the Com-
mittee  needs  further  information  to  address  this  important  issue,  FRA  staff  would 
be glad to provide assistance. 

I  would  like  to  emphasize  that,  while  all  of  the  provisions  I  have  discussed  are 
among the major provisions of the bill, there are other significant provisions I have 
not mentioned today that will also enhance rail safety. These include providing FRA 
rail security officers with greater access to Federal, State, and local law enforcement 
data bases, officer-protection warning systems, and communications for the purpose 
of performing the Administrator’s civil and administrative duties to promote safety, 
including security, and for other purposes authorized by law. All of these provisions 
are  set  forth  in  the  bill  the  Secretary  presented  in  February,  and  I  would  be  glad 
to discuss each of them in detail with you. 
IV. Conclusion 

FRA’s  approach  to  enhancing  the  safety  of  rail  transportation  is  multifaceted. 
FRA personnel strive daily to implement comprehensive initiatives for safety assur-
ance and hazard mitigation under the National Rail Safety Action Plan to make rail 
operations safer for the public and the rail transportation industry. The Administra-
tion’s  Federal  Railroad  Safety  Accountability  and  Improvement  Act  would  enable 
FRA not only to continue these efforts but to enhance safety systematically in many 
ways.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Subcommittee  to  bring  about  the  enact-
ment  of  the  Administration’s  bill,  and  to  help  make  our  Nation’s  railroad  system 
ever safer. Thank you. 

APPENDIX A 

THE RAILROAD INDUSTRY’S SAFETY RECORD 

The  railroad  industry’s  overall  safety  record  is  very  positive,  and  most  safety 
trends  are  moving  in  the  right  direction.  While  not  even  a  single  death  or  injury 
is  acceptable,  progress  is  continually  being  made  in  the  effort  to  improve  railroad 
safety.  This  improvement  is  demonstrated  by  an  analysis  of  the  Federal  Railroad 
Administration’s  (FRA)  database  of  railroad  reports  of  accidents  and  incidents  that 
have  occurred  over  the  nearly  three  decades  from  1978  through  2006.  See  49  CFR 
part  225.  (The  worst  year  for  rail  safety  in  recent  decades  was  1978,  and  2006  is 
the last complete year for which preliminary data are available.) Between 1978 and 
2006, the total number of rail-related accidents and incidents has fallen from 90,653 
to  12,940,  an  all-time  low  representing  a  decline  of  86  percent.  Between  1978  and 
2006,  total  rail-related  fatalities  have  declined  from  1,646  to  913,  a  reduction  of  44 
percent. From 1978 to 2006, total employee cases (fatal and nonfatal) have dropped 
from 65,193 to 5,065, the record low; this represents a decline of 92 percent. In the 
same  period,  total  employee  deaths  have  fallen  from  122  in  1978  to  16  in  2006,  a 
decrease of 87 percent. 

Contributing  to  this  generally  improving  safety  record  has  been  a  74-percent  de-
cline  in  train  accidents  since  1978  (a  total  of  2,864  train  accidents  in  2006,  com-
pared  to  10,991  in  1978),  even  though  rail  traffic  has  increased.  (Total  train-miles 
were  up  by  8.5  percent  from  1978  to  2006.)  In  addition,  the  year  2006  saw  only  28 
train  accidents  out  of  the  2,834  reported  in  which  a  hazardous  material  was  re-
leased,  with  a  total  of  only  69  hazardous  material  cars  releasing  some  amount  of 
product, despite about 1.7 million movements of hazardous materials by rail. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

In  other  words,  over  the  last  almost  three  decades,  the  number  and  rate  of  train 
accidents, total deaths arising from rail operations, employee fatalities and injuries, 
and  hazardous  materials  releases  all  have  fallen  dramatically.  In  most  categories, 
these improvements have been most rapid in the 1980s, and tapered off in the late 
1990s. Causes of the improvements have included a much more profitable economic 
climate  for  freight  railroads  following  deregulation  in  1980  under  the  Staggers  Act 
(which  led  to  substantially  greater  investment  in  plant  and  equipment),  enhanced 
safety  awareness  and  safety  program  implementation  on  the  part  of  railroads  and 
their  employees,  and  FRA’s  safety  monitoring  and  standard  setting  (most  of  FRA’s 
safety  rules  were  issued  during  this  period).  In  addition,  rail  remains  an  extremely 
safe  mode  of  transportation  for  passengers.  Since  1978,  more  than  11.2  billion  pas-
sengers  have  traveled  by  rail,  based  on  reports  filed  with  FRA  each  month.  The 
number of rail passengers has steadily increased over the years, and since 2000 has 
averaged more than 500 million per year. Although 12 passengers died in train colli-
sions  and  derailments  in  2005,  none  did  in  2006.  On  a  passenger-mile  basis,  with 
an  average  about  15.5  billion  passenger-miles  per  year  since  the  year  2000,  rail 
travel  is  about  as  safe  as  scheduled  airlines  and  intercity  bus  transportation  and 
is  far  safer  than  private  motor  vehicle  travel.  Rail  passenger  accidents—while  al-
ways to be avoided—have a very high passenger survival rate. 

As  indicated  previously,  not  all  of  the  major  safety  indicators  are  positive.  Grade 
crossing  and  rail  trespasser  incidents  continue  to  cause  a  large  proportion  of  the 
deaths  associated  with  railroading.  Grade  crossing  and  rail  trespassing  deaths  ac-
counted  for  97  percent  of  the  913  total  rail-related  deaths  in  2006.  In  recent  years, 
rail trespasser deaths have replaced grade crossing fatalities as the largest category 
of rail-related deaths. In 2006, 525 persons died while on railroad property without 
authorization, and 365 persons lost their lives in grade crossing accidents. Further, 
significant train accidents continue to occur, and the train accident rate per million 
train-miles  has  not  declined  at  an  acceptable  pace  in  recent  years.  It  actually  rose 
slightly  in  2003  and  2004  (to  4.05  and  4.38,  respectively)  compared  to  that  in  2002 
(3.76), although it dropped in 2005 (to 4.1) and 2006 (to 3.54). 

The  causes  of  train  accidents  are  generally  grouped  into  five  categories:  human 
factors;  track  and  structures;  equipment;  signal  and  train  control;  and  miscella-
neous. The great majority of train accidents are caused by human factors and track. 
In  recent  years,  most  of  the  serious  events  involving  train  collisions  or  derailments 
resulting in release of hazardous material, or harm to rail passengers, have resulted 
from  human  factor  or  track  causes.  Accordingly,  the  National  Rail  Safety  Action 
Plan makes human factors and track the major target areas for improving the train 
accident rate. 

APPENDIX B 

SCIENTIFIC LEARNING DEMONSTRATING INADEQUACY OF HOURS OF SERVICE LAWS 
The  following  four  examples  illustrate  some  of  the  ways  in  which  the  existing 
hours-of-service statutory regime fails to reflect the latest scholarship on the subject 
of fatigue. 

First,  current  scientific  information  indicates  that  to  feel  well  rested  most  people 
need approximately 8 hours of sleep per night. The current hours-of-service laws re-
quire a minimum off-duty period of only 10 hours if an employee in train and engine 
service  has  worked  12  consecutive  hours  in  the  previous  24-hour  period.  If  an  em-
ployee  works  11  hours  and  59  minutes  or  less,  the  laws  require  a  minimum  rest 
period  of  only  8  hours.  Very  few  employees  work  12  consecutive  hours;  therefore, 
most may legally be called back to duty with only 8 hours off-duty. During that off- 
duty time, the employee must travel to and from work and attend to personal needs 
such  as  bathing  and  eating.  Crew-calling  practices  allow  the  employee  to  be  called 
as  little  as  2  hours  prior  to  the  beginning  of  the  next  duty  period.  Given  these  cir-
cumstances,  it  is  certain  that  the  current  law  permits  employees  to  work  with  less 
than 8 hours of sleep per night. 

An  FRA  study  of  locomotive  engineers’  sleep  and  work  patterns  found  that  the 
average  locomotive  engineer  obtained  7.13  hours  of  sleep  per  night.1 Another  FRA 
study of train handling performance conducted on a highly realistic locomotive simu-
lator  by  locomotive  engineers  working  under  schedules  that  conformed  with  the 

1 Pollard,  J.K.  1996.  Locomotive  engineer’s  activity  diary.  Report  Number  DOT/FRA/RRP–96/ 

02. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

hours-of-service laws 2 found that engineers who worked 10 hours and had 12 hours 
off-duty,  slept  an  average  of  only  6.1  hours.  A  similar  group  of  engineers  who  also 
worked 10 hours, but had only 9.3 hours off-duty, slept an average of only 4.6 hours. 
Again, most people need about 8 hours of sleep per night; therefore, for most people, 
the  amount  of  sleep  these  engineers  received  was  insufficient  even  though  their 
schedules fully conformed with the hours-of-service laws. 

Second,  scientific  information  also  shows  that  the  quantity  and  quality  of  sleep 
vary  with  the  time  of  day.  Most  people  sleep  best  at  night;  however,  the  current 
hours-of-service laws do not take the time of day when sleep can occur into account. 
Under  those  laws,  engineers  who  quit  work  at  dawn  and  have  to  sleep  during  the 
daytime,  when  it  is  harder  to  sleep,  get  the  same  minimum  eight  or  10  hours  off 
as engineers who quit work in the evening and have the relative luxury of sleeping 
at  night.  The  study  by  Pollard  referenced  earlier  found  that  engineers,  in  fact,  ob-
tain the least sleep if their on-duty period ends between 5 a.m. and noon. 

Third,  most  mammals,  including  human  beings,  have  an  approximately  24-hour 
sleep-wake  cycle  known  as  a  ‘‘circadian  rhythm.’’  Rapid  changes  in  the  circadian 
pattern of sleep and wakefulness disrupt many physiological functions such as hor-
mone  releases,  digestion,  and  temperature  regulation.  Human  function  can  be  af-
fected,  performance  may  be  impaired,  and  a  general  feeling  of  debility  may  occur 
until  realignment  is  achieved.  The  maximum  work  periods  and  minimum  off-duty 
periods  specified  in  the  current  hours-of-service  laws  force  sleep-wake  cycles  into  a 
less-than-24-hour pattern that is highly unnatural and very difficult to adapt to. Jet 
lag when flying east is the most commonly experienced syndrome similar to the ex-
perience of consistently working on a less-than-24-hour cycle. 

Fourth,  recent  studies  ‘‘suggest  that  sleep  loss  (less  than  7  hours  per  night)  may 
have  wide-ranging  effects  on  the  cardiovascular,  endocrine,  immune,  and  nervous 
systems, including the following: 

• Obesity in adults . . . 
• Diabetes and impaired glucose tolerance 
• Cardiovascular disease and hypertension 
• Anxiety symptoms 
• Depressed mood 
• Alcohol use[.]’’ 3 
In other words, sleep loss, which the current hours-of-service regime permits rail-
road operating employees to suffer, contributes not only to the safety risk of fatigue, 
but  also  to  a  gamut  of  heath  risks,  including  the  risk  of  serious  health  problems 
such as diabetes, cardiovascular disease, and hypertension. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. Mr. Sumwalt? 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROBERT L. SUMWALT, VICE CHAIRMAN, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Mr.  SUMWALT.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking 
Member  Smith,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  Thank  you  for  in-
viting  the  Safety  Board  to  testify  on  rail  safety  issues  that  are 
being  considered  by  Congress  and  for  your  continued  interest  in 
furthering the safety of our Nation’s railways. 

I’d  like  to  begin  with  the  long  history  of  fatigue-caused  railroad 
accidents  and  the  frustration  that  we  share  with  the  FRA  regard-
ing its lack of legislative authority to address the root causes of fa-
tigue. The first railroad accident attributed by the Board to fatigue 
was  a  collision  between  two  freight  trains  at  Wiggins,  Colorado  in 
1984. Fatigue accidents have continued unabated such as the colli-
sion  between  trains  at  Anding,  Mississippi  in  2005  and  Macdona, 
Texas in 2004. 

2 Thomas,  G.R.,  Raslear,  T.G.,  and  Kuehn,  G.I.  1997.  The  effects  of  work  schedule  on  train 
handling  performance  and  sleep  of  locomotive  engineers:  A  simulator  study.  Report  Number 
DOT/FRA/ORD–97–09. 

3 Institute  of  Medicine  of  the  National  Academies.  Sleep  Disorders  and  Sleep  Deprivation:  an 

Unmet Public Health Problem (2006), p. 59. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

In  Anding,  both  crew  members  typically  worked  6  days  a  week, 
11 to 12 hours each day. They were working their sixth consecutive 
day  when  the  accident  occurred.  In  Macdona  we  found  that  the 
crew  member’s  failure  to  obtain  sufficient  rest  before  reporting  for 
duty  and  the  railroad  scheduling  practices  each  contributed  to  the 
accidents. 

Proposals  being  considered  for  legislation  this  year  address  spe-
cific elements of employee fatigue. However, we believe that a com-
prehensive fatigue management program is needed to consider sci-
entifically  based  principles  when  assigning  work  schedules  includ-
ing: factors that influence acute and cumulative fatigue, the body’s 
ability to adjust to rotating schedules and the responsibility of em-
ployees  to  get  sufficient  and  timely  sleep  during  off-duty  periods. 
We believe the best means to achieve this result is through regula-
tions  promulgated  by  the  FRA  that  can  be  modified  as  industry 
conditions evolve. 

I’d  like  to  talk  briefly  now  about  positive  train  control.  Techno-
logical  solutions  such  as  PTC  systems  have  great  potential  to  pre-
vent serious train accidents by providing safety redundant systems 
to  override  mistakes  by  human  operators.  As  mentioned,  positive 
train  control  has  been  on  the  Safety  Board’s  most  wanted  list  for 
17 years. 

In  the  past  10  years  the  Safety  Board  has  investigated  52  rail 
accidents—52 rail accidents that likely would have been prevented 
through  the  implementation  of  positive  train  control  systems.  And 
although  we  are  encouraged  with  the  efforts  of  some  railroads,  we 
know that positive train control systems are needed across the en-
tire country. 

Next,  are  improperly  positioned  switches.  One  of  the  most  seri-
ous train accidents occurred in dark territory in Graniteville, South 
Carolina  in  2005.  A  train  was  diverted  from  the  main  track  to  an 
industry  siding  due  to  an  improperly  positioned  switch  where  it 
struck a parked train. 

Later  that  year  a  similar  accident  occurred  in  Shepherd,  Texas, 
again, in dark territory. The Safety Board first addressed this issue 
in 1974 after an accident in Cotulla, Texas where we recommended 
that the FRA address safe train speeds in dark territory. That rec-
ommendation  was  later  classified  by  the  Safety  Board  as  Closed 
Unacceptable Action. 

We  believe  that  automatically  activated  devices  are  needed  to 
visually  or  electronically  capture  the  attention  of  employees  in-
volved  with  switch  operations  in  dark  territory  and  to  clearly  con-
vey  the  status  of  that  switch.  In  absence  of  these  automated  sys-
tems  trains  should  be  operated  at  speeds  that  will  allow  them  to 
be  safely  stopped  in  advance  of  misaligned  switches.  Additionally 
the  most  expedient  and  effective  means  to  reduce  public  risk  from 
highly  poisonous  gases  in  train  accidents  is  through  operational 
measures  such  as  positioning  the  tank  cars  toward  the  rear  of 
trains and reducing speeds through populated areas. 

And finally a proposal for the Rail Passenger Disaster Family As-
sistance  Act  of  2007  which  mirrors  the  Aviation  Disaster  Family 
Assistance  Act  of  1996.  We  believe  that  this  legislation  would  be 
beneficial to the victims and their families following a rail disaster. 
However  the  Board  has  two  concerns.  The  first  is  the  clarification 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

of  our  responsibilities  to  victims  in  accidents  where  the  Board  is 
not  launching  an  investigative  team.  And  second,  this  legislation 
would  present  a  significant  demand  on  our  already  stretched  re-
sources. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  completes  my  statement.  I’ll  be  happy  to  re-

spond to questions at the appropriate time. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Sumwalt follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ROBERT L. SUMWALT, VICE CHAIRMAN, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Good  morning  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of 
the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is  Robert  Sumwalt,  Vice  Chairman  of  the  National 
Transportation Safety Board. Chairman Lautenberg, I would like to take this oppor-
tunity  to  thank  you,  the  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  and  staff  for  inviting  the 
Safety Board to testify today on several rail safety issues that are being considered 
in  proposed  rail  safety  legislation  and  for  your  continued  interest  in  furthering  the 
safety of our Nation’s railways. 

The Safety Board is concerned about several rail safety issues that are being con-
sidered by this Subcommittee including train crew fatigue, the lack of positive train 
control  systems  to  prevent  train  collisions,  overspeed  derailments,  and  improper 
switch positions in non-signaled (dark) territory. 
Train Crew Fatigue 

The  Safety  Board  has  investigated  a  decades-long  history  of  fatigue-caused  rail-
road  accidents,  and  we  have  an  equally  long  history  of  safety  recommendations 
made  to  address  the  problem.  We  share  the  frustration  with  the  Federal  Railroad 
Administration  (FRA)  regarding  its  lack  of  legislative  authority  to  address  the  root 
causes  of  fatigue  through  scientifically  based  principles  of  workload  and  fatigue 
management. 

We  have  investigated  more  than  a  dozen  railroad  accidents  in  which  we  believe 
train  crew  fatigue  played  a  contributing  role.  The  earliest  railroad  accident  inves-
tigation in which the Board attributed the probable cause to fatigue was a collision 
between  two  freight  trains  at  Wiggins,  Colorado,  in  1984.  About  a  week  later,  two 
more freight trains collided near Newcastle, Wyoming. Again, the Board found that 
the  probable  cause  was  the  crew  of  the  striking  train  falling  asleep  and  failing  to 
comply with restrictive signals. 

Since  1984,  fatigue-related  train  accidents  have  continued,  such  as  the  collisions 
between  two  freight  trains  at  Anding,  Mississippi,  in  2005  and  at  Macdona,  Texas, 
in 2004. In Anding, the northbound train crew failed to comply with wayside signals 
requiring  them  to  stop  and  their  train  hit  a  southbound  train  head-on  killing  all 
four  crewmembers.  The  Safety  Board  examined  the  work/rest  cycles  of  the  north-
bound  train  crews  and  found  that  both  the  engineer  and  conductor  had  worked 
about  111⁄2 hours  per  night  and  had  been  sleeping  about  51⁄2 hours  per  night  for 
the  3  days  immediately  before  the  accident.  Both  crewmembers  typically  worked  6 
days  a  week,  most  often  going  on  duty  between  12  a.m.  and  1  a.m.,  and  were  usu-
ally on duty for 11 to 12 hours. They were working their sixth consecutive day when 
the  accident  occurred  in  Anding.  Getting  a  repeatedly  insufficient  amount  of  sleep 
on  a  regular  basis  can  impair  human  performance  and  alertness,  and  the  crew-
members’ short sleep periods likely allowed them to develop a cumulative sleep loss 
or sleep debt. 

In  the  Macdona  accident  investigation,  the  Safety  Board  found  that  both  crew-
members did not obtain sufficient restorative rest before reporting for duty because 
of  their  ineffective  use  of  off-duty  time,  and  that  the  Union  Pacific  Railroad’s  train 
crew  scheduling  practices  inverted  the  crewmembers’  work/rest  periods—both  of 
which  contributed  to  the  accident.  Work  as  a  train  crewmember  entails  an  unpre-
dictable  job  schedule  that  can  make  it  difficult  for  employees  to  effectively  balance 
their  personal  and  work  lives.  We  found  that  the  unpredictability  of  Union  Pacific 
train  crewmembers’  work  schedules  may  have  encouraged  them  to  delay  obtaining 
rest in the hope that they would not be called to work until later on the day of the 
accident. 

Fatigue  related  accidents  have  occurred  across  all  regions  of  the  country.  The 
Safety  Board  has  investigated  at  least  one  fatigue-caused  accident  on  nearly  every 
major  railroad.  Moreover,  no  type  of  railroad  operation  is  immune  from  the  effects 
of  fatigue.  Although  the  majority  of  fatigue  accidents  that  we  have  investigated  in-
volve freight operations, our investigation case files contain fatigue accidents involv-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

ing long-distance passenger trains, commuter trains, light rail operations, and even 
subway trains. 

The work schedules of rail crewmembers permit repetitive 12-hour days that lead 
to  cumulative  fatigue  or  sleep  debt.  When  the  workers’  commute,  limbo  time  and 
family/personal  responsibilities  are  factored  into  their  daily  schedules,  the  condi-
tions for exceedingly long days that lead to acute fatigue are evident. The relatively 
short mandatory periods of time off currently in place do not afford the opportunity 
for fully restorative sleep. 

Just as our accident history has identified the problem of fatigue in railroad acci-
dents,  the  Safety  Board’s  recommendation  history  has  identified  actions  that  we 
think  could  address  the  problem.  In  the  past  two  decades,  the  Safety  Board  has 
issued 34 recommendations concerning railroad employee fatigue. The FRA received 
8,  the  others  have  gone  to  rail  carriers  and  operating  unions.  The  Board  has  rec-
ommended that the railroad companies reduce the irregularity and unpredictability 
of  crewmember’s  work/rest  schedules  and  provide  education  and  counseling  to  help 
them avoid sleep deprivation. And, we have asked all rail carriers to develop policies 
that would allow an employee to report off-duty, without penalty, when they are im-
paired by lack of sleep. 

The  laws,  rules,  and  regulations  governing  this  aspect  of  transportation  safety  in 
the railroad industry fail to address the problem. The Railroad Hours of Service Act 
allows  railroad  operating  employees  to  work  11  hours  59  minutes,  and  after  only 
8 hours off-duty return back to work. An employee who works the full 12 hours, just 
one  more  minute,  would  get  10  hours  off-duty  before  being  allowed  to  return  to 
work. And, under the current law, these employees are permitted to repeat that ar-
duous work-rest cycle an unlimited number of times. The Railroad Hours of Service 
Act  does  not  take  into  account  either  rotating  work  schedules  or  the  accumulated 
hours  spent  working  in  limbo  time,  which  can  be  substantial—adding  additional 
hours  to  the  workday.  The  Railroad  Hours  of  Service  Act  also  does  not  take  into 
account the significant effects of the human circadian rhythm upon a crewmember’s 
level of alertness. 

The  Macdona  accident  again  prompted  the  Safety  Board  to  issue  new  rec-
ommendations to FRA: R–06–14 to require railroads to use scientifically based prin-
ciples  when  assigning  work  schedules,  and  R–06–15  to  establish  requirements  that 
limit train crewmembers limbo time. 

FRA’s  October  24,  2006,  response  to  the  Board  on  these  recent  recommendations 
again  stated  that  FRA  lacks  rulemaking  authority  over  duty  hours.  This  precludes 
the FRA from making use of almost a century of rigorous scientific research on the 
issue of sleep-wake cycles and fatigue-induced performance failures to try to reduce 
fatigue-related accidents. The FRA response letter further stated ‘‘the FRA supports 
efforts  to  address  the  fatigue  experienced  by  railroad  operating  employees,  and  ac-
knowledges  that  the  existing  hours-of-service  is  not  designed  to  address  the  causes 
of  fatigue.’’  The  FRA  has  subsequently  sought  legislative  authority  to  enact  hours- 
of-service regulations. 

The  Board  strongly  believes  that  the  FRA  needs  authority  to  regulate  crew-
member  work  scheduling  practices  and  work  limits,  and  the  Safety  Board  supports 
statutory change that would provide the FRA that authority. 

Proposals  being  considered  for  rail  safety  legislation  this  year  include  elements 
that  address  certain  aspects  of  employee  fatigue:  at  least  10  hours  of  undisturbed 
off-duty time with no contact during the period; at least 24 consecutive hours of rest 
in  a  7-day  consecutive  work  period;  at  least  48  hours  off-duty  after  7  consecutive 
8-hour  workdays;  and  eliminating  limbo  time  or  requiring  an  additional  4  hours  of 
undisturbed  off-duty  time  when  limbo  time  exceeds  an  hour.  The  Safety  Board  be-
lieves  that  a  comprehensive  fatigue  management  program  is  needed  that  considers 
scientifically based principles when assigning work schedules, including factors that 
influence  acute  and  cumulative  fatigue,  the  body’s  ability  to  adjust  to  rotating 
schedules, and the responsibility of employees to get sufficient and timely sleep dur-
ing off-duty periods. Although some of these elements may have a positive effect on 
improving  training  crews’  adequate  rest,  without  a  comprehensive  program,  the 
Safety Board does not believe that train crew fatigue will be adequately addressed. 
We further believe that the best means to achieve this result is through regulations 
promulgated by the FRA that can be modified as industry conditions evolve. 
Positive Train Control 

Technological  solutions,  such  as  positive  train  control  systems,  have  great  poten-
tial  to  reduce  the  number  of  serious  train  accidents  by  providing  safety  redundant 
systems  to  protect  against  human  performance  failures.  As  a  consequence,  positive 
train  control  has  been  on  the  Safety  Board’s  list  of  Most  Wanted  Safety  Improve-
ments for 17 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

In  the  past  10  years,  the  Safety  Board  has  investigated  52  rail  accidents,  includ-
ing  4  transit  accidents,  where  the  installation  of  a  positive  train  control  system 
would  likely  have  prevented  the  accident.  These  include  5  accidents  in  2005: 
Graniteville,  South  Carolina;  Anding,  Mississippi;  Shepherd,  Texas;  Chicago,  Illi-
nois; and Texarkana, Arkansas. 

The objective of positive train control is to prevent train collisions and over-speed 
accidents by requiring automatic control systems to override mistakes by human op-
erators.  This  issue  was  highlighted  in  2002  when  a  freight  train  and  a  commuter 
train  collided  head-on  in  Placentia,  California,  a  high-speed  corridor  where  com-
muter  and  intercity  passenger  trains  operate.  As  a  result  of  the  Placentia  accident, 
the Safety Board reiterated Safety Recommendation R–01–6 to the FRA to facilitate 
actions necessary for development and implementation of positive train control sys-
tems  that  include  collision  avoidance,  and  require  implementation  of  positive  train 
control systems on main line tracks, establishing priority requirements for high-risk 
corridors  such  as  those  where  commuter  and  intercity  passenger  railroads  operate. 
The FRA published a final rule in the Federal Register titled ‘‘Standards for Devel-
opment  and  Use  of  Processor-Based  Signal  and  Train  Control  Systems,’’  which  be-
came  effective  on  June  6,  2005.  As  a  result  of  FRA’s  responsiveness,  Safety  Rec-
ommendation R–01–6 is classified ‘‘Open—Acceptable Response.’’ 

We  are  pleased  to  note  that  today,  several  railroads  are  moving  to  develop  posi-
tive train control systems. For example, in January of this year, the FRA approved 
a  BNSF  Railway  project  for  its  Electronic  Train  Management  System  (ETMS),  an 
overlay technology that augments an existing train control method. The ETMS sys-
tem  includes  an  in-cab  electronic  display  screen  that  will  first  warn  of  a  problem 
and then automatically engage the train’s braking system if the locomotive engineer 
fails  to  act  appropriately.  The  FRA  action  allows  BNSF  to  implement  ETMS  on  35 
specific freight lines in 17 states. 

The  Union  Pacific  Railroad  (UP)  is  working  on  a  communication-based  train  con-
trol  system  pilot  project  that  will  enforce  stop  signals,  dark  territory  authority  lim-
its,  and  speed  restrictions.  Field  tests  are  scheduled  to  be  conducted  on  two  test 
beds  and  will  cover  about  333  miles  of  track.  UP  began  installing  test  equipment 
on locomotives in September 2006. 

Although  we  are  encouraged  with  progress  underway  by  some  railroads,  we  note 
that positive train control systems are needed on railroad systems across the entire 
United States. The Safety Board believes that positive train control systems should 
be required. 
Improperly Positioned Switches 

One  of  the  most  serious  hazardous  materials  train  accidents  in  recent  years  oc-
curred in Graniteville, South Carolina, on January 6, 2005, after a Norfolk Southern 
Railway Company freight train, while traveling 47 mph, encountered an improperly 
positioned switch that diverted the train from the main line onto an industry track, 
where  it  struck  an  unoccupied  parked  train.  The  track  through  Graniteville  was 
non-signaled (dark) territory. Nine people died as a result of chlorine gas inhalation 
after a tank car was punctured during the accident. 

The  investigation  found  that  the  improperly  lined  switch  had  most  recently  been 
used  by  the  crew  of  a  local  train  about  8  hours  before  the  accident.  The  crew  had 
lined  the  switch  for  an  industry  track  in  order  to  place  two  cars  at  a  local  plant 
and  then  park  their  train.  No  crewmember  remembered  relining  the  switch  for  the 
main line before they boarded a taxi and returned to the terminal. The Safety Board 
concluded  that  the  local  train  crew  failed  to  reline  the  main  line  switch  for  one  or 
more  of  the  following  reasons:  (1)  the  task  of  relining  the  switch  was  functionally 
isolated from other tasks the crew was performing, (2) the crewmembers were rush-
ing  to  complete  their  work  and  secure  their  train  before  reaching  their  hours-of- 
service  limits,  (3)  the  crew  had  achieved  their  main  objective  of  switching  cars  and 
were  focused  on  the  next  task  of  securing  their  equipment  and  going  off-duty,  and 
(4)  the  switch  was  not  visible  to  the  crew  as  they  worked,  leaving  them  without  a 
visual reminder to reline the switch. 

On  September  15,  2005,  a  UP  train  entered  a  siding  in  Shepherd,  Texas,  at  ap-
proximately 37 mph and struck a parked train, killing one crewmember. There were 
no wayside signals to govern the train movements or protect the train from an inter-
ruption  in  the  continuity  of  the  track,  such  as  an  open  switch.  Consequently,  strict 
compliance  with  the  operating  rules  was  necessary  to  protect  one  train  from  an-
other.  The  probable  cause  of  this  accident  was  the  failure  of  a  previous  crew  to  re-
turn  a  main  track  switch  to  the  normal  position  after  they  had  secured  the  train 
on the siding and departed the area. 

The Safety Board was concerned as early as 1974 about the issue of train speeds 
in  areas  not  under  a  form  of  centralized  traffic  control.  As  a  result  of  its  investiga-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

tion of an accident in Cotulla, Texas, involving a misaligned switch in non-signaled 
territory,  the  Board  recommended  that  the  FRA  determine  and  assess  the  current 
risks  of  train  accidents  involving  misaligned  switches,  collisions,  broken  rail,  and 
other route obstructions on main track where automatic block signal systems do not 
exist,  and  to  promulgate  regulations  that  detail  the  major  risks  and  controls  as-
sumed,  set  guidelines  for  safe  operations  below  the  maximum  operating  speed,  and 
assign  responsibility  to  the  carrier  for  safe  operations.  Because  the  FRA’s  actions 
did not satisfy the Safety Board’s intent that new regulations specify circumstances 
that were required when trains operated below the allowable maximum speed, Safe-
ty Recommendation R–74–26 was classified ‘‘Closed—Unacceptable Action.’’ 

Measures beyond additional operating rules, forms, or penalties are needed to en-
sure  that  accidents,  such  as  the  one  in  Graniteville,  South  Carolina,  do  not  recur. 
On  December  12,  2005,  the  Safety  Board  issued  Safety  Recommendation  R–05–14 
to the FRA to require that, along main lines in non-signaled territory, railroads in-
stall an automatically activated device, independent of the switch banner, that will, 
visually  or  electronically,  compellingly  capture  the  attention  of  employees  involved 
with  switch  operations  and  clearly  convey  the  status  of  the  switch  both  in  day  and 
in darkness. In a letter dated June 30, 2006, the FRA acknowledged that additional 
actions  are  needed  to  protect  the  safety  of  trains  in  dark  territory  and  that  over 
time,  positive  train  control  will  serve  this  function.  However,  it  noted  concern  that 
any  system  that  requires  power  at  the  switch  location  will  involve  significant  costs 
simply because of the number of switches involved. The letter advises that the FRA 
has  initiated  a  project  to  evaluate  a  system  that  it  believes  will  be  able  to  detect 
and  report  switch  point  gapping  for  switches  on  main  line  tracks  located  within 
dark territories as an alternate action. 

The  Safety  Board  also  recommended  that  the  FRA  require  railroads,  in  non-sig-
naled  territory  and  in  the  absence  of  switch  position  indicator  lights  or  other  auto-
mated  systems  that  provide  train  crews  with  advance  notice  of  switch  positions,  to 
operate those trains at speeds that will allow them to be safely stopped in advance 
of  misaligned  switches  (R–05–15).  In  its  June  30,  2006,  letter,  the  FRA  states  that 
it does not believe the recommendation is feasible for operational and economic rea-
sons  and  may  also  increase  the  risk  of  derailments.  The  FRA  hastened  to  add  that 
there are undoubtedly certain situations where requiring trains to approach switch-
es prepared to stop would be practical and an appropriate safety response and that 
railroads should consider this option as they conduct risk assessments of their haz-
ardous materials routes. However, the FRA states that it is not aware of any means 
to  describe  how  this  strategy  could  be  applied  in  a  safe  and  cost-effective  manner. 
The  FRA  requested  that  the  Safety  Board  classify  the  safety  recommendation  as 
‘‘Closed—Reconsidered.’’ 

Finally, the Safety Board believes that modeling accident forces and applying frac-
ture toughness standards, as recommended in the Minot, North Dakota, accident re-
port,  will  improve  the  crashworthiness  of  tank  cars  transporting  hazardous  mate-
rials.  However,  because  of  the  time  it  will  take  to  design  and  construct  improved 
tank cars, the Board believes that the most expedient and effective means to reduce 
the  public  risk  from  the  release  of  highly  poisonous  gases  in  train  accidents  is  for 
railroads to implement operational measures that will minimize the vulnerability of 
tank  cars  transporting  these  products.  For  example,  in  Graniteville,  the  chlorine 
tank  car  that  was  punctured  was  in  the  ninth  position  of  42  freight  cars  in  the 
train;  the  front  16  freight  cars  derailed.  In  Macdona,  the  punctured  chlorine  tank 
car was in the 16th position of 74 freight cars in the train; the front 19 cars in this 
train derailed. Following the Graniteville accident, the Board recommended that the 
FRA  require  railroads  to  implement  operating  measures,  such  as  positioning  tank 
cars toward the rear of trains and reducing speeds through populated areas to mini-
mize  impact  forces  from  accidents  and  reduce  the  vulnerability  of  tank  cars  trans-
porting  chlorine,  anhydrous  ammonia,  and  other  liquefied  gases  designated  as  poi-
sonous by inhalation (R–05–16). In its response of October 24, 2006, the FRA stated 
that it believes that placing toxic inhalation hazard cars at the rear of a train would 
do little to protect them from damage and that slowing trains could have a negative 
impact on operations. However it would continue to examine the issue. 
Other Safety Issues 

The  Safety  Board  also  recognizes  that  proposed  rail  safety  legislation  addresses 
several safety provisions previously addressed in safety recommendations issued by 
the  Board.  These  issues  include  requirements  for  toll-free  numbers  at  grade  cross-
ings  so  that  malfunctions  of  signals,  crossing  gates,  or  disabled  vehicles  can  be  re-
ported; a requirement that rail, used to replace defective rail, be inspected by ultra-
sonic  or  other  appropriate  inspection  to  ensure  that  the  replacement  rail  is  free  of 
internal defects; to develop and implement safety regulations for all classes of track 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

for concrete ties; and to provide emergency escape breathing apparatus for all crew-
members on freight trains carrying hazardous materials that would pose an inhala-
tion hazard in the event of an unintentional release. 
Rail Passenger Disaster Family Assistance 

Finally,  a  proposal  for  Rail  Passenger  Disaster  Family  Assistance  mirrors  the 
Aviation  Disaster  Family  Assistance  Act  of  1996,  which  makes  the  Board  respon-
sible for coordinating assistance to families after major aviation accidents. The Avia-
tion  Disaster  Family  Assistance  Act  has  been  tremendously  successful—the  ‘‘gold 
standard’’  in  family  assistance.  This  has  been  because  of  the  Board’s  commitment 
to  assisting  victims  and  their  family  members,  the  significant  cooperation  and  sup-
port of the aviation industry, and support of all of our Federal partners and the non- 
profit community. We believe this proposed legislation would be beneficial to victims 
and  their  families,  providing  the  needed  coordination  and  support  following  a  rail 
disaster. 

However,  the  Board  has  two  concerns  regarding  this  proposed  legislation.  The 
first  is  clarification  of  the  Board’s  responsibilities  to  victims  in  accidents  where  the 
Board is not launching an investigative team. If we are required to provide informa-
tion  about  the  accident  investigation  we  have  to  be  in  a  position  to  have  timely  ac-
cess to that information. Second, this legislation would present a significant demand 
for additional resources. This would include staff to assist rail carriers in their pre-
paredness  efforts  and  to  handle  the  accident  launch  responsibilities.  Currently  the 
Office  of  Transportation  Disaster  Assistance  has  a  staff  of  four.  A  major  aviation 
accident  is  challenging  for  such  a  small  team.  With  the  addition  of  rail  responsibil-
ities  and  the  possibility  of  a  rail  accident  and  aviation  accident  occurring  simulta-
neously, it would be necessary to have additional staff to handle all of the demands. 
Mr.  Chairman,  that  completes  my  statement,  and  I  will  be  happy  to  respond  to 

questions at the appropriate time. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  just  want  to  say 
to  the  witnesses  that  any—a  full  statement  that  you  may  have,  it 
will be entered—accepted into the record. And so that the summary 
that you have been kind of rushing through is very helpful and a— 
but  we  look  forward  to  see—reading  your  full  testimony.  Thank 
you. 

Mr. Hyde? 

STATEMENT OF KURT W. HYDE, ASSISTANT INSPECTOR 

GENERAL, SURFACE AND MARITIME PROGRAMS, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  HYDE.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith  and 
Senator  Klobuchar,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today 
on the reauthorization of the Federal Railroad Safety Program. 

This month we issued our fourth report on grade crossing safety. 
We  found  that  FRA  can  do  more  to  improve  grade  crossing  safety 
by  ensuring  compliance  with  its  mandatory  reporting  requirement 
for  crossing  collisions.  Additional  effort  is  also  needed  to  address 
sight  obstructions  that  block  the  driver’s  view  of  railroad  tracks 
and approaching trains. 

My testimony today is based on our body of work on grade cross-
ing  safety.  We  have  identified  five  actions  that  railroads  and  FRA 
can  take  to  reduce  grade  crossing  collisions  and  fatalities.  These 
are areas that you may wish to consider in your reauthorization of 
this safety program. 

First,  compliance  with  reporting  requirements.  Railroads  are 
charged  with  two  distinct  reporting  requirements  when  a  grade 
crossing collision occurs: first, an immediate call—within 2 hours— 
to  the  National  Response  Center  for  all  serious  collisions  to  deter-
mine whether a Federal investigation at the accident scene is need-
ed.  Second,  within  30  days  of  the  end  of  the  month  in  which  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

collision  occurred,  the  railroad  must  report  every  grade  crossing 
collision  to  FRA.  Timely  and  accurate  reporting  of  collisions  is  es-
sential  to  identifying  dangerous  crossings  and  emerging  accident 
trends.  More  can  be  done  to  ensure  compliance  with  both  of  these 
reporting requirements. 

In November 2005, we reported that railroads had failed to notify 
NRC  immediately  in  21  percent  of  serious  collisions;  most  of  these 
involved  fatalities  or  multiple  injuries.  The  report  we  just  issued 
also cited concerns with another requirement, noting that railroads 
failed  to  report  139  collisions  timely,  with  some  the  sum  being 
nearly 3 years late. Because FRA did not routinely review collision 
records maintained by the railroads it does not know whether some 
15,000  collisions  reported  by  the  railroads  between  2001  and  2005 
include all collisions that occurred. 

FRA  has  begun  reviewing  collision  records  maintained  by  the 
railroads.  These  reviews  are  intended  to  determine  whether  grade 
crossing  collisions  are  being  properly  reported.  The  Subcommittee 
may  wish  to  require  that  FRA  periodically  report  the  results  of 
these reviews. 

Two,  increasing  FRA  involvement  in  collision  investigations. 
FRA’s 385 inspectors cannot physically examine every grade cross-
ing  collision;  instead,  the  agency  relies  on  railroad  self  reporting. 
To  better  evaluate  the  causes  of  collisions  and  railroad  compliance 
with safety regulations, we recommended that FRA broaden its re-
view  of  railroad  reported  information.  FRA  has  just  completed  a 
one-year pilot program to collect and analyze independent informa-
tion. FRA should report the results of the study as soon as possible. 
Three,  addressing  sight  obstructions.  It’s  hard  to  steer  clear  of  a 
train  you  can’t  see,  especially  at  the  76,000  public  crossings  that 
do  not  have  automatic  warning  lights  or  gates.  Obstructions  such 
as  overgrown  vegetation,  as  illustrated  in  my  written  statement, 
can  significantly  reduce  visibility.  For  example,  between  2001  and 
2005,  obstructions  were  present  in  689  collisions  in  which  a  total 
of 87 people died and 242 were injured. 

As  of  this  past  March,  only  13  states  had  laws  regulating  all 
types  of  sight  obstructions,  and  these  vary  widely.  FRA  should 
work  with  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  to  develop  model 
legislation for states in this area. 

Four,  establishing  inventory  reporting  requirements.  FRA’s  Na-
tional Grade Crossing Inventory System contains data on crossings 
and  the  types  of  warning  devices  installed.  The  accuracy  and  com-
pleteness  of  this  inventory  are  essential  because  states  rely  on  it 
to prioritize safety improvements. 

Voluntary reporting by railroads and states has not been success-
ful:  we  found  that  36  percent  of  public  crossing  records  have  not 
been  updated  since  2000.  We  believe  that  mandatory  reporting 
should be required of railroads and states. 

And  my  final  point  is  requiring  action  plans  for  the  most  dan-
gerous  crossings.  We  have  recommended  that  FRA  identify  states 
having  the  most  dangerous  crossings—those  with  the  most  acci-
dents  year  after  year—and  develop  with  those  states,  action  plans 
identifying specific solutions for improvement. 

In  March  2006,  FRA  completed  its  first  such  action  plan  with 
Louisiana.  Officials  acted  to  improve  safety  at  73  percent  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

crossings  with  more  than  one  collision.  FRA  is  now  working  with 
Texas  in  a  similar  effort.  And  the  Subcommittee  may  wish  to  re-
quire  action  in  other  states  with  high  numbers  of  grade  crossing 
collisions. 

Mr. Chairman, we will work with the FRA as it focuses on these 
areas  to  make  railroad  crossings  even  safer.  This  completes  my 
prepared  statement  and  I  would  be  happy  to  respond  to  any  ques-
tions from you or other members of the Subcommittee. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hyde follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KURT W. HYDE, ASSISTANT INSPECTOR GENERAL, SURFACE 

AND MARITIME PROGRAMS, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  members  of  the  Sub-

committee: 

We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Fed-
eral  Railroad  Safety  Program.  We  commend  this  Subcommittee  for  its  work  as  you 
consider  legislation  to  further  improve  railroad  safety.  Improvements  in  safety  are 
important  because  railroads  transport  people  and  freight  over  790  million  train 
miles  annually—by  way  of  173,000  miles  of  track—and  affect  the  lives  of  millions 
of Americans. Railroads employ about 232,000 workers and transport about 42 per-
cent of the Nation’s freight. This industry will grow substantially in the future. The 
Department  estimates  that,  between  1998  and  2020,  the  amount  of  freight  trans-
ported by rail will increase by about 50 percent. 

As  we  reported  in  our  Fiscal  Year  2007  Top  Management  Challenges  issued  to 
the  Department,  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA)  must  continue  imple-
menting  its  safety  initiatives  since  train  accidents  are  on  the  rise  overall.  As  the 
FRA Administrator noted in a Congressional hearing on May 8 of this year, the rail 
industry’s  safety  record  has  improved,  but  a  significant  number  of  train  accidents 
continue  to  occur  and  the  train  accident  rate  has  not  shown  substantive  improve-
ment in recent years. 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  our  testimony  today  will  draw  from  the  body  of  work  we 
conducted  over  the  last  several  years  on  grade  crossing  safety.  At  the  request  of 
Senator  Daniel  K.  Inouye,  Representative  James  L.  Oberstar,  and  Representative 
Corrine  Brown,  we  conducted  our  most  recent  audit  in  response  to  Congressional 
concerns  about  safety  on  the  Nation’s  nearly  240,000  grade  crossings.  On  May  3, 
2007, we issued an audit report that recommends steps FRA can take to better en-
sure  compliance  with  mandatory  reporting  requirements  and  to  address  sight  ob-
structions at grade crossings.1 Our work on grade crossing safety also includes audit 
reports  in  2005,  2004,  and  1999  and  testimony  at  several  Congressional  hearings. 
Taken together, our reports and testimonies represent a comprehensive assessment 
of  grade  crossing  safety  issues  and  resulted  in  recommendations  for  further  en-
hancements to rail safety. FRA has responded positively to the recommendations in 
our reports on grade crossing safety. See Attachment 1 for a list of our grade cross-
ing safety reports and testimonies. 

FRA  has  also  taken  several  actions  to  improve  rail  safety  overall.  For  example, 
in February 2005, we recommended that FRA submit to the Secretary a comprehen-
sive  plan  for  implementing  a  fully  functioning  program  that  makes  meaningful  use 
of analysis of available safety, inspection, and enforcement data.2 To this end, FRA 
instituted  the  National  Inspection  Plan,  an  inspection  and  allocation  program  that 
uses predictive indicators to assist FRA in allocating inspection and enforcement ac-
tivities  within  a  given  region  by  railroad  and  by  state.  This  is  a  step  in  the  right 
direction,  but  since  the  plan  was  implemented  only  in  March  2006,  it  is  too  soon 
to tell exactly how effective these measures will be in the long term. 

In May 2005, then Secretary Norman Mineta announced the National Rail Safety 
Action Plan. This plan outlined FRA’s strategy for focusing oversight and inspection 
resources on areas of greatest concern, targeting the most frequent and highest risk 
causes  of  train  accidents,  and  accelerating  research  with  the  best  potential  to  miti-

1 OIG  Report  No.  MH–2007–044,  ‘‘The  Federal  Railroad  Administration  Can  Improve  High-
way-Rail  Grade  Crossing  Safety  By  Ensuring  Compliance  With  Accident  Reporting  Require-
ments  and  Addressing  Sight  Obstructions,’’  May  3,  2007.  OIG  reports  can  be  accessed  on  our 
website at www.oig.dot.gov. 

2 Memorandum  to  the  Acting  Federal  Railroad  Administrator,  ‘‘Safety-Related  Findings  and 

Recommendations,’’ February 16, 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

gate  such  risks.  In  addition  to  the  actions  in  the  plan,  FRA  reports  that  its  inspec-
tors  conduct  thousands  of  inspections  each  year  and  engage  in  a  range  of  edu-
cational outreach activities on railroad safety issues. 

Despite FRA’s efforts and recent improvements in the safety record of the rail in-
dustry,  serious  train  accidents  continue  to  occur.  The  collision  rate  in  recent  years 
has  not  slowed  markedly.  Train  accidents  increased  by  31  percent  overall  between 
1995 and 2005. Further, while the industry’s record for transporting hazardous ma-
terials has been good, nearly 1.7 million carloads of hazardous materials 3 are trans-
ported  by  rail  in  the  United  States  each  year.  The  catastrophic  consequences  that 
can  arise  due  to  the  release  of  hazardous  materials  from  rail  cars  are  a  significant 
threat  to  safety.  From  2003  through  2006,  the  railroads  reported  145  rail  incidents 
that involved hazardous materials, resulting in 19 fatalities and 423 injuries. These 
incidents  resulted  in  the  evacuation  of  17,384  people  from  their  homes  and  busi-
nesses, caused at least $17 million in track damages, and resulted in about $71 mil-
lion in equipment damages. 

Grade  crossing  safety  is  central  to  rail  safety;  that  is,  enhancements  to  this  one 
vulnerable  area  can  have  a  tremendous,  positive  impact  on  overall  rail  safety.  The 
second  highest  percentage  of  rail-related  fatalities—42  percent  from  1995  through 
2005—is  due  to  collisions  at  grade  crossings.4 During  this  10-year  period,  collisions 
and  fatalities  at  grade  crossings  were  significantly  reduced,  by  34  percent  and  38 
percent,  respectively.  Most  recently,  however,  these  numbers  have  increased.  From 
2003  to  2005,  collisions  rose  by  2  percent  and  the  number  of  fatalities  jumped  by 
7 percent. 

Today, I would like to discuss five actions that railroads and FRA can take to re-
duce grade crossing collisions and fatalities. These are areas on which you may wish 
to focus as you evaluate current legislative proposals. 
1. Ensuring Compliance With Mandatory Reporting Requirements 

Railroads  are  charged  with  two  distinct  reporting  requirements  when  a  grade 
crossing  collision  occurs.  First,  an  immediate  call  to  the  National  Response  Center 
(NRC) 5 is  required  for  all  serious 6 grade  crossing  collisions.  (The  National  Trans-
portation Safety Board defines ‘‘immediate’’ as within 2 hours.) This call helps FRA 
determine  whether  a  Federal  investigation  is  needed  at  the  accident  scene.  Second, 
within  30  days  of  the  end  of  the  month  in  which  collisions  occurred,  the  railroad 
is  required  to  report  every  grade  crossing  collision  to  FRA—not  just  the  collisions 
that  are  deemed  ‘‘serious.’’  More  can  be  done  to  ensure  compliance  with  both  of 
these reporting requirements. 

Between  May  1,  2003  and  December  31,  2004,  railroads  failed  to  notify  NRC  im-
mediately in 115 of 543 reportable grade crossing collisions (21 percent) as required; 
most  of  these  involved  fatalities  or  multiple  injuries.  Although  these  unreported 
crossing  collisions,  which  resulted  in  a  total  of  116  deaths,  were  reported  to  FRA 
within 30 to 60 days after the collisions, that was too late to allow Federal authori-
ties  to  promptly  decide  whether  or  not  to  conduct  an  investigation.  In  March  2005, 
FRA officials began issuing violations to railroads that failed to follow FRA’s criteria 
for  reporting  grade  crossing  collisions  to  NRC.  This  enforcement  effort  needs  to  be 
sustained  to  ensure  that  railroads  properly  report  all  grade  crossing  collisions  in-
volving a fatality, serious injury, or substantial property damage. 

As  stated  in  the  report  we  issued  on  May  3,  2007,  12  railroads  failed  to  report 
139  collisions  to  FRA  as  required  within  30  days  after  the  end  of  the  month  in 
which  the  collision  occurred—with  some  being  reported  nearly  3  years  late.  These 
collisions, which occurred between 1999 and 2004, resulted in 2 fatalities and 20 in-
juries,  as  ultimately  reported  by  the  railroads.  While  these  numbers  may  not  seem 
large, it is unknown how many additional unreported collisions exist. Because FRA 
did not routinely review grade crossing collision records maintained by the railroads 
to ensure compliance with these requirements, it does not know whether the 15,416 
grade  crossing  collisions  reported  by  railroads  between  2001  and  2005  included  all 
collisions that occurred during those years. 

3 The  Department  of  Transportation  has  classified  about  3,500  materials  as  hazardous,  rang-

ing from mild irritants to those that are poisonous and radioactive. 

4 Trespassing  fatalities  was  the  leading  category  of  rail-related  fatalities  for  that  period  and 
accounted for 52 percent. Our 1999 report discusses the challenge of reducing trespassing fatali-
ties. 

5 Part  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  NRC  is  the  Federal  Government’s  24-hour 
point  of  contact  for  environmental  discharges.  In  addition,  through  agreements,  NRC  notifies 
FRA and other Federal agencies of train accidents and grade crossing collisions. 

6 FRA’s  criteria  for  immediately  reporting  grade  crossing  collisions  to  NRC—‘‘serious’’  colli-

sions—include those with one fatality or five injuries, as well as other criteria. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Accurate,  timely,  and  complete  reporting  of  grade  crossing  collisions  serves  the 
important  purpose  of  identifying  safety  problems  so  appropriate  corrective  actions 
can  be  taken.  Further,  by  ensuring  that  every  grade  crossing  collision  is  reported 
on  time,  FRA  and  states  will  have  access  to  critical  data  for  identifying  dangerous 
grade crossings and emerging accident trends. Complete information on grade cross-
ing  collisions  is  also  essential  for  state  transportation  officials  who  must  decide 
where  to  spend  Federal  funds  set  aside  annually  for  crossing  safety  improvements. 
Under  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  and  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A 
Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  for  Fiscal  Years  2005  through  2009,  states  can 
spend $220 million each year for grade crossing safety improvements, such as auto-
matic gates, flashing lights, and hazard elimination projects.7 

When  previously  unreported  grade  crossing  collisions  are  reported  to  FRA,  states 
have  better  information  to  use  in  making  decisions.  For  example,  after  written  re-
ports  for  five  unreported  grade  crossing  collisions  in  Iowa  were  submitted  to  FRA, 
the  Iowa  Department  of  Transportation  used  the  information  provided  by  the  rail-
roads  as  the  basis  for  allocating  funds  for  safety  improvements  at  two  grade  cross-
ings.  If  those  unreported  collisions  had  not  been  identified,  it  is  likely  that  safety 
improvements would not have been made to these two dangerous crossings. 

In  our  recent  report,  we  recommended  that  FRA  strengthen  safety  oversight  by 
ensuring  that  the  railroads  comply  with  mandatory  requirements  to  report  each 
grade crossing collision to FRA’s accident reporting system by: 

a.  Developing  and  implementing  an  action  plan  for  conducting  periodic  reviews 
of  the  grade  crossing  collision  records  maintained  by  each  railroad,  including 
promptly  notifying  the  responsible  railroads  when  unreported  collisions  are 
identified. 
b.  Testing  random  samples  of  the  railroads’  grade  crossing  collision  reports  to 
determine whether the information is accurate, timely, and complete, including 
comparing  such  reports  to  those  generated  by  local  law  enforcement  agencies. 
c.  Issuing  a  violation  and  assessing  a  civil  penalty  each  time  a  railroad  fails  to 
submit  a  grade  crossing  collision  report  in  accordance  with  Federal  require-
ments, on a consistent basis. Moreover, FRA should assess higher civil penalties 
against each railroad that repeatedly fails to report crossing collisions. 

In  response  to  our  report,  FRA  stated  that  it  had  begun  to  implement  an  action 
plan  for  conducting  cyclical  reviews  of  highway-rail  grade  crossing  accident  report-
ing by the major railroads. These reviews are intended to determine whether grade 
crossing  collisions  are  being  properly  reported.  FRA  also  agreed  to  make  obligatory 
the submission of violation reports for each detected violation that is a clear-cut fail-
ure  to  report.8 It  will  be  important  for  FRA  to  follow  through  on  its  commitments, 
as planned. You may want to consider directing FRA to report annually on its cycli-
cal  reviews,  including  the  number  of  reviews  planned,  the  number  completed,  and 
the overall results of the reviews. 
2. Increasing FRA’s Involvement in Grade Crossing Collision Investigations 
With  a  current  inspector  workforce  of  385,  FRA  has  limited  capability  to  inves-
tigate  approximately  3,000  grade  crossing  collisions  that  occur  each  year.  Instead, 
it  places  heavy  reliance  on  railroad  self-reporting.  As  we  recommended  in  our  No-
vember  2005  audit  report,  FRA  needs  to  broaden  its  review  of  such  reports  with 
independent  information.  FRA  uses  accident  reports  received  from  the  railroads  to 
evaluate the circumstances, probable causes, and responsible parties for most grade 
crossing  collisions.  A  variety  of  sources,  such  as  police  reports,  event  recorder  data, 
and  eyewitness  accounts,  could  be  used  to  provide  additional  insight.  This  should 
help  boost  public  confidence  in  that  accident  data  are  being  obtained  from  sources 
other than just the railroad(s) involved. 

FRA  increased  the  number  of  grade  crossing  collision  investigations  during  the 
last  2  years.  However,  FRA  still  investigates  less  than  1  percent  of  all  grade  cross-
ing collisions, a fact that highlights the need for independent verification of railroad- 
supplied  information.  The  need  for  this  increased  involvement  is  shown  by  the  fact 
that, on average, one person dies and three people are injured in the United States 
every day in grade crossing collisions. 

To better evaluate the causes of collisions and railroads’ compliance with Federal 
safety  regulations,  we  recommended  that  FRA  use  a  pilot  program  to  collect  and 

7 Hazard elimination projects include crossing closures and grade separations (separating rail-

road tracks from roadways). 

8 A  clear-cut  failure  to  report  is  defined  by  FRA  as  one  that  does  not  involve  any  question 
with regard to interpretation of the regulation or sufficiency of the facts constituting the alleged 
failure. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

analyze  independent  information  on  crossing  collisions  from  railroads  and  local  or 
state law enforcement agencies. FRA concurred with our 2005 recommendation and 
implemented  a  1-year  pilot  study  comprising  one  state  from  each  of  its  eight  re-
gions.  The  objective  of  this  study  was  to  assess  the  benefits  and  costs  of  analyzing 
information  from  independent  sources  on  crossing  collisions,  such  as  police  reports 
and  locomotive  event  recorder  data,  to  resolve  conflicts.  While  the  pilot  study  was 
scheduled  for  completion  last  month,  FRA  has  yet  to  issue  the  results.  FRA  should 
report  the  results  of  the  study  as  soon  as  possible  and  provide  a  copy  of  its  report 
to this Subcommittee. 
3.  Addressing  Sight  Obstructions  at  Grade  Crossings  Without  Automated 

Warning Devices 

Active  warning  devices—such  as  automatic  gates  and  flashing  lights—call  atten-
tion  to  approaching  trains  at  some  grade  crossings.  However,  76,000  public  grade 
crossings  are  equipped  only  with  passive  warnings,  such  as  crossbucks,  stop  signs, 
and  pavement  markings  that  advise  motorists  of  the  presence  of  the  crossing,  but 
don’t  warn  them  when  a  train  is  approaching.  For  these  passive  grade  crossings, 
greater attention is needed to ensure that motorists have a full view of approaching 
trains  so  that  they  can  determine  when  it  is  safe  to  cross.  Sight  obstructions  such 
as overgrown vegetation contribute to grade crossing collisions. As illustrated in Fig-
ure  1,  vegetation  growth  at  grade  crossings  can  significantly  reduce  a  motorist’s 
ability  to  see  the  track  and  approaching  trains.  From  2001  through  2005,  railroads 
submitted 689 collision reports to FRA that documented such obstructions—242 peo-
ple were injured in these collisions and 87 died. 
Figure 1. Photographs of Highway Users’ Line of Sight at a Grade Crossing 

Before and After Vegetation Was Cleared 

Currently,  FRA  regulations  only  require  the  railroads  to  address  vegetation 
growth  at  public  crossings  and  only  to  the  extent  that  the  vegetation  reduces  the 
visibility  of  road  signs  and  signals.  FRA  regulations  do  not  address  other  types  of 
sight obstructions, such as permanent structures, standing railroad equipment, and 
topography.  As  of  March  of  this  year,  only  13  states  had  laws  or  regulations  ad-
dressing  all  types  of  sight  obstructions.  These  laws  vary  widely,  with  mandated 
sight  distances  ranging  from  40  feet  along  the  railroad  property  line  to  as  much  as 
1,500 feet in both directions along the railroad right-of-way. 

For  the  37  states  that  lack  laws  or  regulations  for  addressing  sight  obstructions 
at  grade  crossings  that  are  not  protected  with  automated  warning  devices,  more 
needs  to  be  done.  Immediate  safety  benefits  could  be  achieved  if  laws  were  estab-
lished to address all types of sight obstructions, such as structures that block high-
way users’ views of approaching trains and overgrown vegetation. 

FRA agreed to play a constructive role as part of the larger intermodal and inter-
governmental  grade  crossing  team  in  response  to  our  recommendation  to  develop 
model legislation. Such legislation is needed for states to improve safety by address-
ing  sight  obstructions  at  grade  crossings  that  are  equipped  solely  with  signs,  pave-
ment  markings,  and  other  passive  warnings.  However,  in  responding  to  our  rec-
ommendation,  FRA  also  stated  that  it  ‘‘. . .  does  not  have  general  authority  or  re-
sponsibility  for  grade  crossing  safety.’’  The  Subcommittee  should  consider  whether 
it wishes to strengthen FRA’s role with respect to grade crossing safety. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
E
D
Y
H
2
2
5

4. Establishing Reporting Requirements for FRA’s National Grade Crossing 

Inventory System 

40 

The  accuracy  and  completeness  of  FRA’s  national  grade  crossing  inventory  data, 
particularly the identification of all public grade crossings and the types of warning 
devices in place, can be improved through the establishment of mandatory reporting 
requirements  for  railroads  and  states.  This  action  is  needed  to  better  monitor  and 
improve  high-risk  crossings.  In  our  June  2004  report  on  the  Highway-Rail  Grade 
Crossing Safety Program, we recommended that FRA establish mandatory reporting 
requirements  through  rulemaking  or  legislation  to  improve  the  accuracy  and  com-
pleteness of its national grade crossing inventory data. These data are used by state 
officials  to  develop  priority  lists  of  public  crossings  that  need  safety  improvements 
because they have a high probability of collisions. However, mandatory reporting re-
quirements  have  not  been  established.  Our  analysis  of  FRA’s  national  grade  cross-
ing  inventory  system  found  that  36  percent  of  public  grade  crossing  records  have 
not been updated since 2000. 

Mandatory  reporting  is  even  more  important  under  SAFETEA–LU,  which 
changed  the  apportionment  procedures.  SAFETEA–LU  requires  that  50  percent  of 
the  $220  million  authorized  be  apportioned  to  the  states  for  grade  crossing  safety 
improvements  based  on  a  ratio  of  the  number  of  public  grade  crossings  in  a  state 
to the number of public crossings nationwide. Our 2004 audit report stated that tar-
geting  safety  strategies  on  state  and  public  grade  crossings  that  continue  to  have 
the most collisions is key to further reducing collisions and fatalities. 

Voluntary reporting of grade crossing inventory information has not been success-
ful.  To  ensure  that  accurate  and  complete  inventory  data  are  available  for  use  in 
making decisions about grade crossing safety improvements, the Subcommittee may 
wish  to  consider  directing  FRA  and  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  to  estab-
lish and enforce mandatory reporting requirements for railroads and states. 
5.  Requiring  States  With  the  Most  Dangerous  Grade  Crossings  To  Develop 

Action Plans 

In  our  June  2004  report,  we  recommended  that  FRA  identify  states  having  the 
most  grade  crossing  accidents  year  after  year—particularly  at  crossings  that  have 
experienced multiple accidents—and develop, with these states, an action plan iden-
tifying  specific  solutions  for  improvement.  Attachment  2  to  our  testimony  today  is 
a map of the United States showing the number of collisions and fatalities at grade 
crossings, by state, in 2005. 

In  March  2006,  FRA  completed  the  first  plan  to  improve  dangerous  grade  cross-
ings  in  Louisiana.  The  railroads  operate  in  57  of  Louisiana’s  64  parishes  on  3,000 
rail  miles  and  motorists  drive  over  more  than  6,000  public  and  private  crossings. 
As part of Louisiana’s action plan, FRA’s grade crossing data were analyzed to iden-
tify public crossings with multiple collisions from 1999 through 2004. The resulting 
action  plan  focused  chiefly  on  crossings  located  near  the  intersection  of  two  road-
ways.  This  focus  was  supported  by  data  showing  that  97  percent  of  the  collisions 
at  multi-collision  crossings  occurred  near  highway  intersections.  For  130  of  the  177 
crossings  with  multiple  collisions,  Louisiana  transportation  officials  took  actions  to 
ensure that flashing lights, gates, or crossing closures were installed. 

FRA’s  efforts  in  Louisiana  and  its  similar  ongoing  work  with  Texas  are  steps  in 
the right direction. Continued action is warranted to identify and address the most 
dangerous grade crossings in the states with the most grade crossing collisions. Con-
gress  may  want  to  consider  requiring  FRA  to  increase  this  level  of  effort  by  con-
ducting  similar  projects  in  other  states  with  high  numbers  of  grade  crossing  colli-
sions. 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  re-
spond  to  any  questions  that  you  or  other  members  of  the  Subcommittee  may  have 
at this time. 
Attachment  1.  Office  of  Inspector  General  Grade  Crossing  Safety  Work 

Products 

1.  OIG  Testimony,  CC–2007–052,  ‘‘Opportunities  to  Further  Improve  Railroad 

Program,’’ January 30, 2007. 

4.  OIG  Report  No.  MH–2006–016,  ‘‘Audit  of  Oversight  of  Highway-Rail  Grade 
Crossing Accident Reporting, Investigations, and Safety Regulations,’’ November 28, 
2005. 

Safety,’’ May 8, 2007. 

2. OIG Report No. MH–2007–044, ‘‘The Federal Railroad Administration Can Im-
prove  Highway-Rail  Grade  Crossing  Safety  By  Ensuring  Compliance  With  Accident 
Reporting Requirements and Addressing Sight Obstructions,’’ May 3, 2007. 

3. OIG Testimony, CC–2007–018, ‘‘Reauthorization of the Federal Railroad Safety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

5.  OIG  Testimony,  CC–2005–060,  ‘‘Highway-Railroad  Grade  Crossing  Safety 

Issues,’’ July 21, 2005. 

6.  OIG  Memorandum  ‘‘Safety-Related  Findings  and  Recommendations,’’  February 

16, 2005. 

gram,’’ June 16, 2004. 

tember 30, 1999. 

7.  OIG  Report  No.  MH–2004–065,  ‘‘Highway-Rail  Grade  Crossing  Safety  Pro-

8.  OIG  Report  No.  RT–1999–140,  ‘‘Rail-Highway  Grade  Crossing  Safety,’’  Sep-

OIG  reports  and  testimony  statements  can  be  accessed  on  the  OIG  website  at 

www.oig.dot.gov. 
Attachment 2. U.S. Map of the Number of Reported Collisions and Fatalities 

at Grade Crossings, by State, in 2005 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much.  Ms.  Siggerud,  we 

welcome you. 

STATEMENT OF KATHERINE SIGGERUD, DIRECTOR, 

PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE ISSUES, 

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Ms.  SIGGERUD.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith 
and  Senator  Klobuchar,  thank  you  for  inviting  GAO  to  participate 
in this hearing today on rail safety reauthorization. 

In  recent  years  a  number  of  serious  accidents  raised  concern 
about  the  levels  of  safety  in  the  railroad  industry.  In  contrast  to 
previous  decades,  during  the  past  10  years  we  have  not  seen  sus-
tained progress on the rate of train accidents. While we found that 
FRA  has  recently  undertaken  or  planned  several  actions  that  look 
promising  I  would  emphasize  that  it  continues  to  be  important  to 
make progress on railroad safety trends. 

My  statement  today  is  based  on  a  report  we  issued  in  January 
that provides an overview of FRA safety programs. Our report cov-
ered three topics. First, how FRA focuses its efforts on the highest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
E
D
Y
H
2
2
5

42 

priority  risks  in  planning  its  safety  oversight.  Second,  how  FRA 
identifies  safety  problems  on  railroad  systems  when  carrying  out 
oversight. And finally, how the FRA assesses the impact of its over-
sight efforts on safety. 

With regard to focusing in on the highest priority risks, FRA has 
undertaken or planned initiatives that are aimed at addressing the 
main  causes  of  accidents.  The  agency’s  overall  strategy  for  tar-
geting  its  oversight  is  the  National  Oversight  Action  Plan  which 
FRA  issued  in  2005.  In  our  review  this  plan  includes  elements  of 
a reasonable framework for guiding the agency’s efforts. 

In 2006, 71 percent of all train accidents were attributable to ei-
ther human factors or track defects and FRA has initiatives to ad-
dress  both  of  these  causes.  These  include  new  regulations  on 
human  factor  errors,  such  as  improperly  positioned  switches  and 
new  fatigue  models  which  can  be  used  on  railroads.  But  FRA  can-
not  regulate  hours-of-service  and  it  must  rely  on  voluntary  actions 
by  railroads  to  address  fatigue.  For  track,  FRA  acquired  two  addi-
tional  track  inspection  vehicles  that  can  precisely  measure  track 
and also develop new regulations. 

However  most  of  these  initiatives  have  not  yet  been  fully  imple-
mented. And their impact on safety will not be apparent for a num-
ber  of  years.  Furthermore  several  of  these  efforts  depend  on  vol-
untary actions by railroads. 

In  addition  FRA  has  also  initiated  a  new  approach  for  planning 
inspections  that  uses  trend  analyses  of  accidents,  inspection  and 
other data in order to focus inspectors’ efforts on locations that are 
likely to have safety problems. This approach allows FRA to better 
target the greatest safety risks, and make more effective use of its 
inspectors.  However,  it  is  not  yet  clear  whether  the  new  approach 
will  lead  to  prioritization  of  inspections  across  the  Nation  or  ulti-
mately to improve safety. 

Turning  now  to  safety  oversight,  FRA  identifies  safety  problems 
on railroads systems mainly through routine inspections that deter-
mine  whether  operating  practices,  track  and  equipment  meet  min-
imum safety standards. Because FRA is a small agency in relation 
to the railroad industry, FRA’s inspections can cover only about 0.2 
percent  of  railroads’  operations  in  a  year.  These  inspections  do 
identify  violations  and  result  in  railroads  paying  fines  and  taking 
corrective actions. 

However the inspections are not designed to determine how well 
railroads  are  managing  the  types  of  safety  risks  throughout  their 
systems  that  could  lead  to  accidents.  Other  organizations  such  as 
the  American  Public  Transportation  Association,  PHMSA  within 
DOT and Transport Canada have implemented approaches to over-
see  the  management  of  safety  risks  by  U.S.  commuter  railroads, 
U.S. pipelines and Canadian railroads, respectively. Such risk man-
agement programs require the industry to improve safety—system-
wide  safety—by 
identifying  and  assessing  safety  risks  and 
prioritizing  them  so  that  their  resources  may  be  allocated  to  ad-
dress  the  highest  risks  first.  These  oversight  approaches  com-
plement rather than replace traditional compliance inspections and 
therefore provide additional assurance of safety. 

With  regard  to  how  FRA  assesses  the  impact  of  its  oversight  ef-
forts on safety, the agency uses a range of goals and measures. For 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

example, it has developed goals to: (1) target its enforcement efforts 
at  reducing  various  type  of  railroad  accidents,  and  (2)  measures  to 
track  its  progress.  However,  FRA  lacks  measures  of  the  direct  re-
sults  of  its  inspection  and  enforcement  programs,  such  as  the  ex-
tent  to  which  they  have  resulted  in  the  correction  of  safety  prob-
lems. 

Under  FRA’s  current  focused  enforcement  policy,  developed  in 
the  mid-1990s,  inspectors  cite  a  small  percentage  of  identified  de-
fects,  about  3  percent  in  2005,  as  violations  that  they  recommend 
for  enforcement  action,  generally  through  civil  penalties.  This  pol-
icy relies on cooperation with railroads to achieve compliance. It is 
intended to focus FRA’s efforts on those instances of noncompliance 
that pose the greatest hazard. 

However,  it  is  not  clear  whether  the  number  of  civil  penalties 
issued or their amounts are having the desired effect on improving 
compliance.  Because  it  has  not  evaluated  its  enforcement  program 
efforts, FRA is missing an important opportunity to obtain valuable 
information  about  its  performance  and  on  any  need  to  adjust  this 
policy. 

In  the  report  we  issued  in  January,  we  recommended  that  FRA 
first develop and implement measures of the direct result of its in-
spection  and  enforcement  programs;  and,  second,  evaluate  its  en-
forcement  program.  In  response,  DOT  agreed  with  the  first  rec-
ommendation  and  noted  that  FRA  would  need  to  develop  appro-
priate  data  and  therefore  would  implement  the  new  measures  no 
earlier than the end of 2008. DOT stated that it does not have the 
resources  to  conduct  the  evaluation  we  recommended  and  said  it 
would  consider  requesting  resources  for  Fiscal  Year  2009  for  that 
purpose. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  completes  my  statement.  I’m  happy  to  an-

swer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Siggerud follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KATHERINE SIGGERUD, DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL 
INFRASTRUCTURE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  this  hearing  today  to  discuss  the 
Federal  Railroad  Administration’s  (FRA’s)  rail  safety  oversight  activities.  Although 
the  overall  safety  record  in  the  railroad  industry,  as  measured  by  the  number  of 
train accidents per million miles traveled, has improved markedly since 1980, there 
has been little sustained improvement over the past decade. (See fig. 1.) Serious ac-
cidents resulting in injuries, deaths, and property damage continue to occur. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

My  remarks  center  on  work  we  have  recently  completed  on  FRA’s  overall  safety 
oversight strategy. Specifically, we examined how FRA (1) focuses its efforts on the 
highest  priority  risks  related  to  train  accidents  in  planning  its  safety  oversight,  (2) 
identifies  safety  problems  on  railroad  systems  in  carrying  out  its  oversight,  and  (3) 
assesses  the  impact  of  its  oversight  efforts  on  safety.  Our  findings  are  discussed  in 
more detail in our report, which was released in January.1 

Our  work  was  based  on  a  review  of  laws,  regulations,  and  FRA  plans  and  guid-
ance  as  well  as  discussions  with  FRA  officials  and  with  a  range  of  external  stake-
holders,  including  railroads,  unions,  and  state  railroad  safety  organizations.  We  re-
viewed FRA inspection and enforcement data for 1996 through 2005, the latest year 
for  which  complete  data  were  available  at  the  time  of  our  review.2 In  addition,  we 
examined  risk  management  principles  and  safety  oversight  approaches  used  by 
other modal administrations within the Department of Transportation and other or-
ganizations  that  have  similar  safety  missions  in  order  to  determine  their  possible 
application  to  FRA.  Our  work  focused  on  FRA  oversight  efforts  to  reduce  the  rate 
of train accidents rather than those to reduce highway-rail crossing and trespassing 
accidents  because  (1)  the  Department  of  Transportation’s  Inspector  General  has  re-
cently  assessed  efforts  to  reduce  highway-rail  crossing  accidents 3 and  (2)  tres-
passing  accidents  primarily  involve  issues  not  related  to  railroad  safety  perform-
ance.  As  part  of  our  review,  we  assessed  internal  controls  and  the  reliability  of  the 
data  elements  needed  for  this  engagement  and  determined  that  the  data  elements 
were  sufficiently  reliable  for  our  purposes.  We  conducted  our  work  from  November 
2005  through  January  2007  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted  government  au-
diting standards. 

In summary: 
• In  planning  its  safety  oversight,  FRA  is  focusing  its  efforts  on  the  highest  pri-
ority  risks  related  to  train  accidents  through  various  initiatives  aimed  at  ad-
dressing  the  main  causes  of  these  accidents  as  well  as  through  improvements 
in  its  inspection  planning  approach.  The  agency’s  overall  strategy  for  targeting 
its oversight at the greatest risks is the National Rail Safety Action Plan, which 
FRA  issued  in  May  2005.  This  plan  provides  a  reasonable  framework  for  guid-
ing  the  agency’s  efforts  to  improve  its  oversight.  It  includes  initiatives  to  ad-
dress  the  two  main  causes  of  train  accidents—human  factors  and  defective 
track—and FRA has pursued some additional initiatives to address these causes 
since  issuing  the  plan.4 These  initiatives—which  include  new  regulations,  re-
search on new technologies and approaches for improving safety, and new vehi-
cles  for  inspecting  track—are  promising.  However,  most  of  them  have  not  yet 
been fully implemented, and their overall impact on safety will probably not be 
apparent  for  a  number  of  years.  Furthermore,  the  ability  of  many  of  these  ef-
forts  to  improve  safety  will  depend  on  voluntary  actions  by  railroads.  In  addi-
tion,  the  Action  Plan  announced  a  new  approach  for  planning  inspections  that 
uses  data-driven  models  to  focus  inspectors’  efforts  on  locations  that  are  likely 
to have safety problems. 
• In  carrying  out  its  safety  oversight,  FRA  identifies  safety  problems  on  railroad 
systems  mainly  through  routine  inspections  that  determine  whether  operating 
practices, track, and equipment, such as signals and locomotives, are in compli-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
1
O
A
G
2
2
5

45 

ance  with  minimum  safety  standards.  However,  FRA  inspections  cover  only 
about 0.2 percent of railroads’ operations each year. Also, these inspections are 
not  designed  to  determine  how  well  railroads  are  managing  safety  risks 
throughout  their  systems  that  could  lead  to  accidents.  The  American  Public 
Transportation Association (APTA), the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safe-
ty  Administration  (PHMSA),  and  Transport  Canada  have  implemented  ap-
proaches to oversee the management of safety risks by U.S. commuter railroads, 
U.S.  pipelines,  and  Canadian  railroads,  respectively.5 These  oversight  ap-
proaches  complement,  rather  than  replace,  traditional  compliance  inspections 
and, therefore, provide additional assurance of safety. 
• FRA uses a broad range of goals and measures to assess the impact of its over-
sight efforts on safety. For example, it has developed new goals to target its in-
spection and enforcement efforts at reducing various types of railroad accidents 
and related measures to track its progress. However, FRA lacks measures of the 
direct  results  of  its  inspection  and  enforcement  programs,  such  as  measures  of 
the extent to which these programs have resulted in the correction of identified 
safety  problems.  Furthermore,  FRA  has  not  evaluated  the  effectiveness  of  its 
enforcement  program  in  achieving  desired  results.  Both  performance  measures 
and evaluations can provide valuable information on program results that helps 
hold  agencies  accountable  for  the  performance  of  their  programs.  In  our  recent 
report,  we  recommended  that  FRA  develop  and  implement  measures  of  the  di-
rect results of its inspection and enforcement programs and evaluate its enforce-
ment program. FRA agreed to develop such measures and will consider request-
ing the additional resources necessary to evaluate its enforcement program. 

Background 

On average, 437 people have been injured and 12 people have been killed in train 
accidents each year over the past decade, from 1997 through 2006, exclusive of high-
way-railroad grade crossing and trespassing accidents. In recent years, a number of 
serious  accidents  raised  concerns  about  the  level  of  safety  in  the  railroad  industry. 
For  example,  as  you  are  aware,  in  2005,  a  train  collision  in  Graniteville,  South 
Carolina, resulted in the evacuation of 5,400 people, 292 injuries, and 9 deaths. 

FRA  develops  and  enforces  regulations  for  the  railroad  industry  that  include  nu-
merous requirements related to safety, including requirements governing track, sig-
nal  and  train  control  systems,  grade  crossing  warning  device  systems,  mechanical 
equipment—such  as  locomotives  and  tank  cars—and  railroad  operating  practices. 
FRA also enforces hazardous materials regulations issued by PHMSA as they relate 
to the safe transportation of such materials by rail. FRA’s inspectors generally spe-
cialize  in  one  of  five  areas,  called  inspection  disciplines:  (1)  operating  practices,  (2) 
track,  (3)  hazardous  materials,  (4)  signal  and  train  control,  and  (5)  motive  power 
and  equipment.  FRA’s  policy  is  for  inspectors  to  encourage  railroads  to  comply  vol-
untarily.  When  railroads  do  not  comply  voluntarily  or  identified  problems  are  seri-
ous,  FRA  may  cite  violations  and  take  enforcement  actions,  most  frequently  civil 
penalties,  to  promote  compliance  with  its  regulations.  FRA  is  authorized  to  nego-
tiate civil penalties with railroads and exercises this authority. FRA conducts addi-
tional  oversight  of  Class  I  railroads  through  the  Railroad  System  Oversight  pro-
gram.6 Under  this  program,  the  agency  assigns  an  FRA  manager  for  each  Class  I 
railroad to cooperate with it on identifying and resolving safety issues. 

FRA  is  a  small  agency,  especially  in  relation  to  the  industry  it  regulates.  As  of 
July  2006,  FRA  had  about  660  safety  staff,  including  about  400  inspectors  in  the 
field (in its regional, district, and local offices). In addition, 30 state oversight agen-
cies,  with  about  160  inspectors,  participate  in  a  partnership  program  with  FRA  to 
conduct safety oversight activities at railroads’ operating sites. In contrast, the rail-
road  industry  consists  of  about  700  railroads  with  about  235,000  employees,7 
219,000 miles of track in operation, 158,000 signals and switches, and over 1.6 mil-
lion locomotives and cars. 
FRA  Has  Made  Progress  in  Targeting  Its  Oversight  Efforts  on  the  Basis  of 

Risk 

In  planning  its  safety  oversight,  FRA  focuses  its  efforts  on  the  highest  priority 
risks  related  to  train  accidents  through  a  number  of  initiatives.  FRA’s  May  2005 
National  Rail  Safety  Action  Plan  provides  a  reasonable  framework  for  the  agency’s 
efforts  to  target  its  oversight  at  the  highest  priority  risks.  The  plan  outlines  initia-
tives  aimed  at  reducing  the  main  types  of  train  accidents,  those  caused  by  human 
factors and track defects. Since issuing the plan, the agency has pursued additional 
initiatives to target risks posed by these causes. However, these efforts are in vary-
ing  stages  of  development  or  implementation  and,  while  some  individual  initiatives 
may  start  showing  results  in  the  next  year  or  two,  their  overall  impact  on  safety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

will probably not be apparent for a number of years. FRA has also developed a new 
approach  for  planning  its  inspections,  based  on  greater  use  of  its  accident  and  in-
spection  data.  While  these  initiatives  are  promising,  it  is  too  early  to  assess  their 
impact. 
FRA Is Making a Number of Efforts To Reduce Accidents Caused by Human Factors 

and Track Defects, but Results Are Not Yet Clear 

In  2006,  71  percent  of  all  train  accidents  in  the  United  States  were  attributable 
to either human factors or track defects. Human factor accidents result from unsafe 
acts of individuals, such as employee errors, and can occur for a number of reasons, 
such  as  employee  fatigue  or  inadequate  supervision  or  training.  Recent  FRA  initia-
tives to reduce accidents caused by human factors include: 

• proposed  regulations  aimed  at  reducing  the  most  common  causes  of  these  acci-

dents, such as improper positioning of track switches; 8 

• a  5-year  pilot  project  to  establish  a  confidential  voluntary  system  for  reporting 

and learning from close call incidents; 9 

• a  study  to  develop  a  fatigue  model  that  could  be  used  by  railroads  to  improve 

train crew scheduling practices and prevent worker fatigue; 10 and; 

• a  proposed  pilot  project  to  establish  voluntary  risk  reduction  programs  at  par-
ticipating  railroad  worksites  to  help  reduce  human  factor  accidents,  as  well  as 
other types of accidents.11 

Track  defects,  which  can  cause  derailments,  include  rails  that  are  uneven  or  too 
wide apart or rails or joint bars that are cracked or broken. Key recent FRA initia-
tives to reduce accidents caused by track defects include: 

• two additional track inspection vehicles that can precisely measure track during 

inspections 12 and; 

• new  regulations  on  inspections  of  rail  joints  in  continuous  welded  rail  track.13 
These initiatives are in varying stages of development or implementation and use 
a variety of approaches, some quite innovative, for addressing the causes of human 
factor and track accidents. While they have the potential to eventually reduce these 
types of accidents, it is too early to predict their outcomes. The human factor initia-
tives, except for the proposed regulations, depend on voluntary actions by railroads, 
and, in some cases, labor as well, for their success. 
FRA Has Made Progress in Targeting Its Inspections on the Basis of Risk 

FRA  has  developed  a  new  approach—the  National  Inspection  Plan—for  using 
available  data  to  target  its  inspections  at  the  greatest  safety  risks.  The  plan  pro-
vides  guidance  to  each  regional  office  on  how  its  inspectors  within  each  of  the  five 
inspection disciplines should divide up their work by railroad and state. It is based 
on  trend  analyses  of  accident,  inspection,  and  other  data  that  predict  locations 
where  train  accidents  and  incidents  are  likely  to  occur  within  each  region  and  pro-
vide the optimal allocation of inspection resources to prevent accidents. 

Previously,  FRA  had  a  less  structured,  less  consistent,  and  less  data-driven  ap-
proach  for  planning  inspections.  According  to  agency  officials,  each  region  prepared 
its  own  inspection  plan,  based  on  judgments  about  appropriate  priorities  and  anal-
ysis  of  available  data.  However,  the  use  of  data  was  not  consistent  from  region  to 
region. Inspectors had greater discretion about where to inspect and based decisions 
about priorities on their knowledge of their inspection territories. 

FRA’s  new  approach  for  planning  its  inspection  activity  allows  it  to  better  target 
the  greatest  safety  risks  and  make  more  effective  use  of  its  inspectors.  However,  it 
is not yet clear whether the new approach will lead to a prioritization of inspection 
levels across regions and inspection disciplines or improved safety. 
FRA  Relies  Primarily  on  Direct  Inspections  To  Identify  Safety  Problems 

and Does Not Oversee Railroads’ Management of Safety Risks 

In  carrying  out  its  safety  oversight,  FRA  identifies  a  range  of  safety  problems  on 
railroad  systems  mainly  through  routine  inspections  to  determine  whether  oper-
ations, track, and equipment are in compliance with safety standards. FRA’s inspec-
tions  do  not  attempt  to  determine  how  well  railroads  are  managing  safety  risks 
throughout  their  systems.  APTA,  PHMSA,  and  Transport  Canada  have  imple-
mented  approaches  to  oversee  the  management  of  safety  risks  by  U.S.  commuter 
railroads,  U.S.  pipelines,  and  Canadian  railroads,  respectively.  These  oversight  ap-
proaches  complement,  rather  than  replace,  traditional  compliance  inspections  and 
therefore provide additional assurance of safety. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

FRA’s Oversight Identifies a Range of Problems on Railroad Systems 

FRA primarily monitors railroads’ compliance through routine inspections by indi-
vidual  inspectors  at  specific  sites  on  railroads’  systems.  Inspectors  typically  cover  a 
range  of  standards  within  their  discipline  during  these  inspections.  This  inspection 
approach  focuses  on  direct  observations  of  specific  components  of  the  train,  related 
equipment,  and  railroad  property—including  the  track  and  signal  systems—as  well 
as  operating  practices  to  determine  whether  they  meet  FRA’s  standards.  (See  fig. 
2.) Inspectors also examine railroads’ inspection and maintenance records. The rail-
roads  have  their  own  inspectors  who  are  responsible  for  ensuring  that  railroad 
equipment, track, and operations meet Federal rail safety standards. 

FRA  also  conducts  more  in-depth  inspection  efforts  that  generally  focus  on  rail-
roads’ compliance in a particular area, such as their inspections of employees’ adher-
ence  to  operating  rules.  These  efforts  often  involve  a  team  conducting  separate  in-
spections  at  multiple  sites,  generally  within  one  of  FRA’s  eight  regions.  FRA  also 
periodically  conducts  in-depth  inspections  of  some  systemwide  programs  that  rail-
roads  are  required  to  implement,  such  as  employee  drug  and  alcohol  testing  pro-
grams. 

In 2005, Federal and state inspectors conducted about 63,000 inspections. Accord-
ing  to  FRA,  routine  inspections  constituted  about  75  percent  of  the  inspections  of 
railroads,  and  in-depth  inspections  accounted  for  about  11  percent.  The  remainder 
of these inspections (14 percent) consisted of other types of activities, such as inves-
tigations  of  accidents  and  complaints.  This  approach  to  oversight  enables  FRA  in-
spectors and managers to identify a wide range of safety problems. Inspectors iden-
tify specific compliance problems—conditions that do not meet FRA’s standards—at 
sites  they  visit,  by  citing  defects.  Inspectors  cite  violations  of  safety  standards  for 
those defects that they believe warrant enforcement action. They consider a number 
of  factors  in  making  this  decision,  including  the  railroad’s  history  of  compliance  at 
that location and the seriousness of the noncompliance (such as whether it is likely 
to  cause  accidents,  injuries,  or  releases  of  hazardous  materials).  Inspectors  in  some 
disciplines cite more defects and violations than others. (See fig. 3.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
2
O
A
G
2
2
5

48 

The  motive  power  and  equipment  discipline  cites  almost  half  of  all  defects  and 
over a third of all violations. FRA officials told us that the standards in this inspec-
tion  discipline  are  the  most  prescriptive,  making  defects  and  violations  easier  to 
find.  However,  these  types  of  defects  cause  a  much  smaller  proportion  of  accidents 
than human factors and track defects.14 The most frequently cited violations include 
those  for  noncompliance  with  standards  for  locomotives  and  freight  cars,  track  con-
ditions, recordkeeping on the inspection and repair of equipment and track, and the 
condition of hazardous materials tank cars. 
Several Other Organizations Have Implemented Comprehensive Approaches for Over-

seeing the Management of Safety Risks in Transportation Industries 

FRA  officials  have  noted  that  their  approach  of  directly  inspecting  safety  condi-
tions and targeting locations that are most likely to have compliance problems pro-
vides  a  safety  net  and  holds  railroad  management  accountable.  However,  because 
the number of FRA and state inspectors is small relative to the size of railroad oper-
ations, FRA inspections can cover only a very small proportion of railroad operations 
(0.2 percent). Also, FRA targets inspections at locations on railroads’ systems where 
accidents  have  occurred,  among  other  factors,  rather  than  overseeing  whether  rail-
roads  systematically  identify  and  address  safety  risks  that  could  lead  to  accidents. 
Risk management can help to improve systemwide safety by systematically identi-
fying  and  assessing  risks  associated  with  various  safety  hazards  and  prioritizing 
them  so  that  resources  may  be  allocated  to  address  the  highest  risks  first.  It  also 
can  help  in  ensuring  that  the  most  appropriate  alternatives  to  prevent  or  mitigate 
the effects of hazards are designed and implemented. A framework for risk manage-
ment based on industry best practices and other criteria that we have developed di-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
3
O
A
G
2
2
5

49 

vides risk management into five major phases: (1) setting strategic goals and objec-
tives,  and  determining  constraints;  (2)  assessing  risks;  (3)  evaluating  alternatives 
for  addressing  these  risks;  (4)  selecting  the  appropriate  alternatives;  and  (5)  imple-
menting  the  alternatives  and  monitoring  the  progress  made  and  results  achieved. 
Other transportation oversight organizations have developed and implemented ap-
proaches  for  overseeing  industries’  overall  management  of  safety  risks.  In  par-
ticular, during the last 10 years, APTA, PHMSA, and Transport Canada have devel-
oped and implemented such oversight approaches for U.S. commuter railroads, U.S. 
pipelines, and Canadian railroads, respectively. These approaches complement, rath-
er  than  replace,  traditional  compliance  inspections.  APTA  provides  guidelines  to 
commuter  railroads  on  managing  the  safety  of  their  systems—including  safety 
risks—and  audits  their  plans  for  and  implementation  of  this  management  ap-
proach.15 PHMSA  requires  that  pipeline  operators  develop  ‘‘integrity  management’’ 
programs  to  manage  risk  in  areas—such  as  those  that  are  densely  populated— 
where  leaks  or  ruptures  could  have  the  greatest  impact  on  public  safety  and  in-
spects operators’ compliance with these requirements.16 In Canada, the department 
responsible for overseeing railroad safety, Transport Canada, requires that railroads 
establish  safety  management  systems  that  include  risk  management  and  assesses 
these systems.17 APTA, PHMSA, and Transport Canada have emphasized that risk 
management provides a higher standard of performance than traditional safety reg-
ulation based on compliance alone. 

We  have  reviewed  PHMSA’s  gas  transmission  pipeline  integrity  management 
oversight  approach  and  have  recently  concluded  that  it  enhances  public  safety.18 
Operators  told  us  that  the  primary  benefit  of  the  program  is  the  comprehensive 
knowledge they acquire about the condition of their pipelines. APTA and Transport 
Canada officials have told us that their oversight approaches have not been formally 
evaluated to determine their effectiveness. 

FRA has taken some steps in a limited number of areas to oversee and encourage 
risk management in the railroad industry. For example, the agency has several reg-
ulations  in  place  that  require  railroads  to  use  a  risk-based  approach  for  managing 
safety  in  some  specific  areas,  such  as  the  operation  of  high-speed  passenger  trains. 
In addition, as noted earlier, FRA has proposed establishing pilot risk reduction pro-
grams  at  participating  worksites.  Agency  officials  have  told  us  that  this  pilot  effort 
will  allow  the  agency  to  examine  how  a  risk  management  approach  could  be  used 
voluntarily in the railroad industry to reduce human factor and other types of acci-
dents. 

Oversight  of  railroads’  overall  approach  for  managing  safety  risks  on  their  sys-
tems,  in  addition  to  FRA’s  existing  discipline-specific,  compliance-based  oversight, 
has the potential to provide additional assurance of safety. However, developing and 
implementing such a new oversight approach would be a major undertaking for the 
agency, and FRA’s current initiatives to reduce train accidents need time to mature 
to demonstrate their effects. As a result, we did not recommend in our recent report 
that  FRA  adopt  an  approach  for  overseeing  railroads’  management  of  safety  risks. 
FRA Measures Its Progress in Achieving a Variety of Safety Goals, but Has 

Limited Information on the Direct Results of Its Oversight 

FRA  has  a  broad  range  of  goals  and  measures  that  it  uses  to  provide  direction 
to  and  track  the  performance  of  its  safety  oversight  activities.  However,  its  ability 
to  make  informed  decisions  about  its  inspection  and  enforcement  programs  is  lim-
ited  because  it  lacks  measures  of  the  intermediate  outcomes,  or  direct  results,  of 
these  programs  that  would  show  how  they  are  contributing  toward  the  end  out-
comes, or ultimate safety improvements, that the agency seeks to achieve. Further-
more,  FRA  has  not  evaluated  the  effectiveness  of  its  enforcement  approach.  Both 
performance  measures  and  evaluations  can  provide  valuable  information  on  pro-
gram  results  that  helps  hold  agencies  accountable  for  their  programs’  performance. 
FRA  Has  Established  a  Range  of  Safety  Goals  and  Measures,  But  Information  on 

Direct Results Is Limited 

To its credit, FRA has adopted a range of useful safety performance goals and re-
lated  measures.  These  goals  help  the  agency  target  its  oversight  efforts  to  achieve 
the department’s goals of reducing (1) the rate of rail-related accidents and incidents 
and  (2)  the  number  of  serious  hazardous  materials  releases.  For  example,  FRA  has 
recently  established  new  agencywide  safety  goals  that  are  aligned  with  its  five  in-
spection disciplines and its grade-crossing efforts. These include goals to reduce the 
rates  of  various  types  of  train  accidents—including  those  caused  by  human  factors, 
track  defects,  and  equipment  failure—as  well  as  hazardous  materials  releases  and 
grade-crossing  incidents.  These  departmental  and  agency  goals  represent  the  key 
end  outcomes,  or  ultimate  results,  FRA  seeks  to  achieve  through  its  oversight  ef-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

forts.  FRA  has  also  established  related  measures  that  help  the  agency  determine 
and demonstrate its progress in meeting the desired goals. In addition, it has estab-
lished  similar  goals  and  measures  for  each  of  its  eight  regional  offices.  FRA  also 
uses various other measures to manage its oversight efforts, such as numbers of in-
spections performed and enforcement actions taken. 

While  FRA  has  developed  a  range  of  goals  and  measures  related  to  its  oversight 
of  railroad  safety,  it  lacks  measures  of  the  desired  intermediate  outcomes,  or  direct 
results,  of  its  inspection  and  enforcement  efforts—the  correction  of  identified  safety 
problems  and  improvements  in  compliance.  (See  fig.  4.)  According  to  FRA  officials, 
inspectors review reports on corrective actions provided by railroads and always fol-
low  up  on  serious  identified  problems  to  ensure  that  they  are  corrected.  However, 
the agency does not measure the extent to which the identified safety problems have 
been  corrected.  FRA  also  lacks  overall  measures  of  railroads’  compliance.  Officials 
have  emphasized  that  the  agency  relies  on  inspectors’  day-to-day  oversight  of  and 
interaction with railroads to track compliance.19 

Without measures of intermediate outcomes, the extent to which FRA’s inspection 
and  enforcement  programs  are  achieving  direct  results  and  contributing  to  desired 
end  outcomes  is  not  clear.  We  recognize  that  developing  such  measures  would  be 
difficult and that it is challenging for regulatory agencies to develop such measures. 
Nevertheless,  some  other  regulatory  agencies  in  the  Department  of  Transportation 
have done so. For example, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration meas-
ures the percentage of truck companies that improve their performance in a follow- 
up inspection. 
FRA  Has  Made  Changes  in  Response  to  Evaluations  but  Has  Not  Evaluated  Its 

Enforcement Approach 

By  examining  a  broader  range  of  information  than  is  feasible  to  monitor  on  an 
ongoing  basis  through  performance  measures,  evaluation  studies  can  explore  the 
benefits  of  a  program  as  well  as  ways  to  improve  program  performance.  They  can 
also be used to develop or improve agencies’ measures of program performance and 
help  ensure  agencies’  accountability  for  program  results.  Although  FRA  has  modi-
fied several aspects of its safety oversight in response to external and internal eval-
uations,  it  has  not  evaluated  the  extent  to  which  its  enforcement  is  achieving  de-
sired results. 

Under FRA’s current ‘‘focused enforcement’’ policy, developed in the mid-1990s, in-
spectors  cite  a  small  percentage  of  identified  defects  (about  3  percent  in  2005)  as 
violations  that  they  recommend  for  enforcement  action,  generally  civil  penalties. 
While  this  policy  relies  to  a  great  extent  on  cooperation  with  railroads  to  achieve 
compliance  and  is  intended  to  focus  FRA’s  enforcement  efforts  on  those  instances 
of  noncompliance  that  pose  the  greatest  safety  hazards,  it  is  not  clear  whether  the 
number  of  civil  penalties  issued,  or  their  amounts,  are  having  the  desired  effect  of 
improving  compliance.  Without  an  evaluation  of  its  enforcement  program,  FRA  is 
missing  an  opportunity  to  obtain  valuable  information  on  the  performance  of  this 
program and on any need for adjustments to improve this performance. 

In  the  report  we  issued  in  January,  we  recommended  that  FRA  (1)  develop  and 
implement  measures  of  the  direct  results  of  its  inspection  and  enforcement  pro-
grams  and  (2)  evaluate  the  agency’s  enforcement  program  to  provide  further  infor-
mation  on  its  results,  the  need  for  additional  data  to  measure  and  assess  these  re-
sults, and the need for any changes in this program to improve performance. In its 
response,  the  department  concurred  with  the  first  recommendation  but  said  that, 
because  FRA  needs  to  develop  appropriate  data,  the  agency  would  not  be  able  to 
implement  new  measures  before  the  end  of  2008.  The  department  stated  that  FRA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
4
O
A
G
2
2
5

51 

lacks  the  resources  to  carry  out  our  second  recommendation  but  will  consider  re-
questing such resources for Fiscal Year 2009. As part of our normal recommendation 
follow-up activity, we will work toward FRA’s adoption of our recommendations. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  re-
spond to any questions that you or other Members of the Subcommittee might have. 
Endnotes 

1 See GAO, The Federal Railroad Administration Is Taking Steps to Better Target 
Its  Oversight,  but  Assessment  of  Results  Is  Needed  to  Determine  Impact,  GAO–07– 
149 (Washington, D.C.: Jan. 26, 2007). 

2 In  preparing  for  this  hearing,  we  did  not  attempt  to  obtain  2006  inspection  and 
enforcement  data  because  we  lacked  the  time  to  determine  the  reliability  of  and 
analyze these data. 

3 See  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation,  Office  of  the  Inspector  General,  The 
Federal Railroad Administration Can Improve Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety 
by  Ensuring  Compliance  with  Accident  Reporting  Requirements  and  Addressing 
Sight  Obstructions,  MH–2007–044  (Washington,  D.C.:  May  3,  2007);  Audit  of  Over-
sight of Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Accident Reporting, Investigations and Safety 
Regulations,  MH–2006–016  (Washington,  D.C.:  Nov.  28,  2005);  and  Report  on  the 
Audit  of  the  Highway-Rail  Grade  Crossing  Safety  Program,  MH–2004–065  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: June 16, 2004). 

4 Generally,  human  factors  are  behaviors  that  affect  job  performance,  such  as  in-

correctly setting switches. 

analyzing, and controlling risks. 

5 Risk  management  can  be  described  as  a  systematic  approach  for  identifying, 

6 For  2006,  the  Surface  Transportation  Board  defined  Class  I  railroads  as  rail-

roads earning adjusted annual operating revenues of $319.3 million or more. 
7 This number does not include contractor employees hired by the railroads. 
8 FRA  issued  this  proposed  regulation  in  October  2006  and  plans  to  issue  a  final 

regulation by the end of 2007. 

9 According  to  FRA,  a  close  call  represents  a  situation  in  which  an  ongoing  se-
quence of events was stopped from developing further, preventing the occurrence of 
potentially serious safety-related consequences. 

10 Railroad  employees  often  work  long  hours  and  have  unpredictable  and  fluc-
tuating  work  schedules.  FRA  and  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  have 
identified employee fatigue as a significant factor in many train accidents. FRA does 
not have the authority to regulate railroad worker duty hours. However, the depart-
ment recently proposed legislation to Congress to reauthorize FRA (S. 918 and H.R. 
1516) that would give the agency authority to do so. 

11 These  programs  will  include  efforts  by  railroads  to  prevent  accidents  through 
collecting  and  analyzing  data  on  accident  precursors—such  as  close  call  incidents, 
employee errors, or organizational characteristics—to better identify and correct in-
dividual  and  organizational  characteristics  that  contribute  to  accidents.  FRA  plans 
to  initiate  this  pilot  project  in  Fiscal  Year  2008,  contingent  upon  funding.  The  de-
partment’s proposed legislation refers to this initiative as the Safety Risk Reduction 
Program. 

12 According to FRA, these additional vehicles allow the agency to triple the miles 
of  track  that  it  is  able  to  inspect  per  year,  to  nearly  100,000  miles.  FRA  also  in-
spects track conditions through manual inspections conducted on foot or in on-track 
equipment. 

13 In  continuous  welded  rail  track,  rails  are  welded  together  to  form  one  contin-
uous rail that may be several miles long. There may be joints in this rail for several 
reasons, including the need to replace a section of defective rail. 

14 FRA officials have explained that operating practices inspectors have had a lim-
ited ability to cite defects and violations because of the way regulations in this area 
are  written.  For  example,  as  noted  previously,  the  regulations  contain  general  re-
quirements  about  railroads’  programs  for  inspecting  employees’  adherence  to  oper-
ating  rules  and  do  not  specifically  require  that  employees  follow  these  rules.  The 
agency expects that its proposed regulations on operating rules will improve its abil-
ity  to  enforce  in  this  area,  because  the  requirements  will  be  more  stringent  than 
existing regulations. 

15 APTA  is  a  nonprofit  organization  representing  the  transit  industry,  including 

U.S. commuter rail systems. 

16 PHMSA  administers  the  national  regulatory  program  to  ensure  the  safe  trans-

portation of hazardous liquids and natural gas by pipeline. 

17 Transport  Canada  oversees  the  safety  and  security  of  Canada’s  rail,  marine, 

highway, and aviation operations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

18 GAO, Natural Gas Pipeline Safety: Integrity Management Benefits Public Safety, 
but Consistency of Performance Measures Should Be Improved, GAO–06–946 (Wash-
ington, D.C.: Sept. 8, 2006). 

19 FRA headquarters and regional officials also analyze defect data in each inspec-

tion discipline to identify emerging issues and plan inspection activity. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Siggerud.  The  one  thing 
that  threads  through  the  statements  is  certainly  the  focus  on  the 
lack  of  appropriate  response  to  incidents  or  accidents  of  note.  And 
that  a  quicker  response  to  these  things  would  be  of  great  value  in 
helping solve the problems. 

Ms.  Strang,  the  labor  organizations  and  the  railroads  have 
worked  for  years  to  find  ways  to  address  employee  fatigue.  The 
elimination  of  limbo  time,  undisturbed  rest,  and  have  not  yet 
reached  any  agreement.  But  the  Administration  wants  us  to  give 
it the authority to set hours-of-service rules. Now, by giving the ex-
perience that we’ve seen in the trucking industry on hours-of-serv-
ice,  the  courts  struck  down  the  Administration’s  standards.  Why 
should  we  turn  this  responsibility  back  to  them  as  is  suggested  by 
the Administration? 

Ms. STRANG. Thank you. We believe that by taking the provisions 
into  the  Rail  Safety  Advisory  Committee  that  we  will  avoid  some 
of the problems that were encountered by FMCSA. This Committee 
is  a  group  made  up  of  both  railroad  management  and  labor  that, 
through consensus, tries to develop regulations. If within a reason-
able  period  of  time  the  regulations  could  not  be  derived  through  a 
consensus  process,  FRA  would  revert  to  its  normal,  traditional 
rulemaking authority and try to issue regulations. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Has  there  not  been  enough  time  for  the 
FRA  to  request  the  enlargement  of  the  inspector  force,  other  re-
sources  that  are  needed?  It’s  pitifully  small,  as  I  said  before,  com-
pared  to  the  growth  of  the  railroad  industry.  We’re  pleased  to  see 
the success of the industry, but that should not permit the railroad 
industry to go ahead and ignore what are some very obvious safety 
changes that must be made. 

Mr.  Sumwalt,  given  the  trucking  hours-of-service  experience, 
shouldn’t  there  be  some  limitations  on  the  authority  given  to  the 
Administration  to  prevent  them  from  weakening  the  hours-of-serv-
ice rules? 

Mr. SUMWALT. Well, we, at the Safety Board, do believe that the 
FRA  should  be  given  the  regulatory  authority  to  enact  hours-of- 
service  rules.  And  we  feel  that  the  research  has  been  done.  It’s 
about  ready  to  go  to  rulemaking.  And  as  Administrator  Strang 
pointed  out;  there  could  be  a  shock  absorber  in  there  that  if  this 
process  goes  on  too  long,  then  the  FRA  could  come  in  and  impose 
the regulations. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  The  railroads  received  an  estimated  six 
and  a  half  billion  dollars  last  year,  net  profit,  indicating  a  pretty 
healthy  industry.  If  not  financial  constraints,  what’s  stopping  the 
railroads  from  implementing  PTC  systems  nationwide?  Anybody 
want to respond to that? 

Ms. STRANG. I don’t mind. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Please. 
Ms.  STRANG.  I  think  that’s  a  good  question.  And  it  has  taken  a 
lot longer than anybody anticipated. However we’re on the verge of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

making  progress,  or  at  least  that  is  what  we  feel.  Because  we 
issued  the  revisions  to  Part  236  of  Part  H  that  permits  different 
types  of  train  control  systems  such  as  the  communications-based 
train control systems. 

We  just  recently  approved  the  very  first  project  safety  plan  for 
the  BNSF  in  January  2007.  We  know  that  Union  Pacific,  Norfolk 
Southern  and  CSX  are  working  toward  it.  Is  it  slow?  Yes.  But  are 
we making progress? We think so. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  If  progress  is  needed  then  I  don’t  take  a 
lot  of  comfort,  honestly,  out  of  saying  that  things  are  being  done 
when  it’s  obvious  that  more  needs  to  be  done.  And  we  have  the 
technology to do it. We have the workforce ready to do it. We ought 
to be making those changes that make the system safer, especially 
when  you  look  at  the  growth  in  the  transport  of  hazardous  mate-
rials. We have things to worry about. 

We  just  heard  from  Senator  Clinton.  I  think  she  listed  five  acci-
dents in the State of New York alone. And we all see it happening. 
So I would urge an acceleration of the pace. 

The  NTSB  has  said  that  the  Home  Valley,  Washington  accident 
was  caused  by  the  failure  of  the  railroad  to  respond  to  reports  of 
rough  rides  which  is  a  sign  of  defective  track  conditions.  Are  the 
railroads  allowing  their  own  track  inspectors  enough  time  to  per-
form inspection duties? Is this a problem in the Northeast Corridor, 
which  I  use  and  get  some  bumpy  rides  on?  The  fact  is  that  if  we 
have  to  sacrifice  safety  that  no  matter  what  advances  we  make  in 
the  pace  and  the  ease  of  the  carriage,  it  doesn’t  matter.  So  what 
is the problem? Do we know in the Northeast Corridor? 

Ms.  STRANG.  I’m  sorry.  I  didn’t  realize  that  you  were  addressing 

me. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  it’s  addressing  to  the  panel.  Whom-
ever feels that they have enough knowledge to respond to that. Mr. 
Sumwalt, do you? 

Mr.  SUMWALT.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  indicated  you’re  ex-
actly  right.  In  the  Home  Valley,  Washington  accident  we  did  note 
that  the  railroad  did  not  have  sufficient  time  to  conduct  those  in-
spections.  And  these  inspections  are  vital  to  ensuring  the  safety  of 
our nation’s railways. 

So,  we  do  need  to  ensure  that  the  inspectors  do  have  the  ade-
quate  time  to  do  their  jobs.  We  have  issued  a  recommendation  to 
that  particular  railroad  concerning  the  need  for  additional  time  to 
make  sure  their  inspectors  have  adequate  time.  And  we  will  con-
tinue  to  look  at  that  issue  as  it  relates  to  the  railroad  system 
across the country. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How about in the Northeast Corridor? Are 
we aware of the fact that there are track difficulties, track concerns 
with  the  volume  of  travel  that  takes  place  for  well—not  travel, 
cargo, passenger, et cetera? 

Ms.  STRANG.  You’re  right.  It’s  a  growing  problem  where  with  an 
increase just in the amount of trains you find reduced time, for in-
stance, for inspections. In the Northeast Corridor, Amtrak inspects 
at night when they have fewer trains. 

And  they’ve  been  using—they’ve  been  trying  to  get  higher  tech-
nology  equipment  available  to  help  them  in  their  inspections.  So, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

we’re  fairly  confident.  They  have  a  very  good  track  record  in  the 
Northeast Corridor for track related problems. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. Senator Smith? 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Ms. Strang, the GAO 
says  that  the  FRA  is  inspecting  .2  percent  of  the  trackage.  Is  that 
an  adequate  rate  of  inspection?  And  if  not,  do  you  have  a  target? 
Ms.  STRANG.  We  try  to  target  our  inspections  where  they  will 
have  the  most  meaning.  So  we  look  at  the  relative  risk  of  where 
we have problems. What the past records have been and then allo-
cate our inspection forces in that manner. 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  you  don’t  necessarily  have  a  target  as  to  a 

percentage of tracks? 

Ms.  STRANG.  We  have—our  targets  are  based  on  reductions  of 
derailments.  So  our—if  you  look  at  what  our  GPRA  goals  are, 
they’re all based towards reducing the number of derailments. And 
that is how we target our efforts. 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Sumwalt,  you  state  that  the  Safety  Board 
has  issued  34  recommendations  regarding  railroad  employee  fa-
tigue.  Eight  of  those  34  went  to  the  Federal  Railroad  Administra-
tion. The remaining recommendations went to rail carriers and op-
erating  unions.  Are  they  doing  anything  with  those?  Are  unions 
and carriers doing anything with those recommendations? 

Mr.  SUMWALT.  Senator,  I  can  give  you  a  break  down  of  that  for 
the  record.  I  was  mainly  focusing  on  the  FRA  and  their  response 
which  is,  they’re  exactly  right.  They  don’t  have  the  authority  to 
amend  the  Federal  Hours  of  Service  Act.  So,  that’s  where  most  of 
my focus has been on trying to—— 

Senator  SMITH.  I’d  like  to  see  those  because,  you  know,  I  think 
it  takes  both  the  operators  and  the  unions  to  work  together  to  the 
same end as well. 

I have a question to the whole panel. How much of an impact do 
you  anticipate  that  technology  will  have  on  improving  rail  safety? 
It seems to me there are some initiatives out there that have some 
real promise. 

Ms.  STRANG.  I  think  that  the  potential  for  technology  improve-
ment  is  huge.  Some  things  that  we  have  ongoing  are  new  inspec-
tion  techniques  for  internal  rail  defects  which  current  technology 
allows  you  to  only  look  at  a  portion  of  the  rail.  Within  the  next 
three to 5 years we’ll have a phaser ray technology that will allow 
inspection  for  internal  rail  defects  of  the  head,  the  base  and  the 
web of the rail. 

This is very important because broken rails are commonly caused 
by  internal  rail  defects  that  subsequently  grow  because  of  the 
heavy  axle  loads.  So  if  we  can  find  all  the  defects  and  learn  more 
about how defects grow, we’ll be able to greatly improve track safe-
ty.  As  far  as  switch  positions  go,  we  have  partnered  with  Bur-
lington Northern Santa Fe on a low cost switch position indicating 
system  which  they  installed  in  49  switches  between  Tulsa,  Okla-
homa and Avard, Oklahoma. 

So  those  types  of  technologies,  we  believe  have  a  lot  of  promise. 
There’s also promise in the fact that as PTC gets rolled out the cost 
should come down. And that will make it more affordable and then 
more deployable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Sumwalt,  can  you  compare  for  me  other 
modes of transportation regulated by Federal Government in terms 
of  hours-of-service  laws?  How  do  they  compare?  How  do  trucks 
compare to rail? 

Mr. SUMWALT. OK. Thank you. Yes, sir. As stated earlier the rail 
industry—the  employers—the  train  crew  members  are  legally  able 
to  go  up  to  a  maximum  of  432  hours  per  month.  We  compare  that 
to  the  aviation  business  for  the  FAR  Part  121  carriers,  the  sched-
uled  air  carriers  where  the  pilots  can  operate  100  hours  a  month 
maximum. 

For  the  Part  135,  which  would  predominately  be  the  charter  op-
erators  they  can  operate  120  hours  per  month.  Highway  FMCSA 
requires  that  truck  drivers  limit  their  duty  time  to  350  hours  per 
month,  marine,  ocean  going,  360  hours  per  month.  So  I  think  that 
these  figures  indicate  that  the  rail  industry  is  far  greater  in  their 
allowance for their crew members to operate. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  are  there  far  greater  numbers  of  accidents 
as  you  try  to  compare  the  tonnage  of  stuff  moved  or  do  you  have 
any data like that? 

Mr.  SUMWALT.  I  don’t  have  that  data  with  me,  Senator.  But  we 

can get that. We’d be glad to supply that for the record. 

Senator SMITH. OK, thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Hyde,  you 

talked about action plans for tough intersections. 

Mr. HYDE. Right. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. That was interesting to me because I think 
we’ve  had  some  issues  with  that.  Are  there  any  studies  that  have 
been  done  where  action  plans  you  mentioned  state  where  they’ve 
been  put  in  place  where  you  could  show  there’s  been  some  results 
from that? 

Mr.  HYDE.  Yes,  thank  you.  FRA  worked  with  the  State  of  Lou-
isiana  to  put  together  a  state-specific  action  plan  starting  in  2005. 
Louisiana  completed  the  plan  after  conducting  quite  a  bit  of  anal-
ysis  on  their  more  problematic  grade  crossings—those  with  mul-
tiple collisions. 

The  data  hasn’t  come  in  yet  as  to  whether  the  plan  has  signifi-
cantly  helped,  but  certainly  by  closing  some  of  the  more  trouble-
some grade crossings, which they’ve done, will help. They’re looking 
at  closing  a  few  more.  Those  are  good  steps.  They  also  improved 
several  crossings  with  passive  warning  devices  by  installing  active 
warning devices. 

Now FRA is working with Texas to put together a similar action 
plan. And we do think that other states that, particularly that have 
a high number of grade crossing collisions and fatalities should cer-
tainly be putting together state-specific action plans. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. Mr. Sumwalt, you talked about 
the  idea  of  comprehensive  regulations  for  sleep  accidents  and  fa-
tigue  accidents  compared  to  what’s  in  the  bill  or  in  the  law  cur-
rently. Could you give me more information about what you meant 
by that? 

Mr.  SUMWALT.  Yes,  ma’am.  There’s  a  lot  more  to  fatigue  than 
just looking at the human body and how much sleep you get. These 
crew  members  are  operating  on  a  rotating  schedule—sometimes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

they  operate  during  the  day,  sometimes  they  operate  during  the 
night, and early morning hours. And we feel that the program that 
is  enacted  should  appreciate  the  effect  of  the  circadian  rhythm  on 
fatigue. 

Normally when the Safety Board looks at accidents involving fa-
tigue, we look at three factors: the continuous hours that the crew 
member has been awake; the time of the day because we know that 
there are times of days that are more typically associated with the 
circadian low points; and reduced performance and alertness. 

And  we  also  look  at  cumulative  sleep  loss.  If  I  require  8  hours 
of  sleep,  but  I  only  got  6  hours  last  night.  I’ve  got  a  2-hour  sleep 
debt  from  last  night.  If  tonight  I  only  get  6  hours  of  sleep  I  will 
have a 4-hour cumulative sleep loss. So we think that the program, 
whatever’s  enacted,  should  appreciate  the  fact  that  the  body  has 
those functions operating against it as it relates to safety. 

So  we  think  that  there  are  some  computer  modeling  programs 
that can predict, based on somebody’s work schedule, when they’re 
most  likely  to  be  fatigued  to  the  point  that  it  could  impair  their 
performance and alertness. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thanks.  Ms.  Siggerud,  do  you  think  we 
need more inspectors. I think the numbers that we have, 400 FRA 
inspectors  and  700  railroads  are  operating  on  219,000  miles  of 
track. 

Ms. SIGGERUD. Senator Klobuchar, we didn’t actually try to esti-
mate  the  number  of  inspectors  that  would  be  appropriate.  We’re 
certainly  open  to  the  concept  of  assigning  more  inspectors.  I  think 
the real question would be how to best leverage those additional in-
spectors  and  the  ones  that  we  already  have  as  they  are  deployed. 
This is why we made a couple of recommendations in our report 
about trying to understand more about the outcomes and results of 
the existing inspection and enforcement program as well as why we 
made  the  observation  about  the  risk  management  concept  that’s 
used in related industries. The virtue of a concept like that is that 
by  involving  the  railroads  in  identifying  safety  risks,  having  them 
develop  risk  management  plans,  and  then  using  some  of  FRA’s  in-
spection resources to focus on their inspections on the implementa-
tion  of  those  risk  management  plans,  FRA  is  able  to  essentially 
broaden  the  reach  of  these  inspectors  beyond  the  current,  very 
small  percentage  of  operations  and  activities  that  they  are  able  to 
observe. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  then,  Ms.  Strang,  I’m  running  out  of 
time  here,  but  I’ll  ask  you  a  question  for  the  record.  It  might  be 
something  you’ll  want  to  bring  back  to  your  lawyers  anyway.  It’s 
about  the  FRA’s  position  about  pre-emption  of  state  claims.  We 
have obviously some victims next door in Minot, North Dakota and 
other places. We’re concerned about having some kind of remedy in 
state court. And we’d like to know the position and—FRA’s position 
and what the reasoning is for it. 

record. 

Ms.  STRANG.  Thank  you.  I’ll  be  happy  to  get  back  to  you  for  the 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK, thank you. 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 
National uniformity of railroad safety laws and regulations is essential to safe and 
secure  railroad  operations.  Without  nationally  uniform  standards,  a  railroad  would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

be  forced  to  continually  change  its  operations,  in  an  effort  to  meet  different  and 
often conflicting standards in every community through which it travels. This would 
create  an  impossible  situation  that  would  be  both  inefficient  and  extremely  unsafe. 
Meaningful Federal preemption of state and local standards related to railroad safe-
ty and security is an essential component for maintaining national uniformity. 

FRA sympathizes with anyone injured as the result of a railroad accident or haz-
ardous materials release. FRA’s mission is to prevent such incidents from occurring, 
and we work toward that every day in a wide variety of ways. 

FRA is monitoring very closely the progress of the Minot cases making their way 
through  the  courts.  However,  FRA  is  not  a  party  to  any  of  these  cases  and  is  not 
permitted to take a position because the United States could become involved. If the 
Federal Government becomes involved in any of these cases, its position will be pre-
sented  by  the  Department  of  Justice,  which  is  the  official  representative  of  the 
United States in litigation. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Senator Klobuchar. 
I want to close, but I just want to ask, Ms. Strang, one more thing. 
Do  your  inspectors  regulate  solid  waste  operations  that  take  place 
at rail facilities? 

Ms.  STRANG.  No,  we  do  not.  That  would  be  an  Environmental 

Protection Agency issue. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Or? 
Ms. STRANG. Somebody else, but it’s not us. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. That’s because there’s a very serious ques-
tion being raised about that. I have several other questions that I’ll 
submit to each of you in writing. 

And  I  note  that  something  Senator  Klobuchar  talked  about  and 
that is we had in the last roughly 15 years an increase in the num-
ber  of  inspectors  about  15  percent,  adding  roughly  50  more.  While 
there  has  been  a  50  percent  increase  in  ton  miles  from  well,  just 
from  1990  to  the  year  2000.  And  a  20  percent  increase  in  train 
miles. We’re not gaining on this. Realistically though the statistics 
have improved in some cases. 

I thank you and would—we’ll keep the record open and send you 

any questions that we have; and ask for a quick response. 

I invite the second panel to the table and would ask if you would 
please  assemble  there.  I  have  a  call  that  I  must  take  and  I’ll  be 
right back. 
[Recess.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  The  Subcommittee  is  back  at  work  and  I 
apologize  for  the  delay.  I  think  it’s  quite  apparent  around  here  we 
have  major  issue  after  major  issue  to  work  on.  And  there’s  not  al-
ways enough time. And the skills that you each bring to the discus-
sion is critical, so we thank you. 

And  I  want  to  ask  you,  Mr.  Wytkind,  to  start  with  your  testi-
mony  and  recognizing  that  5  minutes  is  our  target.  You  run  over 
a  minute  or  so,  it’s  almost  like  passing  an  amber  light,  so  please 
commence. 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD WYTKIND, PRESIDENT, 

TRANSPORTATION TRADES DEPARTMENT, AFL–CIO 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  I’m  sure  everyone  heard  that,  but  anyway.  I’m 

technology deprived this morning. 

I  want  to  thank  you  for  having  us  here  and  I  want  to  say  that 
we’re  here  to  discuss  rail  safety  reauthorization  because  the  rail-
road industry has derailed every attempt to pass such a bill for the 
last  ten  or  more  years.  And  I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

hearing  and  for  giving  us  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  the  de-
bate up here over how to move a strong rail safety bill. 

58 

It is our sincere hope that the safety of the American public and 
railroad  workers  will  prevail  over  private  interest  in  this  debate. 
For too long railroad industry profits, which as you indicated a lit-
tle  bit  ago,  have  been  quite  robust,  has  trumped  safety.  And  as  a 
result  our  members  have  waited  too  long  for  action  on  a  number 
of very important safety initiatives. 

Fatigue in the rail industry has reached a crisis situation. In dis-
missing  legislative  measures  to  address  fatigue,  too  often  the  rail-
roads  claim  a  need  for  flexibility  but  fail  to  address  the  problem 
year  in  and  year  out.  Having  chronically  tired  workers  is  not  good 
business. And it threatens the safety of workers and the public. 

There are many cases in which the railroad should have learned 
this  lesson.  In  Macdona,  Texas  in  June  of  2004,  three  people  died, 
30  more  suffered  respiratory  injuries  when  two  trains  collided  re-
leasing chlorine gas, as we all know. The NTSB accident report de-
scribed  a  work  schedule  where  11  of  the  engineers  previous  work 
days  were  14  hour  work  days  with  one  being  a  22  hour  day.  And 
worker fatigue was cited as a probable cause of that accident. 

Unfortunately  it  is  routine  for  workers  to  be  held  several  hours 
beyond the hours-of-service limitations in this industry. The NTSB 
found that at the time of the Texas accident more than 40 percent 
of  the  Union  Pacific’s  crew  assignments  in  the  San  Antonio  area 
had extended into what’s referred to as limbo time. If the American 
public  truly  understood  the  severity  of  the  fatigue  problem  in  the 
railroad industry they would be screaming for Congressional action 
or alternatively, would be working to stop freight trains from trav-
eling in their neighborhoods. 

I would urge this Committee to view the reports that I have read 
regarding  excessive  hours.  And  they’re  quite  startling.  I  think 
you’ll  find  that  the  stories  in  there  and  the  reports  in  there  are 
quite compelling. And we urge you to review them. 

I  also  receive  report  after  report  from  member  unions  about  ex-
cessive  hours-of-service  across  the  board.  These  reports  are  not 
merely  the  gripes  of  individual  employees  but  a  sincere  warning 
about jeopardized safety. Such as signalmen workers who routinely 
face  much  longer  hours  than  they’re  supposed  to  have  on  the  job. 
Congress  must  step  in  and  deal  forcefully  with  the  lack  of  em-
ployee  training  in  this  industry  as  well.  It  is  appalling  that  in  an 
industry  that  has  earned  $25  billion  in  the  last  6  years  provides 
such substandard training. This is the same industry that parades 
up here regularly to talk about all its safety and security initiatives 
and  its  safe,  state-of-the-art  24/7  operations.  Yet  workers  are  just 
not being trained. 

The  rail  lobbyists  call  post-training  requirements,  ‘‘redundant 
and  unnecessary,’’  but  they  have  no  answer  for  what  workers  are 
telling  us.  They  are  telling  us  they  are  receiving  little  or  no  train-
ing. And unfortunately there’s this mass exodus of veteran employ-
ees  that  are  leaving  the  industry  as  they  retire.  And  a  lot  of  insti-
tutional  knowledge  is  being  lost.  And  as  a  result  of  that  that  be-
comes a real safety issue because those co-workers are relied upon 
to train the next generation of workers in the rail industry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

We  also  believe  that  Congress  needs  to  beef  up  the  Federal  rail 
inspection workforce. An average fine against a railroad in this in-
dustry is $39 per infraction. 

Last,  but  not  least,  let  me  talk  about  the  cultural  harassment 
and intimidation in the industry. We’ve seen one case after another 
of  workers  being,  not  only  mistreated,  but  threatened  and  intimi-
dated  from  coming  forward  to  report  safety  and  security  problems. 
Documented cases show a culture of harassing and suppressing the 
facts  and  using  heavy-handing  as  the  FRA  has  cited  often  in  legal 
tactics to despise—to disguise the facts: underreporting of injuries, 
delaying  medical  treatment  for  injured  workers,  forcing  employees 
to wait often 2 hours or more for treatment. 

We  had  one  employee  who  had  a  cut  on  his  back  that  required 
stitches. But due to company policy was forced to wait for a super-
visor to go 89 miles to that location before he could receive medical 
attention. 

Clearly  the  Committee  has  a  chance  to  enact  strong  measures 
that  help  to  change  this  perverse  culture.  And  we  really  do  urge 
you  to  do  so  by  putting  very  strong  whistleblower  protections  in 
there  that  empower  workers  to  step  forward  with  their  safety  and 
security risks. 

Let  me  wrap  up  by  addressing  two  other  issues,  among  others 
that  are  in  my  submitted  testimony  that  we  will  be  pushing  very 
hard  on.  It’s  first,  to  consider  measures  to  stop  the  outsourcing  of 
train  inspections  to  Mexico.  It’s  an  issue  that’s  been  addressed 
twice  in  petitions  by  the  Union  Pacific  Railroad.  We  hope  that 
you’ll seek legislative action in that area. 

And also we hope that you’ll take action to begin to eliminate the 
dark territory problem that plagues the entire rail industry. As we 
all  know  the  Graniteville,  South  Carolina  wreck  could  have  been 
avoided  with  the  right  use  of  technology.  And  there  are  other  ex-
amples  around  the  country  where  we  should  not  have  locomotive 
engineers and conductors traveling around trains in dark territory. 
It  is  wrong.  This  is  the  21st  century.  We  should  not  be  running 

trains in the dark without the proper signaling technology. 

I want to thank you, Mr. Chairman for having us here. And look 
forward to any questions you may have. And look forward to work-
ing with you on this legislation. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Wytkind follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD WYTKIND, PRESIDENT, 

TRANSPORTATION TRADES DEPARTMENT, AFL–CIO 

Chairman Lautenberg, Senator Smith, and Members of the Subcommittee, let me 
first thank you for the opportunity to testify this morning and to present the views 
and concerns of transportation workers as you embark on efforts to reauthorize the 
Federal  rail  safety  program.  As  this  Committee  knows,  the  Transportation  Trades 
Department,  AFL–CIO  (TTD)  consists  of  32  member  unions  in  all  modes  of  trans-
portation,  including  those  that  represent  hundreds  of  thousands  of  rail  workers  in 
the  freight,  passenger  and  commuter  sectors.  There  is  no  question  that  we  have  a 
vested interest in the topic of today’s hearing and, in fact, have joined with you and 
other members of this Committee in pursuit of policies that will enhance the safety 
and security of this critical industry. 

The  workers  who  operate  and  maintain  our  Nation’s  rail  system  and  equipment 
are  critical  to  the  safe  and  efficient  movement  of  goods  and  people  throughout  our 
country.  But  for  their  dedication  and  professionalism,  commerce  in  this  country 
would come to an immediate standstill. Yet, for more than a decade the safety con-
cerns  of  rail  workers  have  been  ignored  in  the  legislative  process  as  the  railroad 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

lobby  has  stonewalled  every  attempt  to  update  our  rail  safety  laws.  It  is  long-past 
time to move meaningful rail safety legislation. 

As  we  talk  about  rail  safety  initiatives,  it  is  important  to  recognize  that  we  are 
not dealing with an industry that can claim it does not have the resources to comply 
with common-sense safety directives. The freight railroads have pocketed $25 billion 
in  profits  over  the  past  6  years  according  to  their  own  annual  reports.  Yet,  this 
same  railroad  industry  has  effectively  blocked  rail  safety  legislation  since  the  last 
reauthorization bill expired in 1998. 

Let  me  mention  a  few  specific  areas  of  concern  that  rail  labor  has  advocated  for 
years  and  place  the  need  for  rail  safety  authorization  in  some  context  for  the  Sub-
committee.1 I  should  also  note  that  House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Com-
mittee  Chair  Jim  Oberstar  (D–MN)  and  Railroads  Subcommittee  Chair  Corrine 
Brown (D–FL) have introduced a strong rail safety bill, H.R. 2095, which addresses 
many of these issues and which we have endorsed. 
Reporting and Employee Protections 

First,  the  railroad  industry  can  never  be  safe  if  employees  are  intimidated  and 
harassed  when  they  report  accidents,  injuries  and  safety  problems.  Our  members 
continue  to  face  retribution,  harassment  and  intimidation  for  reporting  accidents 
and  potential  safety  and  security  problems.  As  I  have  reported  to  this  Committee 
before, there is a pervasive culture in the railroad industry that tamps down report-
ing.  In  the  railroads’  quest  for  Harriman  safety  awards  and  glowing  safety  reports, 
in reality, safety is compromised. Workers are routinely forced into ‘‘team’’ reporting 
where  groups  of  workers  are  rewarded  for  filing  no  injury  reports  in  a  given  time 
period. This means that when a worker severs a finger, for example, he may forego 
treatment or face pressure from his team—a convenient way for management to use 
co-workers to do their intimidating for them. 

Safety measures in the railroad industry are based on FRA’s data collection from 
accident  and  incident  reports.  Since  workers  are  so  soundly  and  routinely  discour-
aged  from  actually  submitting  reports,  the  FRA’s  data  is  inherently  flawed.  Like-
wise, rules, regulations, penalties and fines that are based on accident and incident 
reports are misaligned as well. 

Workers should not have to choose between job security and the security and safe-
ty  of  the  rail  transportation  system—yet  that  is  what  is  happening  today.  The  sto-
ries  I  hear  from  members  are  shocking—yet  are  common.  Members  injured  on  the 
job  are  denied  medical  care  until  company  representatives  arrive  on  the  scene  and 
then  convinced  by  the  injured  worker  that  they  need  urgent  care.  They  are  accom-
panied  to  the  hospital  or  doctor  by  supervisors.  Supervisors  ‘‘remind’’  injured  work-
ers that taking a prescription drug would make the case reportable to the FRA. We 
have reams of paper documenting harassment and intimidation of workers with re-
spect to accident and injury reporting. It is a pervasive problem in the industry that 
has gone unchecked for too long and must be addressed by Congress. 

Strong whistleblower language is key to improving rail safety. Clearly, if Congress 
can  find  the  will  to  protect  those  who  report  financial  security  problems  as  it  did 
in  the  Sarbanes-Oxley  Act,  the  same  should  be  expected  for  rail  workers.  We  were 
disappointed  that  the  Administration  failed  to  recognize  the  need  for  whistleblower 
protections  for  workers  in  its  bill,  but  are  pleased  that  the  Oberstar-Brown  bill  in-
cludes strong whistleblower provisions. We also believe the section in H.R. 2095 as-
suring  injured  workers  of  prompt  medical  attention  is  important,  and  we  support 
its inclusion in your bill. 
Fatigue 

It  is  well  documented  that  fatigue  is  a  factor  in  many  rail  accidents.  The  catas-
trophe  in  Macdona,  Texas  that  resulted  in  three  deaths  should  have  been  a  wake 
up  call.  According  to  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB),  the  prob-
able cause of that accident was train crew fatigue. And at the core of the issue were 
Union  Pacific’s  train  crew  scheduling  practices.  With  record  profits  and  an  over-
loaded  system,  it  is  unconscionable  that  the  railroad  industry  refuses  to  hire  the 
workers they need and instead make employees work dangerously long hours. 

Operating  crews  often  put  in  12-hour  days,  then  have  to  wait  on  their  train  ‘‘in 
limbo’’  for  hours  more  until  a  replacement  crew  arrives,  and  then  must  return  to 
work  10  hours  later  (or  face  retribution  from  their  employer).  Limbo  time  refers  to 
the time consumed between completion of the maximum allowable 12-hour shift and 
the time when an employee is completely released from service. The railroads have 

1 Attached are two documents: ‘‘Safety Proposals by the Railroad Operating Crews,’’ submitted 
by the United Transportation Union (UTU) and testimony to the House Railroads, Pipelines and 
Hazardous Materials Subcommittee by the Brotherhood of Railroad Signalmen (BRS). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

taken  advantage  of  an  erroneous  interpretation  of  the  hours-of-service  regulations 
and  now  regularly  compel  crews  to  remain  at  the  work  place  to  guard  stationary 
trains  until  a  relief  crew  is  available  for  service.  This  ‘‘relieved  but  not  released’’ 
status  means  workers  are  forced  to  remain  on  duty  for  hours  and  hours  after  com-
pleting  a  12-hour  shift.  The  railroads  will  tell  you  that  eliminating  limbo  time  will 
create  impossible  scheduling  problems,  but  let’s  be  clear:  the  reason  eliminating 
limbo time is problematic for the railroads is because it has become a major compo-
nent  of  their  routine  scheduling  practices.  Limbo  time  was  not  a  problem  prior  to 
the  Supreme  Court  decision  in  1996  (which  held  that  time  waiting  for  deadhead 
transportation  is  limbo  time  and  therefore  neither  time  on-duty  or  time  off-duty). 
Eliminating limbo time in its entirety is the only meaningful way to end its routine 
abuse. 

For  signal  workers,  the  manipulation  of  hours-of-service  has  become  common-
place. While the 12-hour law applies to signal employees, there is an exception that 
allows  employees  to  work  up  to  four  additional  hours  ‘‘when  an  ‘actual  emergency’ 
exists  and  the  work  of  the  employee  is  related  to  the  emergency.’’  Railroads  have 
exploited  this  exception  to  the  extent  that  now  almost  all  signal  work  is  classified 
as an emergency. Signal employees routinely work 16-hour days. 

When the Hours of Service (HOS) Act was expanded to include signalmen in 1976, 
it  was  intended  to  be  a  12-hour  law.  And,  it  should  be  noted,  that  is  how  the  rail-
roads  originally  applied  the  law.  If,  for  example,  signal  personnel  were  working  on 
a  signal  problem  and  were  approaching  the  12-hour  work  limit  they  would  inform 
their  supervisor  and  the  supervisor  would  make  a  decision  if  the  individual  would 
finish the work within the time limit, or if another employee would be called to fin-
ish the repair work. However, through gradual ‘‘creep’’ by the railroads the law has 
become  a  16-hour  law.  Signal  employees  today  are  instructed  to  work  up  until  the 
16-hour  limit  before  they  call  for  any  relief  personnel.  In  some  cases,  the  railroads 
authorize outright violation of the HOS Act and order their signal employees to con-
tinue working until they are finished with the repair work. 

Of  greater  concern,  is  that  employees  can  be  required  to  work  20  hours  in  a  24- 
hour  period  without  adequate  rest.  Let  me  illustrate  a  typical  duty  time  example 
for  you:  on  Sunday  evening  a  signalman  goes  to  sleep  at  9  p.m.  and  awakens  at 
5  a.m.  to  arrive  for  his  regular  Monday  shift  of  7  a.m.  to  3:30  p.m.  Under  current 
law, at 3:30 p.m. his ‘‘rest’’ period starts. At 11:30 p.m. he is considered fully rested 
and a new 24-hour clock begins, despite the fact that he may have just gone to sleep 
at  10  p.m.  After  less  than  2  hours  of  sleep  he  then  receives  a  call  to  work  at  12 
a.m.  on  Tuesday.  He  works  four  additional  hours  and  is  finished  with  the  trouble 
call at 4 a.m. He then travels home and has to return for his regular shift at 7 a.m. 
The  cumulative  effect  of  the  law  on  the  individual  is  that  he  is  allowed  to  work  a 
total  of  20  hours-of-service  within  a  32-hour  period  without  rest.  You  can  imagine 
the  situation  exacerbated  further  when  the  railroads  tack  on  their  additional  four 
‘‘emergency’’ hours. The HOS Act should be amended to require that employees per-
forming signal work receive at least 8 hours of rest during a 24-hour period. 

Furthermore,  scheduling  continues  to  be  a  major  problem  for  railroads  and  their 
employees. Unless employees know in advance what time they must report to work, 
they cannot properly prepare with adequate rest. Our railroads operate on a contin-
uous  schedule,  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week  from  coast  to  coast.  Rail  workers  do 
not  have  typical  9  to  5  work  hours.  However,  with  the  technology  available  today 
there  is  no  reason  why  every  rail  worker  cannot  know  his  or  her  schedule  in  ad-
vance and be able to plan (i.e., rest, family time, personal time, commute time, etc.) 
accordingly. 

Each  rail  carrier  has  an  information  delivery  system  which  is  commonly  referred 
to  as  a  ‘‘lineup’’  that  is  used  to  advise  crews  who  are  subject  to  call  24/7  regarding 
their status. Our members constantly complain of problems with these ‘‘lineups.’’ It 
is absolutely essential that employees have early and reliable information about the 
date and time when they will be required to report for duty. Moreover, workers’ rest 
time should not be interrupted by communications from their employers. 

Adequately addressing the fatigue issue will require collaboration and cooperation 
as  do  all  human  factor  issues  in  our  industry.  Having  said  that,  we  are  committed 
to  finding  solutions  to  make  our  railroad  safer  and  believe  that  there  are  several 
common-sense  fixes  that  can  be  addressed  immediately.  The  elimination  of  limbo 
time is essential. Guaranteed time off and shortened work days will result in better 
rested, better prepared and more efficient employees. 
Training 

The current training structure for rail workers is woefully inadequate. Despite the 
industry’s  claim  that  it  will  need  to  hire  80,000  more  workers  just  to  maintain  the 
current  movement  of  freight,  it  continues  to  ask  its  workers  to  do  more  with  less. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Industry leaders will tell you about their railroads’ extensive training programs and 
detailed  security  plans.  Let  me  tell  you  what  rail  workers—the  workers  who  move 
trains,  fix  track,  maintain  grade  crossing  signals,  repair  train  cars  and  work  on- 
board—are  telling  me.  I  hear  first  hand  about  an  overworked,  understaffed  work-
force that is ill-equipped to manage the capacity crunch facing our railroad system. 
New  hires  have  not  kept  pace  with  retirements  in  our  aging  workforce.  As  a  re-
sult,  new  hires  are  commonly  steered  through  shortened,  one-size-fits-all  training 
programs.  Despite  the  hype  you  will  hear  about  new  state-of-the  art  training  cen-
ters,  our  members  continue  to  be  frustrated  by  inadequate  training  programs.  We 
know from reports in the field and exit interviews that new employees are resigning 
and  leaving  the  industry  because  they  are  dissatisfied  with  the  quality  of  their 
training,  uncertain  of  their  skills  and  uncomfortable  with  what  they  are  asked  to 
do with limited support. 

For  both  operating  and  on-board  crafts  as  well  as  maintenance  workers,  training 
is  largely  left  to  peer-to-peer  training.  As  the  workforce  retires,  critical  ‘‘institu-
tional’’  knowledge  is  lost.  Coupled  with  limited  classroom  training  and  virtually  no 
on-the-job  training  requirements,  workers  are  entering  the  field  with  very  little  ex-
perience  and  little  oversight.  This  is  hardly  a  recipe  for  safe  and  stable  operations. 
Not  surprisingly,  the  Administration’s  bill  did  not  address  the  need  for  a  better 
trained and more prepared workforce. We urge you to do better and provide, at min-
imum, basic training standards for all class and crafts of employees. 

Similarly,  certification  requirements  for  safety-sensitive  work  groups  are  needed. 
Certification  provides  important  qualification  standards  for  rail  workers.  To  ensure 
accountability for the safe operation and maintenance of railroad equipment and fa-
cilities,  carmen,  conductors,  mechanics,  signalmen  and  other  safety-sensitive  per-
sonnel  should  be  certified.  Furthermore,  any  train  that  carries  hazardous  material 
should  be  staffed  by  workers  certified  in  hazard  identification,  health  effects  and 
first  response.  Such  training  and  certification  should  obviously  also  apply  to  emer-
gency and first responders such as track and signal employees. 
Track Safety 

We anticipate that your rail safety agenda will include a myriad of changes to im-
prove track safety and the safety of rail workers and communities. Of the many im-
provements related to track safety that are of concern to rail labor, let me mention 
just a few today. 

Non-signaled,  or  ‘‘dark  territory’’  refers  to  movement  of  trains  over  track  without 
signals.  Trains  run  through  dark  territory  under  the  direction  of  a  dispatcher  but 
without the safety redundancies of switch monitors, block protection, or broken rail 
detection.  Signal  systems  are  affordable,  relatively  low-tech  technologies  that  save 
lives.  Unfortunately,  the  rail  industry  routinely  fails  to  properly  maintain  signal 
systems and, in fact, often petitions the FRA to waive signal requirements for large 
areas of track. 

The  tragedy  in  Graniteville,  South  Carolina  occurred  in  dark  territory.  A  basic 
signal system would have noted that the hand-thrown switch was not properly lined 
and the train would have had a red signal to stop. Nine people died in Graniteville 
(including  the  train  engineer  who  was  not  properly  trained  in  hazmat  evacuation 
procedures). Signal systems save lives when they are present and maintained prop-
erly.  The  NTSB  has  been  clear  in  its  recommendations  in  this  area.  Until  the  rail-
roads  commit  to  install  adequate  signal  technology  throughout  the  entire  rail  sys-
tem, the NTSB recommendations are vital. Moreover, rail labor is adamant that pe-
titions  to  remove  signal  systems  and  increase  dark  territory  in  our  rail  system  be 
rejected. 

Technological  advances  are  important  tools  in  creating  a  safer  rail  network.  Rail 
labor has welcomed and adapted to technological changes over the years. The imple-
mentation of positive train control (PTC) systems is on the NTSB’s most wanted list 
of  transportation  safety  improvements.  Rail  labor  has  partnered  with  the  FRA  and 
others  through  the  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee  (RSAC)  process  to  address 
PTC  in  order  to  prevent  train  collisions  and  over-speed  accidents.  We  have  been 
very supportive of developments in this area. 

However, notwithstanding technological advancements, including PTC, we oppose 
single person operation of rail locomotives. The responsibilities of a railroad to oper-
ate safely over public crossings, to inspect the moving train, to open public crossings 
quickly when stopped, and to interact with emergency responders as situations war-
rant cannot be address by PTC, and were not designed to do so. Railroads that are 
intent  on  operating  trains  with  a  single  individual  are  ignoring  their  responsibility 
to  their  employees,  local  communities,  local  emergency  responders  and  the  general 
public. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Oversight 

63 

A  qualified,  well-trained  and  adequately  staffed  inspector  workforce  is  critical  to 
the  safety  of  our  Nation’s  rails.  To  that  end,  rail  labor  notes  that  the  current  level 
of  staffing  at  the  FRA  is  woefully  inadequate.  Currently  each  FRA  track  inspector 
is  responsible  for  over  500  miles  of  track.  Current  regulations  call  for  a  minimum 
of  two  track  inspections  a  week.  Understanding  that  track  inspection  is  time-con-
suming,  labor-intensive  work  it  is  impossible  to  expect  the  current  inspector  work-
force to actually inspect all of the lines they are tasked to oversee. More inspectors 
not  only  will  increase  the  safety  of  our  railroads,  but  an  increased  presence  on  the 
railroads  will  have  the  added  benefit  of  discouraging  trespassers  and  those  intent 
on creating havoc on the railroad. 

As the General Accounting Office (GAO) has reported, there are myriad problems 
with safety oversight by the FRA. Because the number of FRA and state inspectors 
is  small  relative  to  the  size  of  railroad  operations,  FRA  inspections  can  only  cover 
0.2  percent  of  railroad  operations.2 When  safety  problems  are  found  during  that 
very small number of inspections (about 3 percent in 2005), the FRA does not meas-
ure  the  extent  to  which  the  identified  safety  problems  have  been  corrected.3 As  I 
mentioned  before,  rail  companies  are  making  money  hand  over  fist,  and  even  the 
GAO states that it is not clear whether the number of civil penalties issued, or their 
amounts, are having the desired effect in improving compliance.4 

Even the most robust safety rules are meaningless if not fully enforced by Federal 
regulators charged by Congress with this task. Yet we know that the railroads have 
used  their  considerable  political  clout  to  limit  enforcement  activities  and  oversight 
and in reality face little consequence for safety infractions. Fines, when they are lev-
ied at all, are little more than nuisances to multi-billion dollar rail companies. Con-
gress  must  step  in  to  make  rail  carriers  that  violate  safety  regulations  accountable 
for their actions. Fines should be increased exponentially and penalties should more 
adequately reflect the level or number of infractions by a carrier. 
Cross-Border Safety and Security 

Finally,  we  hope  this  Committee  will  recognize  the  need  to  address  the  issue  of 
safe cross-border transportation in the rail sector. As U.S. industries continue their 
drive to outsource American jobs and cut costs, we must remember the safety impli-
cations  of  such  actions.  Train  inspections  currently  performed  by  U.S.  rail  workers 
play an important role in ensuring the safe and secure movement of U.S. cross-bor-
der  operations.  We  hope  this  Committee  will  consider  making  a  strong  statement 
in  the  reauthorization  bill  to  prohibit  rail  carriers  from  waiving  U.S.  inspection 
mandates  (and  outsourcing  them  to  Mexico)  or  other  safety  requirements  in  cross- 
border operations. 

We look forward to working with you and as the Committee prepares to move leg-
islation that will make our railroad industry safer. I thank you for this opportunity 
to testify, and I will be happy to answer any questions. 

ATTACHMENT 1 

Safety Proposals by the Railroad Operating Crews 

There are a number of safety improvements which Congress needs to address. We 
discuss them below in no particular order of importance. However, the most signifi-
cant issues facing railroad workers today are fatigue and harassment. 
Employee Protections Against Harassment and Intimidation 

Nothing  in  the  railroad  industry  is  more  disruptive  and  demeaning  to  an  em-
ployee  than  harassment  and  intimidation  he/she  continues  to  experience  on  many 
railroads. 

For  example,  some  carriers  use  discipline  or  the  threat  of  it  to  suppress  the  re-
porting of an injury. The current FRA requirements are virtually inadequate to pre-
vent this harassment. 

We must ensure that workers who report or identify a safety or security risk will 
not  face  retribution  or  retaliation  from  their  employers.  One  should  not  have  to 
choose  between  doing  the  right  thing  on  safety  or  security  and  risk  of  losing  his  or 
her  job.  Despite  the  whistleblower  protections  included  in  the  current  law,  rail 
workers and their unions continue to experience employer harassment and intimida-

2 Reauthorization of the Federal Rail Safety Program: Hearing Before the House Subcommittee 
on  Railroads,  Pipelines,  and  Hazardous  Materials,  110th  Cong.  (2007)  (statement  of  Katherine 
Siggerud, Director, Physical Infrastructure Issues, Government Accountability Office). 

3 Id. 
4 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

tion when reporting accidents, injuries and other safety concerns. Indeed, in an FRA 
report issued in July 2002 entitled An Examination of Railroad Yard Workers Safety 
(RR02–01),  the  FRA  conducted  focus  group  interviews  with  certain  groups  of  rail 
workers.  The  FRA  stated,  ‘‘Perhaps  of  most  significance,  rail  labor  painted  a  gen-
erally  adversarial  picture  of  the  safety  climate  in  the  rail  industry.  They  felt  that 
harassment and intimidation were commonplace, and were used to pressure employ-
ees  to  not  report  an  injury,  to  cut  corners  and  to  work  faster.’’  It  is  disingenuous 
for  rail  carriers  and  government  to  ask  workers  to  report  problems  while  at  the 
same time refuse to provide the basic protections needed to ensure that such report-
ing will not result in employer retribution. 

Adequate  provisions  are  necessary  to  protect  safety  of  whistle-blowers  and  those 
subjected  to  intimidation.  The  various  crafts  have  received  countless  complaints 
from employees of instances of outright harassment and intimidation. Some of these 
examples include: 

Not reporting an injury or occupational illness soon enough for the carrier; 
Railroads imposing multiple disciplinary hearings and investigations arising out 
of a single incident or accident; 
Requiring  multiple  statements  to  a  railroad  arising  out  of  a  single  incident  in 
an attempt to obtain conflicting facts; 
Constantly  providing  medical  records  to  a  railroad,  even  though  no  litigation 
has ensued; 
Being harassed for not authorizing the use of defective equipment; 
Retaliation for reporting, or attempting to report, on-the-job injuries; and 
Supervisors  interfering  with  their  medical  treatment  for  on-the-job  injuries  or 
work  related  illnesses  in  order  to  avoid  making  the  injury  reportable  to  FRA. 
There  needs  to  be  effective  employee  remedies  for  an  expanded  number  of  safety 
activities. Currently, there are limited protections available under 49 U.S.C. 20109, 
which is administered under the Railway Labor Act, if an employee is discriminated 
against  or  discharged  for  filing  complaints  of  rail  safety  violations  or  testifying  in 
a  rail  safety  proceeding.  This  procedure  has  proven  to  be  ineffective  in  curtailing 
the  harassment  and  intimidation.  The  list  of  protected  activities  needs  greater  ex-
pansion,  and  there  needs  to  be  effective  employee  remedies.  As  for  remedies,  there 
are  current  provisions  for  compensatory  damages  and  for  punitive  damages  which 
need to be expanded to remove the cap on liability, and to provide an effective deter-
rent even when an employee is made whole for any wage loss as a result of retalia-
tion.  Additionally,  the  affected  employee  should  have  the  option  to  bring  an  action 
for  damages  in  court,  rather  than  the  cumbersome  procedures  under  the  Railway 
Labor  Act.  This  certainly  would  greatly  deter  anti-safety  harassment  in  the  indus-
try. 
Fatigue,  Time  on  Duty,  Deadhead  Transportation,  and  Sleeping  Quarters  in  Yards 
One of the most critical railroad safety issues involves the hours-of-service of rail 
workers.  This  covers  the  maximum  number  of  hours  an  employee  should  be  per-
mitted  to  work  each  day  and  each  week,  amount  of  undisturbed  rest  (i.e.,  calling 
time),  regular  scheduling,  and  being  required  to  remain  on  trains  after  the  max-
imum  time  on  duty  has  been  reached.  As  shown  by  numerous  studies,  there  is  an 
overwhelming  body  of  evidence  which  demonstrates  that  fatigue  is  endemic  in  the 
railroad industry. Those who have studied this issue agree that the problem is per-
vasive,  and  the  industry  has  not  adequately  addressed  it.  Railroad  operating  crews 
are typically plagued by chronic fatigue caused primarily by excessive hours of work 
coupled  with  inadequate  rest  time,  and  by  unpredictable  and  irregular  work  sched-
ules.  The  problems  experienced  by  the  workers  are  varied:  typically,  the  employee 
takes the few free hours he/she has off-duty to pay attention to personal and family 
matters; many experience circadian rhythm problems; employees are forced to work 
too  many  successive  days  without  a  day  off;  and  others  are  called  to  duty  sooner 
than expected. These problems have long been recognized in the industry. Not even 
the railroads can, with a straight face, dispute the evidence. Safety on the rails de-
pend  upon  compliance  with  the  safety  statutes  and  regulations  and  the  operating 
rules  of  the  railroads.  We  know  from  the  body  of  evidence  that  they  are  often  com-
promised by employees’ inability to obtain adequate rest. 

The  current  law  is  deficient  in  various  ways.  It  is  not  limited  to  the  employees’ 
weekly or monthly work hours, restrict the irregularity or unpredictability of on-call 
work schedules, or restrict commuting distances without compensatory time off. Ex-
tensive night work, irregular work schedules, extended work periods with few or no 
days off, and the policies and procedures that encompass such practices are permis-
sible  within  the  current  law.  (See,  Coplen,  M.  and  D.  Sussman,  Fatigue  and  Alert-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

ness  in  the  U.S.  Railroad  Industry  Part  II:  Fatigue  Research  in  the  Office  of  Re-
search and Development at the Federal Railroad Administration (March 2000). 

We  believe  the  remedy  is  to  give  the  FRA  authority  to  regulate  fatigue,  and  at 
the  same  time,  keeping  in  effect  the  statutory  protections  obtained  over  the  years. 
Also,  we  strongly  recommend  that  Congress  amend  the  law  to  require  that  waiting 
for  deadhead  transportation  and  deadhead  transportation  be  counted  as  time  on 
duty,  require  undisturbed  rest  (calling  time),  and  mandate  the  removal  of  the  few 
remaining sleeping quarters from rail yards. 

There have been numerous studies and recommendations regarding hours-of-serv-
ice.  The  time  for  Congressional  action  is  long  overdue.  Hopefully,  your  Committee 
will  make  the  needed  changes  in  the  law.  We  will  now  summarize  for  the  Com-
mittee  the  agencies  that  have  investigated  this  problem,  and  demonstrate  to  you 
that fatigue is unfortunately a reality working on the railroads. 

It  is  to  be  noted  that  in  1994  Congress  granted  FRA  a  limited  authority  to  ap-
prove  pilot  projects,  including  waivers  of  the  statute,  proposed  jointly  by  rail  labor 
and management. This has not proven to be very effective. 
Certification of Conductors 

In  1988  Congress  created  an  anomaly  by  requiring  FRA  to  disqualify  employees 
who were not performing work safely. However, it failed to address what should be 
the  minimum  ‘‘qualification’’  standards  for  rail  employees.  The  amendment  extends 
to conductors and trainmen the requirement for certification. Conductors and train-
men  perform  significant  safety-sensitive  functions,  and  should  have  formal  com-
petency requirements, as do engineers. 
Administrator’s Qualifications 

There  should  be  qualification  standards  for  FRA  Administrators  similar  to  provi-
sions which are contained in the NTSB law and appointees to the Surface Transpor-
tation  Board.  That  is,  the  Administrator  should  be  appointed  on  the  basis  of  tech-
nical  qualification,  professional  standing,  and  demonstrated  knowledge  in  transpor-
tation regulation and safety. 
Final Agency Action 

The  FRA  rarely  meets  statutory  deadlines  for  issuing  regulations,  or  in  respond-
ing to petitions by rail labor. One of the clearest examples of this deficiency is point-
ed  out  in  House  Report  102–205  on  H.R.  2607.1 There,  the  Committee  on  Energy 
and  Commerce  noted  that  4  major  rulemakings  required  to  be  completed  within  2 
years  or  less  by  the  Rail  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  1988  were  not  completed  by 
the statutory deadline. 

‘‘In  the  Committee’s  view,  section  23  mandated  that  the  Secretary  issue  grade 
crossing  signal  system  regulations  within  1  year  and  provided  the  Secretary 
with discretion only to determine the extent of such regulations.’’ 

In  the  1988  safety  law,  Congress  mandated  that  the  bridge  protection  standards 
for  maintenance  of  way  employees  be  issued  within  1  year.  The  Notice  of  Proposed 
Rulemaking  was  not  issued  until  January  30,  1991,  and  a  hearing  was  conducted 
on May 1, 1991. 

Regarding petitions filed by rail labor with the FRA, aside from the fact that they 
are  rarely,  if  ever,  granted,  FRA  historically  has  not  considered  them  within  the  1 
year  deadline  required  by  Congress  in  1976.  See,  49  U.S.C.  § 20103(b).  An  example 
of this is neglect is that the Brotherhood of Maintenance of Way Employees on May 
30,  1990  filed  a  petition  with  FRA  to  require  revisions  of  the  Federal  Track  Safety 
Standards  (FRA  Docket  No.  RST–90–1).  FRA  did  not  even  conduct  a  hearing  until 
after the 1 year deadline had passed. 

We  have  reviewed  each  statutory  limit  placed  upon  the  FRA  since  the  one  year 

requirement was enacted, and the FRA has rarely met the deadline. 
Studies by the Secretary 

There  are  a  number  of  studies  which  should  be  conducted  on  railroad  safety. 

These include: 

1. A detailed analysis of the quality of each railroad’s training program. 
2. A long term study of fatigue in the railroad industry. 
3.  The  safety  consequences  of  railroads  contracting  out  of  work  to  independent 
contractors. 
4.  The  safety  impact  of  drivers  of  railroad  crews  to  and  from  duty  assignment. 

1 H. Rep. No. 102–205 at p. 9. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

5. An evaluation of conflicting and confusing railroad operating rules. 
6. A follow-up study of the Switching Operations Fatalities Analysis (July 2001) 
and a follow-up study of Collision Analysis Working Group (July 2006). 
7. Locomotive cab environment and its impact on human performance. 

Conrail Regulation 

Section  711  of  the  Regional  Rail  Reorganization  Act  of  1973  (45  U.S.C.  § 797j), 
among  other  things,  prohibits  any  state  from  regulating  any  railroad  in  the  region. 
This  includes  18  states.  That  section  was  adopted  in  1981  to  deal  primarily  with 
the  full  crew  laws  where  Conrail  was  operating,  but  the  section,  as  adopted,  was 
much  broader  to  cover  all  regulation  by  the  states.  With  Conrail  mostly  gone,  the 
section has long ago fulfilled its purpose, and should be repealed. 
Incorporation of AAR Standards 

The  Federal  Government,  through  the  FRA,  delegates  the  authority  to  approve 
tank car designs to the AAR. Before any tank car may be used on the railroad sys-
tem, the AAR Tank Car Committee must approve of its use on the rails. The builder 
of  a  tank  car  must  apply  for  approval  of  the  design,  materials  and  construction,  to 
the AAR for consideration by its Committee on Tank Cars. 

The  power  brake  regulations  (See,  e.g.,  49  CFR  § 232.7),  relating  to  periodic  test-
ing  of  brakes  while  cars  are  in  the  shop  or  repair  track,  requires  the  tests  to  be 
performed in accordance with the AAR Code of Rules. 

The  problem  is  the  AAR  has  changed  the  rules  without  any  official  oversight  by 

FRA. 
Grants or Loans to Railroads 

This  arises  out  of  the  request  by  the  DM&E  railroad  for  a  $2.3  billion  loan  from 
FRA.  The  FRA  on  1/31/07  issued  a  Record  of  Decision  in  the  matter,  and  only  per-
functorily  dealt  with  the  safety  issues.  For  example,  it  misled  the  public  in  Figure 
3–1 regarding train accidents on DM&E. However, the FRA, in showing an improve-
ment  in  2006  over  2005,  did  not  bother  to  point  out  that  the  monetary  threshold 
for  reporting  accidents  increased  from  $6,700  in  2005  to  $7,700  in  2006,  a  16  per-
cent  increase.  Obviously,  this  is  a  large  reason  for  the  alleged  safety  improvement. 
The railroad over the years has had the worst safety record, or among the worst, 
compared  with  any  other  in  the  U.S.  (If  you  want  stats.,  let  me  know).  The  FRA 
didn’t think this was significant in considering the loan. 
A Felony To Violate Grade Crossing Signals 

It is obvious that something must be done, other than studying the crossing prob-
lem,  if  sufficient  funds  cannot  be  found  to  put  protected  crossings  everywhere.  The 
BEST  solution  is  to  place  adequate  sanctions  upon  those  who  don’t  obey  crossing 
warning signs. 
Training of Crews Transporting Hazardous Materials 

In  this  day  of  heightened  terror  threats,  coupled  with  the  necessity  for  crews  to 
transport  more  and  more  spent  nuclear  fuel,  etc.,  there  needs  to  be  a  certification 
that  the  crews  have  been  properly  trained.  The  railroads  are  doing  a  poor  job,  as 
will be shown in the testimony of Edward Wytkind, President of the Transportation 
Trades Department, AFL–CIO. 
Minimum Training Standards 

The  lack  of  training  in  the  industry  transcends  all  classes  of  the  railroad  work-
force. There are some FRA regulations which require training, but the extent of the 
training  is  left  to  each  carrier.  The  problem  is  that  due  to  the  revised  railroad  re-
tirement  law,  many  early  retirements  continue  to  occur.  The  industry  is  becoming 
younger  and  younger,  and  at  the  same  time  business  is  booming,  which  puts  pres-
sure on the railroads to place the employees into service without sufficient training. 
The lack of appropriate training is the number one safety issue facing the rail in-
dustry  today—and  it  should  be  of  significant  and  urgent  concern  to  the  Congress. 
These training deficiencies are not confined just to operating employees, but also in-
clude  train  dispatchers,  signal  employees,  maintenance  of  way  employees,  loco-
motive repair and servicing employees, and track inspectors. 

There  was  a  time  when  trainmen  and  yardmen  in  freight  and  passenger  service 
were naturals for becoming engineers. They possessed an impressive working knowl-
edge of the physical characteristics of the terrain, in-train forces and operating rules 
and  procedures.  These  veteran  operating  employees  had  only  to  become  proficient 
in applying this knowledge to their new craft while, at the same time, honing their 
train handling skills. Unfortunately, this is no longer a reality. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

As  our  aging  workforce  retires,  and  our  railroad  business  increases  dramatically, 
the  railroads  have  delayed  hiring  replacements.  As  a  result,  they  rush  new  hires 
through  shortened,  one-size-fits-all  training  programs.  It  is  not  uncommon  on  any 
train,  anywhere  in  America,  to  find  an  inexperienced  trainman  paired  with  a  new 
engineer. It is very unlikely the trainman received training over the territory he or 
she  is  working,  or  was  taught  the  special  problems  that  exist,  and  skills  required, 
in  regions  with  temperature  extremes,  heavy  grades  or  complex  operating  environ-
ments. Most troubling is that it is unlikely either the new trainman or new engineer 
were  provided  classroom  training  where  actual  application  of  the  operating  rules 
were  taught.  They  needed  only  to  memorize  rules—not  know  how  to  apply  them— 
in  order  to  graduate.  What’s  more,  most  veteran  employees  believe  that  recurrent 
training in the railroad industry has become a farce. 

Newly hired trainmen should not be required to work unsupervised or operate lo-
comotives until they are truly experienced in the trainman craft. This ensures they 
have become proficient in their train service and have gained needed on-the-job ex-
perience before assuming additional demanding duties and responsibilities. 

A  1  year  minimum  in  train  service  prior  to  becoming  a  conductor  would  improve 
the quality and competency of railroad operating employees, which equates to safer 
and more efficient operations. 

It  also  ensures  that  newly  hired  employees  will  have  approximately  2  years  of 
practical  railroad  experience  before  they  can  be  expected  to  operate  locomotives 
without direct supervision. 

The  attraction  and  retention  of  qualified  candidates  for  employment  and  their 
training  is  a  major  safety  issue  for  all  unions  in  the  rail  industry.  Unfortunately, 
the  rail  carriers  have  attempted  to  make  training  of  new  employees  an  issue  re-
served  exclusively  for  collective  bargaining,  where  the  carrier’s  only  concern  is  the 
cost  of  the  training.  The  large  turnover  in  new  railroad  operating  department  em-
ployees  has  a  direct  relationship  to  the  lack  of  experience  and  proper  training  in 
our  industry.  Many  new  employees  express  their  frustration  at  being  overwhelmed 
with the level of responsibility that they have received with poor training and little 
experience on the job. 

Another FRA initiative, the Switching Operations Fatality Analysis (SOFA) found 

that training and experience were critical safety issues. 

The rail industry is absorbing a record number of new employees in every depart-
ment while operating at maximum capacity because of the record levels of rail traf-
fic.  UTU  has  attempted  to  address  the  inadequate  training  issues  in  every  forum, 
including  the  collective  bargaining  arena,  with  very  little  progress.  The  railroads 
have been reluctant to recognize that the adequacy of training is a genuine problem 
and  have  not  addressed  this  issue  with  the  unions  in  a  meaningful  manner.  They 
have  refused  to  even  allow  FRA  to  offer  their  expertise  in  training  techniques,  and 
have  declined  labor’s  offers  to  establish  of  cooperative  mentoring  programs  for  the 
critical  component  of  ‘‘On  the  Job  Training’’.  The  rail  industry  will  have  more  than 
80,000 new employees in the next 5 years. Unless we can quickly eliminate training 
as the major safety issue, we can only expect this negative trend in safety analysis 
to accelerate. 
Venue 

This  really  is  not  a  lawyer  issue;  rather  it  is  for  the  injured  citizens  in  a  state, 
and  injured  workers.  First,  when  citizens  are  injured  as  in  Minot,  ND  a  few  years 
ago,  the  railroads  force  the  cases  into  Federal  court  which,  for  many,  was  located 
a long distance away from the homes of the injured. Also, we need not tell you how 
burdened the Federal courts calendars are these days. State courts should be avail-
able when alleging violations of Federal safety regulations. State judges are just as 
competent as many Federal judges to rule on preemption. 

Regarding operating crews and maintenance of way employees, they travel some-
times  hundreds  of  miles  from  home  in  their  work.  Injuries  most  often  occur  many 
miles  from  home.  The  railroads  always  attempt  to  have  the  case  tried  as  far  away 
from the employees’ residence as possible, so that it will be inconvenient and expen-
sive  for  the  plaintiff.  The  employee  is  treated  at  his/her  place  of  residence  and 
should  have  the  option  of  filing  suit  where  he/she  lives,  rather  than  hundreds  of 
miles away. Thousands of motions have been filed by the carriers to have the venue 
chosen by the plaintiff to be removed to another court. 
Local Safety Hazard 

Many of the state public utilities commissions are seeking to delete the local safe-
ty  hazard  provision  contained  in  49  U.S.C.  § 20106(1).  The  National  Association  of 
Regulatory  Utility  Commissions  has  issued  a  resolution  recommending  that  Con-
gress  eliminate  the  local  hazard  section.  We  support  this  change.  Virtually  every 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

time a state attempts to regulate an area, the railroads challenge the proposal. Most 
courts rule Federal preemption even though the FRA has not covered the particular 
problem.  By  simply  eliminating  the  ‘‘local  safety  hazard’’  provision,  the  states  still 
could  not  regulate  if  it  conflicted  with  a  FRA  regulation  or  was  an  undue  burden 
on interstate commerce. 
State Common Law 

The courts in the cases arising out of the Minot, ND accident have ruled that the 
citizens  injured  have  no  rights  to  seek  damages  because  the  state’s  common  law  is 
preempted  by  the  Federal  railroad  safety  laws.  This  is  an  outrageous  decision,  and 
even the President of the Association of American Railroads testifying in the House 
safety hearings stated that the industry disagreed with the decisions. 

Congress is dealing with this matter in the pending transportation security legis-
lation  which  is  in  conference.  Hopefully,  this  will  be  corrected  in  that  bill.  If  not, 
we urge you to place a provision in the safety legislation. 
Prompt Medical Attention 

First, the existing regulation addressing this issue is completely ineffective in as-
suring  the  employee  receives  prompt  medical  attention.  It  provides  that  a  railroad 
shall have in place an Internal Control Plan which shall include, in absolute terms, 
that  harassment  or  intimidation  of  any  person  that  is  calculated  to  discourage  or 
prevent  such  person  from  receiving  proper  medical  treatment  or  from  reporting  an 
accident, incident, injury or illness will not be permitted or tolerated and will result 
in  disciplinary  action  against  such  person  committing  the  harassment  or  intimida-
tion. I am unaware of FRA ever enforcing this provision. 

This  above  provision  does  not  cover  matters  such  as  allowing  the  employee  to  go 
to  the  hospital  before  being  forced  to  give  a  formal  statement  to  a  supervisor  or 
claim  agent,  or  go  to  the  scene  of  the  accident  first  with  the  supervisor;  it  doesn’t 
require  the  railroad  to  provide  prompt  transportation  to  the  employee;  there  is  no 
protection regarding harassment; and simply following the plan of a treating physi-
cian  is  not  addressed.  A  recent  Federal  court  decision  held  that  an  Illinois  statute 
mandating  prompt  medical  attention  was  preempted.  See,  attached  summary  judg-
ment  in  BN/SF,  et.  al  v.  Charles  Box,  et.  al.,  No.  06–3052,  C.D.D.C.  Ill.,  1/18/07. 
Other  states  have  adopted  similar  legislation,  which  is  being  challenged.  A  Federal 
amendment is needed to correct this problem. 
Alcohol and Controlled Substances Testing 

We  strongly  believe  that  railroads  should  be  required  to  conduct  all  toxicological 
testing  under  the  same  protections  as  required  under  the  Federal  alcohol  and  drug 
testing  regulations.  There  are  many  abuses  connected  with  the  testing  conducted 
under  the  railroads  own  testing  program.  For  example,  some  carriers  do  not  allow 
a  split  sample  to  be  retested  by  the  employee.  Each  railroad  has  its  own  internal 
policies  for  testing,  and  protections  for  the  integrity  of  such  testing  is  not  present 
in many instances. Therefore, we request that in the event a railroad conducts toxi-
cological  testing  of  its  employees  under  its  own  program,  such  testing  be  conducted 
under the same protocols and procedures of Title 49, C.F.R., Parts 219 and 40. 
Mexican Railroads and Employees 

The railroads whose tracks connect with Mexico continue to seek waivers from the 
FRA  regulations  to  allow  Mexican  workers  make  the  tests  and  inspections  in  Mex-
ico,  and/or  to  allow  trains  to  enter  the  U.S.  without  proper  inspections  on  the  U.S. 
side of the border. This should not be allowed for various reasons. Significantly, the 
U.S.  cannot  oversee  the  quality  of  testing  inside  Mexico.  Also,  Mexican  engineers 
entering  the  U.S.  do  not  have  the  same  qualifications  as  U.S.  certified  engineers. 
Critical Incident Stress Plan 

This amendment seeks to require a critical incident stress plan similar to that in 
place  at  the  FAA.  It  is  designed  to  proactively  manage  the  disruptive  factors  that 
an  employee  usually  experiences  after  an  accident/incident.  It  is  designed  to  mini-
mize  the  impact  upon  the  employee.  Rapid  access  to  a  CIS  program  following  an 
accident will minimize the duration and severity of the distress associated with such 
an event. As with the airline industry, the employee involved will be removed from 
service immediately, and those involved in witnessing the event, upon request, shall 
be relieved as soon as feasible. 

The  railroads  are  a  mixed  bag  in  dealing  with  this  problem—some  do  a  decent 

job, while others act as if no problem exists. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Additional Safety Inspectors and User Fees 

In  1977  the  FRA  issued  a  comprehensive  5-year  plan  for  attacking  the  safety 
problems  in  the  rail  industry.  In  the  proposal  entitled  ‘‘Safety  System  Plan,  Sep-
tember 1977,’’ the FRA stated that 800 safety personnel were necessary at the agen-
cy.  As  testified  by  FRA  Administrator  Boardman  on  1/30/07  in  the  House  the  total 
inspection staff today is 400. The number of miles of track in operation are greater 
than in 1977 (173,000 in 1977 and 219,000 today); over 1.6 million locomotives and 
cars  in  operation  today  vs.  1.7  million  freight  cars  and  33,000  locomotives  in  1977. 
It  should  be  kept  in  mind  that,  as  noted  by  the  GAO  testimony  on  1/30/07,  FRA 
today is only able to inspect 0.2 percent of the railroads operations each year. Also, 
in  a  recent  report  by  the  GAO  entitled  RAIL  SAFETY  ‘‘The  Federal  Railroad  Ad-
ministration  is  Taking  Steps  to  Better  Target  its  Oversight,  but  Assessment  of  Re-
sults is Needed to Determine Impact’’ (Jan. 2007), it stated at p. 57: 

‘‘FRA  inspectors  cite  many  defects,  but  cite  comparatively  few  of  these  defects 
as  violations  warranting  enforcement  action.  Since  1996,  FRA  inspectors  have 
cited  an  average  of  about  4  violations  for  every  100  defects  cited  annually.  Ac-
cording to FRA officials, inspectors cite relatively few defects as violations war-
ranting enforcement action because FRA’s focused enforcement policy guides in-
spectors  to  cite  violations  only  for  problems  that  pose  safety  risks.  In  addition, 
inspectors  have  discretion  in  citing  a  defect  or  a  violation  for  a  given  instance 
of noncompliance—FRA directs inspectors to first seek and obtain the railroad’s 
voluntary compliance with the rail safety regulations.’’ 

Warning in Non-Signaled Territory 

The  NTSB  recommendation  in  its  report  of  the  Graniteville,  SC  accident  which 
occurred on Jan. 6, 2005 seeks to rectify a nationwide problem in non-signaled terri-
tory  to  protect  against  a  misaligned  switch.  This  is  long  overdue.  There  should  be 
visual or electronic warning to crews to clearly convey the status of a switch, so that 
a train can safely stop if the switch is misaligned. 
Seniority for Workers Seeking Federal Employment 

Many  very  qualified  employees  have  refused  Federal  employment  because  of  the 
current restrictions which require the person to give up his/her seniority in the rail-
road industry. This creates a penalty upon the employee without any benefit to the 
public  or  the  government.  An  employee  of  the  Federal  Government,  who  previously 
was  a  railroad  employee  covered  under  a  collective  bargaining  agreement,  should 
have  the  right  to  return  to  the  craft  or  class  on  the  carrier  with  which  he/she  was 
employed. If he/she returns to the railroad industry, such employee should be placed 
in  his/her  former  position  and  retain  all  prior  seniority  and  accrue  seniority  with 
said  carrier  from  the  date  the  employee  became  an  employee  of  the  said  Federal 
agency.  The  employee  should  also  continue  to  accrue  all  rights  and  benefits  under 
the  applicable  collective  bargaining  agreement  during  the  time  he/she  held  a  posi-
tion with the Federal Government. 

ATTACHMENT 2 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF W.  DAN PICKETT,  INTERNATIONAL PRESIDENT,  BROTHER-
HOOD OF RAILROAD SIGNALMEN BEFORE THE U.S.  HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, 
COMMITTEE ON TRANSPORTATION AND INFRASTRUCTURE,  SUBCOMMITTEE ON RAIL-
ROADS 

February 13, 2007 

Good  Morning.  I  would  like  to  thank  Ms.  Corrine  Brown,  Chairperson  and  Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee.  It  is  an  honor  for  me  to  testify  today  on  fatigue  in  the  rail 
industry,  a  subject  of  great  concern  to  this  country  and  to  all  employees  of  the  Na-
tion’s railroads. 

My name is Dan Pickett, and I am the International President of the Brotherhood 
of Railroad Signalmen. The Brotherhood of Railroad Signalmen (‘‘BRS’’), a labor or-
ganization  with  headquarters  at  917  Shenandoah  Shores  Road,  Front  Royal,  Vir-
ginia,  22630–6418,  submits  the  following  comments  concerning  fatigue  in  the  rail 
industry. 

BRS, founded in 2001, represents approximately 9,000 members working for rail-
roads across the United States and Canada. Signalmen install, maintain and repair 
the  signal  systems  that  railroads  utilize  to  direct  train  movements.  Signalmen  also 
install  and  maintain  the  grade  crossing  signal  systems  used  at  highway-railroad 
intersections,  which  play  a  vital  role  in  ensuring  the  safety  of  highway  travelers. 
Throughout  our  entire  existence,  the  BRS  has  dedicated  itself  to  making  the  rail-
road workplace safer, not just for rail workers, but also for the public at large. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

Before  any  discussion  of  fatigue  in  the  rail  industry  can  even  begin,  it  should  be 
noted  that  the  rail  industry  is  moving  more  freight  with  fewer  employees  than  at 
any time in the history of railroading. This is a critical point that must be acknowl-
edged. Through mergers and railroad managements’ never ending quest to eliminate 
workers,  railroad  staffing  levels  are  at  an  all  time  low  and  continue  to  drop.  Those 
railroad  employees  that  are  left  are  working  longer  hours  for  many  days  at  a 
stretch. A 12 to 16 hour day is not unusual for a railroad worker and in many cases 
it  is  the  norm.  Railroads  are  abusing  the  very  asset  that  is  their  most  important 
resource. 

The  BRS  seeks  to  amend  the  Hours  of  Service  Act  for  signalmen.  Currently  the 
Hours  of  Service  Act  (HOS)  allows  individuals  performing  signal  duties  to  work  12 
hours  in  a  24  period  with  an  emergency  clause  provision  that  allows  for  an  addi-
tional 4 hours-of-service in a 24-hour period. The BRS seeks to eliminate the 4 hour 
emergency provision due to the abuse by the railroad industry. 

When the HOS Act was expanded to include signalmen in 1976, it was envisioned 
and intended to be a 12-hour law. It should be noted that is how the railroads origi-
nally applied the law. If signal personnel needed additional time to correct a signal 
problem they would inform their lower lever supervisor that they were approaching 
the  12-hour  limit  of  the  HOS  Act  and  the  supervisor  would  make  a  decision  based 
on their experience if the individual could finish the work within 12 hours, or if an-
other  signal  employee  would  be  called  to  finish  the  repair  work.  However,  through 
gradual ‘‘creep’’ by the railroads the law has become a 16-hour law. Most, if not all, 
Class  I  railroads  have  issued  instructions  to  signal  personnel  that  ‘‘everything’’  is 
an  ‘‘emergency’’  and  it  is  not  necessary  to  call  anyone.  When  the  law  was  new,  it 
worked well, and for years the railroads limited signal workers to 12 hours of work 
in a 24-hour period. Now however, signal employees have seen the law mutate into 
a 16-hour law. Many railroads have official or unofficial policies that state that any 
signal  problem  is  an  ‘‘emergency’’  and  workers  need  not  contact  their  supervisors 
for an interpretation. 

Signal employees are instructed to work up until the 16-hour limit before they call 
for any relief personnel. In some cases, the railroads authorize outright violation of 
the HOS Act and order signal employees to continue working until they are finished 
with the repair work. That is why it is necessary to remove the four-hour emergency 
provision  in  its  entirety.  This  discretion  combined  with  the  railroads  tendency  to 
push the limits of the law have morphed the HOS Act and is contrary to the inten-
tions of the 1976 Congress. 

Of  even  greater  concern  is  when  a  BRS  member  can  work  20  hours  in  a  24-hour 
period  without  adequate  rest.  For  example:  On  Day  1  a  signalmen  goes  to  sleep  at 
21:00  and  awakens  at  05:00  to  arrive  for  his  regular  shift  on  Day  2  at  07:00  to 
15:00.  Under  the  current  law  at  15:00  p.m.  his  ‘‘rest’’  period  starts.  At  23:00  he  is 
considered  fully  rested  and  a  new  24-hour  clock  begins.  In  many  cases  it  is  highly 
likely that he may have just gone to sleep at 22:00. After less than 2 hours of sleep 
he then receives a call to work at 00:00 a.m. on Day 3. He works 4 additional hours 
and  is  finished  with  the  trouble  call  at  04:00.  He  then  travels  home  and  then  has 
to  return  to  work  for  his  regular  shift  of  07:00  to  15:00.  The  cumulative  effect  of 
the law on the individual is that he is allowed to work a total of 20 hours-of-service 
within  a  32-hour  period.  While  the  employee  has  had  12  hours  off,  he  has  gotten 
virtually no sleep. 

This situation is exasperated further when railroads then require signal personnel 
to  work  an  additional  4  hours  under  the  emergency  provision.  Additionally,  if  an 
‘‘emergency’’  occurs  at  the  end  of  his  shift,  the  railroad  could  require  him  to  work 
an  additional  4  hours  from  15:00  until  19:00.  The  cumulative  effect  of  the  law  on 
the individual would now be that he is allowed to work a total of 24 hours-of-service 
within a 40-hour period with virtually no sleep. This type of work schedule is a rec-
ipe  for  disaster.  This  is  especially  true  when  you  consider  that  after  being  off-duty 
for  a  period  of  10  hours,  2  hours  which  are  spent  traveling  to  and  from  work,  the 
signal  employee  has  to  return  to  work  for  his  regular  shift  at  07:00  and  can  then 
work another 16 hours before he is entitled to another rest period. It is possible that 
after  waking  at  05:00  on  Day  2,  a  signal  employee  may  get  only  8  hours  of  actual 
sleep  in  a  66-hour  period.  See  Appendix  A  for  further  explanation  of  this  scenario. 
The  BRS  asks  that  the  Hours  of  Service  Act  be  amended  to  require  that  employ-
ees  performing  signal  work  receive  at  least  8  hours  of  actual  rest  during  a  24  hour 
period.  What  drives  our  request  is  the  fact  that  many,  if  not  all,  of  the  railroads 
willfully  abuse  the  HOS  Act.  For  example,  when  the  railroad  receives  emergency 
calls  (prior  to  the  end  of  the  8  hours  of  required  rest)  they  will  delay  calling  signal 
personnel  until  8  hours  have  passed  since  the  end  of  their  scheduled  shift  or  their 
last additional duty so that they can start a new 24-hour clock. This is unacceptable. 
The  railroads  are  aware  that  the  signal  personnel  have  probably  not  received  ade-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

quate  rest.  All  the  railroads  care  about  is  getting  a  new  24-hour  clock  started  so 
that they can work the individual 12 to 16 additional hours. 

Chairman Oberstar, you have gone on the record saying, ‘‘In previous Congresses, 
I  have  introduced  legislation  to  strengthen  hours-of-service.  The  railroads  fought 
against it, stating that hours-of-service should be a dealt with at the collective bar-
gaining table. I believe that the safety of railroad workers and the safety of the gen-
eral  public  which  all  too  often  are  the  victims  in  these  train  accidents,  should  not 
be relegated to a negotiation agreement between management and labor. This Con-
gress has a responsibility to prevent fatigue.’’ 

Chairlady  Brown,  I  could  not  agree  more.  As  explained  in  my  earlier  testimony, 
the  railroads  have  manipulated  a  12-hour  Congressional  Hours  of  Service  Act  into 
a 16-hour law. In fact the situation is even worse in the industry than what I have 
explained  so  far.  The  Brotherhood  of  Railroad  Signalmen  is  currently  engaged  in 
National Negotiations with the railroads to reach a new agreement over wages, ben-
efits  and  work  rules.  The  railroads  have  targeted  the  employees  I  represent  during 
these negotiations. The railroads want work rule provisions that allow them to sub-
contract  our  safety-sensitive  signal  work  to  the  lowest  bidder.  While  I  will  not  go 
into  the  inherent  degradation  of  safety  by  having  untrained  and  unskilled  contrac-
tors performing signal work I will explain one of the main reasons that the railroads 
want to subcontract this work. Contractors are not covered by the Hours of Service 
Act.  I  will  repeat  this.  Contractors  are  not  covered  by  the  Hours  of  Service  Act.  If 
the  railroads  persevere  in  this  pursuit  they  will  have  found  away  to  supercede  the 
intent of Congress by employing individuals to perform safety-sensitive signal work 
who do not have to comply with the provisions of the Hours of Service Act. 

They will be able to hire contractors who can work an unlimited number of contin-
uous  hours  performing  safety  sensitive  signal  work.  While  the  railroad  owners  say 
that they are trying to find ways to combat fatigue in the railroad industry, the re-
ality is they are trying to find ways to supercede the safety provisions contained in 
the Hours of Service Act. 

The inability to perform adequate testing and the failure to comply with minimum 
Federal  regulations  have  contributed,  if  not  caused  many  recent  railroad  accidents. 
In  their  never  ending  zeal  to  focus  on  the  financial  bottom  line,  railroads  have  al-
lowed staffing levels to fall below the minimum needed to perform basic safety func-
tions. Additionally the railroads are not through with their desire to further reduce 
manpower  levels.  The  railroads  are  currently  pushing  very  hard  to  reduce  train 
crew size to a single person, and the implementation of Remote-Control-Locomotives 
(RCL) is proliferating as I speak here today. 
Training and Education 

Training  and  education  is  another  key  preventive  measure  that  needs  to  be  con-
sidered.  Rail  labor  considers  it  equally  important  to  provide  Advanced  Training  to 
improve  the  skills  of  the  professional  men  and  women  that  install  and  maintain 
safety systems for the rail industry. This is an area that will increase productivity, 
improve  safety  and  reduce  fatigue.  A  signal  employee  that  receives  advanced  and 
recurrent training is a more productive employee who can solve the emergency prob-
lems  that  they  encounter  in  less  time  than  one  who  is  lacking  the  necessary  skills. 
Often  signal  problems  are  caused  by  a  signal  appliance  indicating  that  a  rail  is 
broken  or  a  switch  is  not  properly  aligned  or  a  track  is  flooded.  A  signalman  must 
know  the  action  to  take  to  provide  safety  for  the  public  and  the  rail  carrier  before 
considering how to repair the problem. 

By being more efficient, the trained signal employee spends less time in the field 
and therefore encounters less fatigue. Rail labor will continue to work to implement 
training provisions which were agreed to by the industry—but to date have not been 
implemented on many of our Nation’s railroads. 
Conclusion 

There  is  little  question  that  more  must  be  done  to  eliminate  fatigue  in  the  rail 
industry in general and to signal employees specifically. Signalmen install, maintain 
and  repair  the  signal  systems  that  railroads  utilize  to  direct  train  movements.  Sig-
nalmen  also  install  and  maintain  the  grade  crossing  signal  systems  used  at  high-
way-railroad  intersections.  As  such  it  is  in  the  best  interest  of  the  traveling  public 
and the employees that work for the railroad that Congress act to solve the problem 
of fatigue for signalmen in the rail industry. 

An adequately staffed signal department of well-trained, well-rested signalmen is 
needed to make the critical safety-sensitive decisions that are a routine part of their 
daily  duties.  Signal  employees  often  work  alone  in  the  worst  weather  conditions  in 
some  of  the  most  demanding  terrain  and  it  is  imperative  that  these  workers  have 
the opportunity to perform their duties after receiving adequate rest. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

There  is  much  to  accomplish  to  eliminate  fatigue  in  the  rail  industry  in  order  to 
make  the  Nation’s  railroads  safer  for  communities  across  the  country  and  for  the 
employees of the railroads. Experience teaches us that it is Congress that must pro-
vide  the  leadership  to  make  safety  a  reality.  I  hope  we  can  work  together  to  see 
that improved safety practices become a reality. 

On  behalf  of  rail  labor  and  the  Brotherhood  of  Railroad  Signalmen  I  appreciate 
this opportunity to testify before the Committee. At this time I would be more than 
pleased to answer any questions. 

Day 1 

00:00 
01:00 
02:00 
03:00 
04:00 
05:00 
06:00 
07:00 
08:00 
09:00 
10:00 
11:00 
12:00 
13:00 
14:00 
15:00 
16:00 
17:00 
18:00 
19:00 
20:00 
21:00 sleep 
22:00 sleep 
23:00 sleep 

APPENDIX A 

Day 2 

Day 3 

Day 4 

00:00 sleep 
01:00 sleep 
02:00 sleep 
03:00 sleep 
04:00 sleep 
05:00 wake for work 
06:00 travel to work 
07:00 regular work 
08:00 regular work 
09:00 regular work 
10:00 regular work 
11:00 regular work 
12:00 regular work 
13:00 regular work 
14:00 regular work 
15:00 regular work 
16:00 off duty 
17:00 off duty 
18:00 off duty 
19:00 off duty 
20:00 off duty 
21:00 off duty 
22:00 off duty 
23:00 off duty 

00:00 emergency call 
01:00 emergency call 
02:00 emergency call 
03:00 emergency call 
04:00 travel home 
05:00 off duty 
06:00 travel to work 
07:00 regular work 
08:00 regular work 
09:00 regular work 
10:00 regular work 
11:00 regular work 
12:00 regular work 
13:00 regular work 
14:00 regular work 
15:00 regular work 
16:00 emergency call 
17:00 emergency call 
18:00 emergency call 
19:00 emergency call 
20:00 off duty/travel 
21:00 sleep 
22:00 sleep 
23:00 sleep 

00:00 sleep 
01:00 sleep 
02:00 sleep 
03:00 sleep 
04:00 sleep 
05:00 wake for work 
06:00 travel to work 
07:00 regular work 
08:00 regular work 
09:00 regular work 
10:00 regular work 
11:00 regular work 
12:00 regular work 
13:00 regular work 
14:00 regular work 
15:00 regular work 
16:00 emergency call 
17:00 emergency call 
18:00 emergency call 
19:00 emergency call 
20:00 emergency call 
21:00 emergency call 
22:00 emergency call 
23:00 emergency call 

In  the  above  scenario,  after  waking  at  05:00  on  day  two,  a  signal  employee  can 
be  awake  for  40  continuous  hours;  traveling  to,  or  working  30  of  those  40  hours, 
then  after  ‘‘receiving’’  10  hours  of  rest  (of  which  the  actual  sleep  may  only  be  8 
hours),  the  signal  employee  could  then  work  an  additional  16  hours.  It  is  possible 
that  after  waking  at  05:00  on  day  two,  a  signal  employee  may  receive  only  8  hours 
of actual sleep in a 66-hour period. The above scenario would be in total compliance 
with  the  Hours  of  Service  Act,  as  currently  written,  pertaining  to  employees  who 
perform signal service. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Wytkind.  I  regret  that  I 
didn’t  note  that  you  were  the  President  of  the  Transportation 
Trades Department of the AFL–CIO. 

We have with us Ed Hamberger, President and CEO of the Asso-
ciation of American Railroads and Mr. Richard F. Timmons, Presi-
dent and Treasurer of the American Short Line and Regional Rail-
road  Association.  And  I  thank  you  all.  And  now  if  you  would,  Mr. 
Hamberger, please proceed. 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND 

CEO, ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I appreciate the op-
portunity to be here to address rail safety and at the outset let me 
emphasize  that  the  rail  industry’s  safety  record  is  excellent  and 
getting better. 

Since  1980,  the  train  accident  rate  is  down  69  percent.  The  em-
ployee casualty rate is down 81 percent and the highway-rail grade 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

crossing  incident  rate  is  down  76  percent.  The  employee  accident 
rate  and  the  grade  crossing  accident  rate  in  2006  were  the  best 
ever in this industry. And the train accident rate was just fraction-
ally higher than the record low set a few years ago. 

And  as  you  pointed  out,  Mr.  Chairman,  this  is  occurring  at  a 
time  when  traffic  is  growing  exponentially.  And  at  a  time,  as  Mr. 
Wytkind points out, where we have new employees coming into the 
industry. Which must mean that we are doing one heck of a job of 
training these new employees and integrating them into our work-
force, if we are able to set these record levels of safety. 

Senator  Smith  asked  where  the  industry  stands  in  respect  to 
other  transportation  industries.  In  my  written  statement  the  U.S. 
Department of Labor data indicate that railroads today have lower 
employee injury rates than other modes of transportation including 
air  and  truck  and  most  other  major  industry  groups  and  below  all 
private industry. So in fact, we are one of, if not the safest industry 
in the country. 

Having said that, there’s obviously still work to be done. One key 
way  to  improve  safety  is  to  upgrade  the  quality  of  the  infrastruc-
ture,  as  you  have  pointed  out,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  the  facts  are 
that  railroads  are  investing  now  more  in  their  infrastructure  than 
ever  before.  Last  year  we  put  a  record  $8.6  billion  into  capital  ex-
penditures  for  upgrading  tracks  and  signals,  new  freight  cars  and 
new  locomotives.  This  year  the  industry  plan  is  to  invest  even 
more, a record $9.4 billion in capital expenditures to make us more 
efficient and safer. 

And  I  emphasize  that  that  is  just  CapEx.  We  spend  an  equal 
amount  of  money  on  maintenance  capital  to  maintain  the  system 
that’s  already  there.  Part  of  this  investment  is  dedicated  to  tech-
nology which is playing a major role in making railroads safer. 

For example wheel profile monitors that use lasers and optics to 
capture  images  of  wheels  as  the  car  is  moving  by  signaling  that  a 
wheel  set  needs  to  be  changed  before  an  accident  can  occur.  Simi-
larly rail defect detector cars use laser technology to detect internal 
rail flaws before a broken rail can cause an accident. 

Railroads  are  also  moving  forward  with  advanced  train  control 
systems  that  can  help  prevent  accidents  by  automatically  stopping 
or slowing trains before they exceed their authority. These systems 
are  complex  and  must  include  reliable  technology  to  warn  loco-
motive  engineers  of  a  potential  problem;  and  then  be  able  to  take 
action, if necessary, independent of the engineer to prevent the ac-
cident  from  occurring.  We  are  committed  to  the  development  and 
implementation of this technology where it is appropriate and at a 
pace permitted by available funds. 

We continue to seek other ways to improve safety. And one issue 
of particular concern is fatigue. It is not in the railroad’s best inter-
est  to  have  employees  who  are  too  tired  to  perform  their  duties 
properly.  Consequently,  individual  railroads  are  pursing  a  variety 
of  fatigue  countermeasures  based  on  what  they  have  found  to  be 
most effective for their particular operating environments. And our 
data indicate that 83 percent of rail employees work less than 200 
hours a month; 95 percent work less than 250 hours a month. 

You  heard  from  the  NTSB  that  the  maximum  number  in  the 
maritime  industry  is  360,  for  truckers  it’s  350.  We  have  proposed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

in legislation on the House side to cap the number of hours at 276, 
well  below  either  of  those  industries  and  well  below  the  current 
statutory  allowance.  I  would  hope  that  rail  labor  would  join  us  in 
that  statutory  cap.  We  are  amenable  to  examining  the  Hours  of 
Service  Act.  I  have  made  those  suggestions  in  my  written  testi-
mony. 

And let me close by addressing hazmat transportation. Each year 
railroads  move  up  to  1.8  million  carloads  of  hazardous  materials 
with  extraordinary  safety,  some  99.997  percent  of  all  cars  moving 
from  origin  to  destination  without  any  release  of  material  due  to 
a train accident. The biggest concern, of course, lies with the subset 
of  hazmat  known  as  Toxic  Inhalation  Hazards,  or  TIH.  Each  year 
railroads move about 100,000 carloads of TIH. 

The  Federal  Government  requires  railroads  to  transport  these 
materials  whether  the  railroad  wants  to  or  not.  Without  that  com-
mon  carrier  obligation  I  believe  that  some  railroads  would  not 
transport  TIH  materials  because  of  the  potentially  ruinous  claims 
that  could  arise  from  a  catastrophic  event.  The  current  environ-
ment for the rail transportation of TIH is untenable. 

We  are  asking  Congress  to  consider  legislation  similar  to  the 
Price-Anderson Act governing the nuclear industry. It is impossible 
to  carry  enough  insurance  to  cover  a  widespread  catastrophic 
event. Without a statutory cap on liability each train carrying TIH 
material is literally a bet-the-company event. Without such legisla-
tion,  railroads  would  be  forced  to  consider  the  option  of  seeking  to 
remove the common carrier obligation to haul TIH. 

In  the  meantime  we  have  implemented  new  standards  for  tank 
cars carrying chlorine and anhydrous ammonia effective January 1, 
2008.  We  also  support  the  accelerated  development  and  use  of  in-
herently  safer  technologies  as  substitutes  for  toxic  inhalation  haz-
ard  materials.  Product  substitution  has  been  endorsed  by  both  the 
National  Research  Council  and  the  Government  Accountability  Of-
fice. 

Let  me  reiterate  that  safety  is  our  top  priority  and  we  believe 
that shows through our ever improving safety record. We are com-
mitted to working with you, others in Congress, our employees and 
our  customers  to  ensure  that  rail  safety  continues  to  improve. 
Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hamberger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

On behalf of the members of the Association of American Railroads (AAR), thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  address  rail  safety.  AAR  members  account  for  the  vast 
majority  of  freight  railroad  mileage,  employees,  and  traffic  in  Canada,  Mexico,  and 
the United States. 
Overview of Rail Safety 

For  railroads,  pursuing  safe  operations  is  not  an  option,  it  is  an  imperative.  It 
makes  business  sense  and  it’s  the  right  thing  to  do.  Through  massive  investments 
in  safety-enhancing  infrastructure,  equipment,  and  technology;  extensive  employee 
training; cooperation with labor, suppliers, customers, communities, and the Federal 
Railroad  Administration  (FRA);  cutting-edge  research  and  development;  and  stead-
fast  commitment  to  applicable  laws  and  regulations,  railroads  are  at  the  forefront 
of advancing safety. 

The  overall  U.S.  rail  industry  safety  record  is  excellent.  As  an  FRA  official  noted 
in February 2007 testimony to Congress, ‘‘The railroads have an outstanding record 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

in  moving  all  goods  safely.’’  Rail  safety  continues  to  improve.  In  fact,  in  aggregate 
2006  was  the  safest  year  for  railroads  ever.  According  to  FRA  data,  the  rail  em-
ployee  casualty  rate  in  2006  was  the  lowest  in  history,  having  fallen  81  percent 
since  1980.  Likewise,  the  grade  crossing  collision  rate  in  2006  was  the  lowest  ever, 
having fallen 76 percent since 1980. And from 1980 to 2006, railroads reduced their 
overall  train  accident  rate  by  69  percent.  The  train  accident  rate  in  2006  was  just 
fractionally higher than the record low. 

Decades  ago,  railroads  were  among  the  most  dangerous  industries  to  work  for. 
That’s no longer true. In fact, according to U.S. Department of Labor data, railroads 
today  have  lower  employee  injury  rates  than  other  modes  of  transportation  and 
most  other  major  industry  groups,  including  agriculture,  construction,  manufac-
turing, and private industry as a whole. Available data also indicate that U.S. rail-
roads  have  employee  injury  rates  well  below  those  of  most  major  foreign  railroads. 

Railroads  are  proud  of  their  safety  record,  which  results  from  railroads’  recogni-
tion  of  their  responsibilities  regarding  safety  and  the  enormous  resources  they  de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
R
A
A
2
2
5

.

s
p
e
1
R
A
A
2
2
5

76 

vote  to  its  advancement.  At  the  same  time,  railroads  want  rail  safety  to  continue 
to  improve.  Railroads  are  always  willing  to  work  cooperatively  with  you,  other  pol-
icymakers,  the  FRA,  rail  employees,  and  others  to  find  practical,  effective  ways  to 
make this happen. 

A  commitment  to  safety  that  permeates  the  workplace  is  critical  to  promoting 
safety.  Railroads  have  that  commitment.  But  a  healthy  balance  sheet  is  important 
to  safety  as  well.  A  financially-viable  railroad  will  be  in  a  much  better  position  to 
invest in safety enhancements (e.g., heavier rail, newer freight cars and locomotives, 
technology  R&D,  more  sophisticated  training,  and  so  on)  than  a  financially-weak 
carrier.  The  record  investments  that  railroads  have  made  in  their  infrastructure, 
equipment,  and  technology  in  recent  years  have  made  railroads  much  safer,  and 
these  investments  were  made  possible  by  the  moderate  improvements  in  profit-
ability  that  railroads  have  enjoyed.  Consequently,  legislative  or  regulatory  actions 
that  created  significant  new  spending  requirements  and/or  unduly  restricted  rail 
earnings  could  have  unintended  negative  safety  consequences  in  addition  to  nega-
tive capacity, efficiency, and service reliability consequences. 

Of course, no budget is unlimited, even for something as important as safety and 
even  for  railroads  that  have  experienced  financial  improvement  in  recent  years. 
Safety will not be advanced if resources are spent on programs that do little to im-
prove safety or if unfunded mandates lock up resources that would have a more sig-
nificant  impact  on  safety  if  spent  elsewhere.  Unnecessary  and  unfunded  mandates 
would  also  serve  to  increase  the  cost  of  rail  service  and  drive  more  traffic  to  the 
highways, where the safety record is far less favorable than it is on the rails. 

Below  I  will  discuss  several  important  topics  associated  with  rail  safety,  discuss 
ways that railroads are working to advance safety in those areas, and discuss steps 
that we believe policymakers should take (or not take) to promote rail safety. 
Role of Technology 

Technology  plays  a  crucial  role  in  rail  safety.  Much  of  this  technology  has  been 
(or is being) developed and/or refined at the Transportation Technology Center, Inc. 
(TTCI)  in  Pueblo,  Colorado.  A  wholly-owned  subsidiary  of  the  AAR,  TTCI  is  the 
world’s  finest  rail  research  facility.  Its  48  miles  of  test  tracks,  highly  sophisticated 
testing  equipment,  metallurgy  labs,  simulators,  and  other  diagnostic  tools  are  used 
to test track structure, evaluate freight car and locomotive performance, assess com-
ponent  reliability,  and  much  more.  The  facility  is  owned  by  the  FRA  but  has  been 
operated  (under  a  competitively-bid  contract  with  the  FRA)  by  TTCI—which  is  re-
sponsible for all of its operating costs and some of its capital costs—since 1984. The 
rail  industry  is  pleased  that  some  members  of  this  committee  have  had  the  oppor-
tunity to see TTCI in person, and I extend an open invitation to others in Congress, 
especially new members of this committee, to visit the facility when they can. 

Just  a  few  of  the  many  technological  advances  that  contribute  to  improved  rail 
safety are described below. Many of these advances are preventive, designed to help 
protect freight cars, locomotives, track, and cargo before accidents or damage occurs. 
• Wayside  detectors  identify  defects  on  passing  rail  cars—including  overheated 
bearings  and  wheels,  dragging  hoses,  deteriorating  bearings,  cracked  axles  and 
wheels,  and  excessively  high  and  wide  loads—before  structural  failure  or  other 
damage occurs. Some of the newest wayside detectors use machine vision to per-
form  higher-accuracy  inspections  through  the  use  of  digitized  images.  Tests  at 
TTCI have revealed that it is possible to inspect wheels of moving trains using 
ultrasonic  probes.  Further  tests  of  this  system  are  underway,  as  are  tests  on 
ways to better understand and prevent axle fatigue. 
• Wheel  profile  monitors  use  lasers  and  optics  to  capture  images  of  wheels.  The 
images  show  if  wheel  tread  or  flanges  are  worn  and,  consequently,  when  the 
wheels need to be removed from service before they become a problem. 
• Trackside  acoustic  detector  systems  use  ‘‘acoustic  signatures’’  to  evaluate  the 
sound of internal bearings to identify those likely to fail in the near term. These 
systems  supplement  or  replace  existing  systems  that  identify  bearings  already 
in  the  process  of  failing  by  measuring  the  heat  they  generate.  This  technology 
allows bearings to be replaced before they overheat and fail. 
• Wheels  constructed  with  stronger  micro-alloy  metals  that  resist  damage  and 
• Advanced  track  geometry  cars  use  sophisticated  electronic  and  optical  instru-
ments  to  inspect  track  conditions,  including  alignment,  gauge,  and  curvature. 
TTCI  is  developing  an  on-board  computer  system  that  provides  an  even  more 
sophisticated  analysis  capability  of  track  geometry,  predicting  the  response  of 
freight  cars  to  track  geometry  deviations.  This  information  helps  railroads  de-
termine track maintenance needs. 

withstand higher service loads are being developed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

• Improved  metallurgy  and  premium  fastening  systems  have  enhanced  track  sta-

bility, reducing the risk of track failure leading to derailments. 

• Rail defect detector cars are used to detect internal rail flaws. The AAR and the 
FRA have jointly funded a Rail Defect Test Facility at TTCI that railroads and 
suppliers use to test improved methods for detecting rail flaws. In 2005, the ca-
pabilities  of  a  prototype  of  the  world’s  first  laser-based  rail  inspection  system 
were tested at TTCI. It is now being demonstrated in revenue service. 

• Ground-penetrating  radar  and  terrain  conductivity  sensors  are  being  developed 
that will help identify problems below the ground (such as excessive water pen-
etration and deteriorated ballast) that hinder track stability. 

• Major  U.S.  railroads  are  deploying  remote  control  locomotive  technology  (RCL) 
to  improve  rail  safety.  RCL  allows  rail  personnel  on  the  ground  to  operate  and 
control  locomotives  in  rail  yards  through  the  use  of  a  hand-held  transmitter 
that  sends  signals  to  a  microprocessor  on  board  a  locomotive.  In  a  March  2006 
report, the FRA found that ‘‘[e]mployee injury rates were approximately 20 per-
cent  lower  for  RCL  operations  than  for  conventional  switching  operations  . . .’’ 
• Electronically-controlled  pneumatic  (ECP)  brakes  are  being  tested  in  revenue 
service.  In  an  ECP  braking  system,  an  electronic  signal  applies  the  brakes  on 
each car in a train almost instantaneously, resulting in a much shorter stopping 
distance,  reduced  slack,  and  improved  train  control.  (The  standard  air  brake 
system in use today sends an air pressure signal for cars to brake, slowing the 
cars  one-by-one  as  the  air  pressure  moves  from  car  to  car.)  The  FRA  recently 
announced  its  intent  to  issue  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  later  this  year 
to  revise  the  Federal  brake  system  safety  standards  to  encourage  railroads  to 
invest in and deploy ECP brake technology. 
• Because a relatively small percentage of freight cars (so-called ‘‘bad actors’’) can 
cause an inordinately high percentage of track damage and have a much higher 
than  typical  propensity  for  derailment,  TTCI  is  working  on  ways  to  identify 
poorly  performing  freight  cars  as  they  pass  across  truck  performance  detectors 
and hunting detectors.1 
• Much  of  the  research  underway  regarding  track  and  infrastructure  is  related 
to  heavy-axle  load  (HAL)  service,  which  entails  the  use  of  heavier  (and  often 
longer)  trains.  HAL-related  work  is  underway  on  rail  steels,  insulated  joints, 
bridges, welding, specialized track components, and more. 
• Tank car enhancements have helped railroads reduce the overall rail hazardous 
materials accident rate by 86 percent since 1980 and by 28 percent since 1990, 
and  railroads  are  constantly  investigating  ways  to  further  enhance  tank  car 
safety. Hazmat safety will be discussed in much more detail below. 
• Advanced  fault  detection  systems  monitor  critical  functions  on  locomotives. 
State-of-the-art  locomotives  today  can  have  20  or  more  sophisticated  micro-
processors  that  measure  and  check  several  thousand  characteristics  of  loco-
motives and their operation. 
• Railroads  are  constantly  expanding  their  use  of  state-of-the-art  global  posi-
• The  Integrated  Railway  Remote  Information  Service  (InteRRIS),  an  advanced 
Internet-based data collection system with wide potential applicability, is under 
development at TTCI. An early project using InteRRIS collects data from wheel 
impact  detector  systems  (which  identify  wheel  defects  by  measuring  the  force 
generated by wheels on tracks) and detectors that monitor the undercarriage of 
rail  cars  (which  identify  suspension  systems  that  are  not  performing  properly 
on  curves)  along  railroad  rights-of-way.  InteRRIS  processes  the  information  to 
produce  vehicle  condition  reports.  These  allow  equipment  which  is  approaching 
an unsafe condition to be removed from service and repaired before an accident 
occurs. 

tioning systems, wireless technologies, and other communications advances. 

Many  of  the  technological  advances  mentioned  above  have  been  incorporated  in 
the  rail  industry’s  Advanced  Technology  Safety  Initiative  (ATSI).  ATSI  has  already 
improved safety. For example, preliminary data indicate that the rate of main track 
broken  rail  and  broken  wheel  accidents  per  million  freight  train-miles  in  the  29 
months  following  the  October  2004  implementation  of  ATSI  was  more  than  7  per-
cent below that of the comparable 29-month period prior to implementation. 

1 In  terms  of  rail  cars,  ‘‘truck’’  refers  to  the  complete  four-wheel  assembly  that  supports  the 
car  body.  ‘‘Hunting’’  is  an  instability,  more  prevalent  at  higher  speeds,  that  causes  a  rail  car 
to weave down a track, usually with the flange of the wheel striking the rail. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Train Control Technology 

78 

Class  I  railroads  are  now  developing  and  testing  train  control  systems  that,  in 
certain circumstances, can help prevent accidents by automatically stopping or slow-
ing  trains  before  they  encounter  a  dangerous  situation.  Through  predictive  enforce-
ment, train control technologies could significantly reduce the incidence of train ac-
cidents  caused  by  human  error,  especially  train  collisions  and  derailments  due  to 
excessive speed. 

Train  control  systems  are  extremely  complex.  At  a  minimum,  they  must  include 
reliable technology to inform dispatchers and operators of a train’s precise location; 
a  means  to  warn  operators  of  actual  or  potential  problems  (e.g.,  excessive  speed); 
and  a  means  to  take  action,  if  necessary,  independent  of  the  train  operator  (e.g., 
stop a train before it reaches the physical limits of its operating authority or allowed 
speed).  Some  systems  will  also  include  additional  features,  such  as  expanding  the 
ability  to  monitor  the  position  of  hand-operated  switches.  Perhaps  the  most  critical 
element  is  sophisticated  software  capable  of  accommodating  all  of  the  variables  as-
sociated with rail operations. When successfully implemented, these enhanced train 
control  capabilities  will  enable  trains  to  operate  more  safely  than  trains  operate 
today. 

Major  railroads  are  engaged  in  various  ongoing  projects  to  test  elements  of  this 
new technology. For example, BNSF has done extensive and successful pilot testing 
of its version of train control (Electronic Train Management System—ETMS) in Illi-
nois  and  elsewhere.  BNSF  recently  received  final  approval  from  the  FRA  to  imple-
ment  the  technology  on  lines  elsewhere  on  its  system.  Other  train  control  projects 
in  progress  include  CSX’s  Communications-Based  Train  Management  (CBTM)  sys-
tem, Norfolk Southern’s Optimized Train Control (OTC) system, and Union Pacific’s 
Communications-Based Train Control (CBTC) system. 

Implementing advanced train control technology will require significant capital in-
vestments in wireless networks; sophisticated location determination systems; high-
ly  reliable  software;  and  digital  processors  onboard  locomotives,  in  dispatching  of-
fices  and,  for  some  systems,  along  tracks.  Railroads  are  committed  to  the  develop-
ment and implementation of train control technology where it makes sense to do so 
and at a pace that can be justified by available funds. 
Hazmat Transport by Rail 

Each year, 1.7 to 1.8 million carloads of hazardous materials (‘‘hazmat’’) are trans-
ported by rail in the United States, with two-thirds moving in tank cars. ‘‘Toxic in-
halation  hazards’’  (TIH)—gases  or  liquids,  such  as  chlorine  and  anhydrous  ammo-
nia,  that  are  especially  hazardous  if  released—are  a  subset  of  hazardous  materials 
and  are  a  major  (though  not  exclusive)  focus  of  hazmat-related  rail  safety  efforts. 
Each year, railroads transport around 100,000 carloads of TIH, virtually all in tank 
cars. 

Railroads recognize and deeply regret the occurrence of a few tragic accidents in-
volving  hazardous  materials  over  the  past  couple  of  years.  Nevertheless,  the  rail 
hazmat safety record is extremely favorable. In 2005 (the most recent year for which 
data are available), 99.997 percent of rail hazmat shipments reached their final des-
tination without a release caused by an accident. Railroads reduced hazmat accident 
rates by 86 percent from 1980 through 2005. 

Still,  no  one  disputes  that  efforts  should  be  made  to  increase  hazmat  safety  and 
security  where  practical.  Railroads  understand  this  better  than  anyone.  Today,  the 
Federal  Government,  through  the  railroads’  common  carrier  obligation,  requires 
railroads to transport highly-hazardous materials, whether railroads want to or not. 
Unlike firms in other industries, including other transportation companies, railroads 
today  have  not  been  able  to  ‘‘just  say  no’’  to  entering  into  a  business  relationship 
with consumers or manufacturers of these materials. 

Absent  railroads’  common  carrier  requirement,  many  railroads  would  not  trans-
port  these  materials  because  of  the  potentially  ruinous  claims  that  could  arise  in 
the  event  of  a  catastrophic  accident  involving  a  release  of  these  materials.  Indeed, 
while  accidents  involving  highly-hazardous  materials  on  railroads  are  exceedingly 
rare,  history  demonstrates  that  railroads  can  suffer  multi-billion  dollar  judgments, 
even  for  accidents  where  no  one  gets  seriously  hurt  and  the  railroads  do  nothing 
wrong.  Drunk  drivers,  impatient  motorists  driving  around  a  grade  crossing  gate  or 
ignoring a signal at a grade crossing, faulty repairs by the owner of a tank car, and 
pranksters—not  terrorists—have  caused  incidents  that  could  have  been  disastrous 
if they had involved the release of these materials. 

Some years ago in New Orleans, a tank car that railroads did not own containing 
more  than  30,000  gallons  of  liquid  butadiene  began  to  leak.  Vapor  from  the  buta-
diene  tank  car  rolled  out  across  a  neighborhood  until  the  pilot  light  of  an  outdoor 
gas  water  heater  ignited  it.  More  than  900  people  were  evacuated,  but  no  serious 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

injuries or fatalities occurred. The National Transportation Safety Board found that 
the probable cause of the accident was an improper gasket that a chemical company 
had  installed  on  the  tank  car.  Nevertheless,  a  state  court  jury  entered  a  punitive 
damages verdict against the railroads involved in the amount of $2.8 billion. 

In  essence,  the  transport  of  highly-hazardous  materials  is  a  ‘‘bet  the  business’’ 

public service that the government forces railroads to perform. 

Railroads face these huge risks for a tiny fraction of their business. In 2005, rail-
roads  moved  just  over  100,000  TIH  carloads  and  nearly  37  million  total  carloads. 
Thus,  shipments  of  TIH  constituted  only  about  0.3  percent  of  all  rail  carloads.  The 
revenue  that  highly-hazardous  materials  generate  does  not  come  close  to  covering 
the  potential  liability  to  railroads  associated  with  this  traffic.  Moreover,  the  insur-
ance  industry  is  unwilling  to  fully  insure  railroads  against  the  multi-billion  dollar 
risks  associated  with  highly-hazardous  shipments.  And  even  though  TIH  accounts 
for  a  tiny  fraction  of  rail  carloads,  it  contributes  approximately  50  percent  of  the 
rapidly-rising overall cost of railroad insurance. 

For all these reasons, the current environment for the rail transportation of high-
ly-hazardous  materials,  especially  TIH,  is  untenable.  If  the  Federal  Government  is 
going  to  require  railroads  to  transport  highly-hazardous  materials,  it  must  address 
the ‘‘bet the company’’ risk it forces railroads to assume. 

Congress  can  address  this  inequity  in  one  of  at  least  three  ways.  First,  Congress 
could create a statutory liability cap for freight railroads similar to the one that ap-
plies  to  Amtrak.  Amtrak’s  total  liability  for  all  claims,  including  punitive  damages, 
from  a  single  accident—regardless  of  fault—is  capped  at  $200  million.  Congress 
could enact a similar type of cap on the liability a freight railroad would incur from 
an  accident  involving  highly-hazardous  materials,  regardless  of  fault,  with  the  gov-
ernment paying liabilities in excess of the cap. 

Second, Congress could enact a Price-Anderson type solution. Price-Anderson lim-
its  a  company’s  liability  from  an  incident  involving  the  release  of  nuclear  material 
(including in transportation) and provides for a fund, to which all owners of nuclear 
power  plants  contribute  when  an  incident  occurs,  to  cover  damages  exceeding  that 
limit.  Under  a  similar  rail  proposal,  railroads  would  be  liable  for  a  defined  amount 
of damages arising from a rail accident involving highly-hazardous materials. In the 
event of an accident, damages above that defined amount would be paid from a fund 
to which producers and end-users of these materials would contribute. 

The  main  purpose  of  such  legislation  would  be  to  cap  the  railroad’s  liability  for 
claims,  while  still  ensuring  compensation  for  the  general  public.  However,  it  also 
seeks to balance the societal need to compensate the injured and damaged with the 
need  for  any  railroad  involved  to  be  able  to  continue  to  operate  and  remain  viable. 
Both  of  these  proposals  leave  railroads  with  substantial  liability.  Both  are  also 
reasonable,  given  railroads’  federally-imposed  common  carrier  obligation  and  the 
fact  that  accidents  occur  even  when  railroads  operate  carefully  and  safely.  Under 
either  proposal,  limiting  freight  railroads’  liability  from  an  accident  involving  high-
ly-hazardous  materials  would  reduce  railroads’  risk  exposure.  It  would  also  bring 
certainty  to  the  insurance  market.  Hopefully,  more  insurance  companies  would 
again be willing to offer railroads coverage. 

Absent  these  two  alternatives,  Congress  should  relieve  railroads  of  their  common 
carrier  obligation  to  haul  TIH  and  other  highly-hazardous  materials.  If  Congress 
will  not  provide  some  degree  of  protection  from  unlimited  potential  liability  from 
transporting  these  materials,  then  it  should  not  mandate  that  the  railroads’  share-
holders assume that risk. Rather, railroads should be permitted to decide for them-
selves  whether  to  accept,  and  at  what  price  they  are  willing  to  accept,  such  mate-
rials for transportation. 
What Railroads Are Doing 

In the meantime, railroads support prompt, bold actions by all stakeholders to re-
duce  the  risks  associated  with  hazmat  transport.  Railroads  themselves  are  taking 
the lead: 

• In December 2006, an industry committee approved a new standard for chlorine 
and  anhydrous  ammonia  tank  cars  that  will  significantly  reduce  the  risk  of  a 
release. (Anhydrous ammonia and chlorine combined account for around 80 per-
cent  of  rail  TIH  movements.)  The  standard  will  be  phased  in  beginning  in 
2008.2 
• As  noted  earlier,  railroads  help  communities  develop  and  evaluate  emergency 
response  plans;  provide  training  for  more  than  20,000  emergency  responders 
each year through their own efforts and the Transportation Community Aware-

2 The delay in implementation is due to an FRA request. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

ness  and  Emergency  Response  Program  (TRANSCAER);  and  support  Oper-
ation Respond, a nonprofit institute that develops technological tools and train-
ing for emergency response professionals. 
• Railroads work closely with chemical manufacturers in the Chemical Transpor-
tation Emergency Center (Chemtrec), a 24/7 resource that coordinates and com-
municates  critical  information  for  use  by  emergency  responders  in  mitigating 
hazmat incidents. 
• Railroads  participate  in  a  variety  of  R&D  efforts  to  enhance  tank  car  and 
hazmat  safety.  For  example,  the  Tank  Car  Safety  Research  and  Test  Project 
(which is funded by railroads, tank car builders, and tank car owners) analyzes 
accidents  involving  tank  cars  to  help  identify  the  causes  of  tank  car  releases 
and prevent future occurrences. 
• Upon  request,  railroads  provide  local  emergency  response  agencies  with,  at  a 
minimum,  a  list  of  the  top  25  hazardous  materials  transported  through  their 
communities. The list helps responders prioritize emergency response plans. 
• For trains and routes carrying a substantial amount of highly-hazardous mate-
• In  addition  to  implementing  their  Terrorism  Risk  Analysis  and  Security  Man-
agement Plan, railroads are working with DHS and the DOT to identify oppor-
tunities to reduce exposure to terrorism on rail property. 
• Railroads  offer  hazmat  awareness  training  to  all  employees  who  are  involved 
in  hazmat  transportation.  Employees  responsible  for  emergency  hazmat  re-
sponse efforts receive far more in-depth training. 
• Railroads are pursuing a variety of technological advancements to enhance rail 
• Railroads  are  working  with  TIH  manufacturers,  consumers,  and  the  govern-
ment to explore the use of coordinated routing arrangements to reduce the mile-
age and time in transit of TIH movements. 

rials, railroads utilize special operating procedures to enhance safety. 

safety, including hazmat safety. 

What Hazmat Manufacturers and Consumers Should Do 

Manufacturers  and  consumers  of  hazardous  materials  should  take  a  number  of 

steps to help ensure hazmat safety. 

First,  concerted  efforts  should  be  made  to  encourage  development  and  utilization 
of  ‘‘inherently  safer  technologies,’’  which  involve  the  substitution  of  less-hazardous 
materials  for  highly-hazardous  materials,  especially  TIH,  in  manufacturing  and 
other processes. As noted in a recent report by the National Research Council (part 
of  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences),  ‘‘the  most  desirable  solution  to  preventing 
chemical releases is to reduce or eliminate the hazard where possible, not to control 
it.’’ Ways this can be achieved include ‘‘modifying processes where possible to mini-
mize  the  amount  of  hazardous  material  used’’  and  ‘‘[replacing]  a  hazardous  sub-
stance  with  a  less  hazardous  substitute.’’ 3 In  a  similar  vein,  in  a  January  2006  re-
port,  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  recommended  that  the  Depart-
ment of Homeland Security ‘‘work with EPA to study the advantages and disadvan-
tages of substituting safer chemicals and processes at some chemical facilities.’’ 4 

One real-world example of product substitution occurred at the Blue Plains waste-
water  treatment  facility  just  a  few  miles  from  the  U.S.  Capitol.  Like  many  waste-
water  treatment  facilities,  Blue  Plains  used  chlorine  to  disinfect  water.  Not  long 
after 9/11, the facility switched to sodium hypochlorite, a safer alternative.5 

Railroads  recognize  that  the  use  of  TIH  cannot  be  immediately  halted.  However, 
over the medium to long term, product substitution would go a long way in reducing 
hazmat risks. 

Second, manufacturers and receivers of TIH, in conjunction with railroads and the 
Federal  Government,  should  continue  to  explore  the  use  of  ‘‘coordination  projects’’ 
to allow TIH consumers to source their needs from closer suppliers. For manufactur-
ers  and  users,  this  could  involve  ‘‘swaps.’’  For  example,  if  a  chlorine  user  contracts 
with a chlorine supplier located 600 miles away, but another supplier is located 300 
miles  away,  the  supplier  located  600  miles  away  might  agree  to  allow  the  closer 
shipper to supply the user. 

3 Terrorism  and  the  Chemical  Infrastructure:  Protecting  People  and  Reducing  Vulnerabilities, 

National Research Council—Board on Chemical Sciences and Technology, May 2006, p. 106. 

4 Homeland Security: DHS is Taking Steps to Enhance Security at Chemical Facilities, but Ad-

ditional Authority is Needed, Government Accountability Office, January 2006, p. 7. 

5 A  March  2007  GAO  report  lists  23  large  wastewater  treatment  facilities  located  throughout 
the  country  that  have  recently  converted  or  plan  to  convert  from  chlorine  gas  to  a  safer  alter-
native. (GAO, Securing Wastewater Facilities: Costs of Vulnerability Assessments, Risk Manage-
ment Plans, and Alternative Disinfection Methods Vary Widely, March 2007.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

Third,  hazmat  consumers  and  manufacturers  should  support  efforts  aimed  at  in-
creasing  tank  car  safety  and  reliability.  Not  long  ago,  for  example,  the  FRA,  Dow 
Chemical,  Union  Pacific,  and  the  Union  Tank  Car  Company  announced  a  collabo-
rative  partnership  to  design  and  implement  a  next-generation  railroad  tank  car. 
(TTCI  has  been  selected  to  support  testing  and  developments  initiatives  related  to 
this project.) 
What the Government Should Do 

The  government  too  has  a  key  role  to  play.  First,  as  noted  earlier,  if  the  govern-
ment  requires  railroads  to  transport  highly-hazardous  materials  (via  their  common 
carrier obligation), it must address the ‘‘bet the company’’ risk this obligation forces 
railroads to assume. 

Second,  the  government  should  help  facilitate  the  ‘‘coordinated  routing  arrange-

ments’’ and ‘‘coordination projects’’ mentioned earlier. 

Third, the government should encourage the rapid development and use of ‘‘inher-

ently safer technologies’’ to replace TIH and other highly-hazardous materials. 

Fourth, as explained in more detail below, the government should reject proposals 
that would allow state or local authorities to ban hazmat movements through their 
jurisdictions  or  order  railroads  to  provide  local  authorities  advance  notification  of 
hazmat  movements  through  their  jurisdictions.  The  purposes  of  these  types  of  pro-
posals  are  protection  of  the  local  populace  against  hazmat  incidents,  including  ter-
rorist attack (especially in perceived ‘‘high threat’’ areas), and enhancing the ability 
to react more quickly to hazmat incidents. The proposals may be well intended, but 
the  end  result  of  their  enactment  on  a  locality-by-locality  basis  would  likely  be  an 
increase in exposure to hazmat release and reduced safety and security. 
Hazmat Bans 

Banning hazmat movements in individual jurisdictions would not eliminate risks, 
but  instead  would  shift  them  from  one  place  to  another  and  from  one  population 
to another. In shifting that risk, it could foreclose transportation routes that are op-
timal  in  terms  of  overall  safety,  security,  and  efficiency  and  force  railroads  to  use 
less direct, less safe routes. 

The  rail  network  is  not  similar  to  the  highway  network  where  there  are  myriad 
alternate  routes.  In  the  rail  industry,  rerouting  could  add  hundreds  of  miles  and 
several days to a hazmat shipment, and those extra miles and days could be on rail 
infrastructure that is less suitable (for a variety of reasons) to handling hazmat. Ad-
ditional  switching  and  handling  of  cars  carrying  hazmat  could  be  needed,  as  could 
additional  dwell  time  in  yards.  As  the  Department  of  Justice  and  DHS  noted  in  a 
joint brief opposing a proposed D.C. hazmat ban, the increase in the total miles over 
which hazmat travels and the increase in total time in transit would ‘‘increase their 
exposure to possible terrorist action,’’ and therefore potentially reduce safety and se-
curity. (It has been estimated, for example, that a ban on hazmat transport through 
the District of Columbia would result in some 2 million additional hazmat car-miles 
as  railroads  had  to  use  circuitous  alternative  routes.)  That’s  why  the  International 
Association of Fire Chiefs, among many others, has urged Congress to reject hazmat 
bans,  noting  that  such  bans  ‘‘ultimately  would  compromise  the  safe  movement  of 
hazardous materials.’’ 

If  hazmat  were  banned  in  one  jurisdiction,  other  jurisdictions  would  undoubtedly 
follow  suit.  In  the  wake  of  so  far  unsuccessful  attempts  by  the  D.C.  City  Council 
to  ban  hazmat  movements  through  Washington,  similar  efforts  are  being  discussed 
for  Atlanta,  Baltimore,  Boston,  Buffalo,  Cleveland,  Chicago,  Las  Vegas,  Memphis, 
Philadelphia,  Pittsburgh,  and  probably  other  cities  too,  as  well  as  for  all  of  Cali-
fornia. 

An  integrated,  effective  national  network  requires  uniform  standards  that  apply 
nationwide.  The  clarity  and  efficiency  that  uniformity  brings  would  be  lost  if  dif-
ferent  localities  and  routes  were  subject  to  widely  different  rules  and  standards,  or 
if  local  and/or  state  governments  could  dictate  what  types  of  freight  could  pass 
through their jurisdictions. The problem is especially acute for railroads, whose net-
work  characteristics  and  limited  routing  options  mean  that  disruptions  in  one  area 
can have profound impacts thousands of miles away. These disruptions would nega-
tively affect all rail traffic, not just hazmat traffic. 

Of  course,  it  is  unlikely  that  cities  and  regions  that  would  see  increased  hazmat 
traffic  because  of  rerouting  elsewhere  would  welcome  the  additional  hazmat  traffic 
with  open  arms.  For  example,  in  response  to  a  proposal  to  reroute  hazmat  traffic 
from Washington, D.C. through parts of Maryland instead, the Maryland Transpor-
tation Secretary said that routes through his state would be ‘‘simply unacceptable.’’ 
A  local  Maryland  official  complained  that  rerouting  would  make  his  county  ‘‘a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

dumping  ground,’’  noting  that  ‘‘we’re  not  interested  in  playing  on  those  sets  of 
rules.’’ 

Finally, as the U.S. Departments of Justice, Transportation, and Homeland Secu-
rity  indicated  in  comments  opposing  the  D.C.  law,  hazmat  bans  also  unreasonably 
burden  interstate  commerce  and  interfere  with  Federal  regulation  of  hazmat  ship-
ments  by  rail.  Bans  would  also  lead  to  more  reliance  on  moving  hazmat  by  trucks 
on busy highways. 
Hazmat Pre-Notification 

Hazmat pre-notification to local authorities is problematic for several reasons and 

may not accomplish the goals of those seeking it. 

First,  upon  request  the  rail  industry  already  notifies  communities  of,  at  a  min-
imum,  the  top  25  hazardous  commodities  likely  to  be  transported  through  their 
area.  In  the  event  of  a  hazmat  incident,  train  consists  are  available  to  emergency 
responders,  and  railroads,  at  TSA  request,  have  agreed  to  provide  movement  data 
on all TIH cars. 

Second,  pre-notification  would  vastly  increase  the  accessibility  of  hazmat  location 
information. Making this information more accessible could increase vulnerability to 
terrorist attack by magnifying the possibility that the information could fall into the 
wrong hands. 

Third, at any one time, thousands of hazmat carloads are moving by rail through-
out  the  country,  constantly  leaving  one  jurisdiction  and  entering  another.  The  vast 
majority  of  these  carloads  do  not—and  due  to  the  nature  of  rail  operations,  cannot 
be made to—follow a rigid, predetermined schedule. The sheer quantity and transi-
tory nature of these movements would make a workable pre-notification system ex-
tremely difficult and costly to implement, for railroads and local officials alike. That 
is why the Fire Chief of Rialto, California, commented, ‘‘You’d have to have an army 
of  people  to  stay  current  on  what’s  coming  through.  I  think  it  wouldn’t  be  almost 
overwhelming. It would be overwhelming.’’ The greater the number of persons to be 
notified, the greater the difficulty and cost. 

Fourth,  railroads  provide  training  for  hazmat  emergency  responders  in  many  of 
the communities they serve, and they already have well-established, effective proce-
dures in place to assist local authorities in the event of hazmat incidents. 

Finally,  since  railroads  already  make  communities  aware  of  what  types  of  haz-
ardous  materials  are  likely  to  be  transported  through  their  area  and  since  they  al-
ready  provide  24/7  assistance  for  emergency  responders  (many  of  whom  railroads 
have  trained),  it  is  not  at  all  clear  that  information  obtained  by  local  authorities 
through  a  pre-notification  system  would  improve  their  ability  to  respond  to  hazmat 
incidents in any meaningful way. 
Fatigue in the Rail Industry 

It  is  not  in  the  best  interest  of  railroads  to  have  employees  who  are  too  tired  to 
perform  their  duties  properly.  That’s  why  railroads  have  long  partnered  with  their 
employees to gain a better understanding of fatigue-related issues and find effective, 
innovative solutions to fatigue-related problems. 

Combating  fatigue  is  a  shared  responsibility.  Employers  need  to  provide  an  envi-
ronment that allows their employees to obtain necessary rest during off-duty hours, 
and employees must set aside time when off-duty to obtain the rest they need. 

Factors  that  can  result  in  fatigue  are  multiple,  complex,  and  frequently  inter-
twined.  Therefore,  efforts  to  combat  fatigue  should  be  based  on  sound  scientific  re-
search,  not  on  anecdotes  or  isolated  events.  Research  demonstrates  that  flexibility 
to  tailor  fatigue  management  efforts  to  address  local  circumstances  is  key.  Signifi-
cant variations associated with local operations (e.g., types of trains, traffic balance, 
and geography), local labor agreements, and other factors require customized meas-
ures.  There  is  no  single,  easy  solution  to  fatigue-related  problems,  especially  in  an 
industry that must operate 24 hours per day every day of the year, and a one-size- 
fits-all government approach is unlikely to succeed as well as cooperative efforts tai-
lored to individual railroads. 

The  on-duty  time  of  rail  employees  involved  in  operating,  dispatching,  and  sig-
naling  trains  is  governed  by  the  Hours  of  Service  Act  (HSA).  Under  the  HSA,  rail 
conductors and engineers must go off-duty after 12 consecutive hours on the job, and 
then  must  have  at  least  10  consecutive  hours  off-duty.  If  they  go  off-duty  after  less 
than 12 hours on the job, they must have at least 8 consecutive hours off-duty. On- 
duty  time  starts  the  minute  the  employee  reports  for  duty  and  includes  any  work 
that involves engaging in the movement of a train and transportation to a duty as-
signment.  Off-duty  time  starts  when  the  employee  is  released  from  duty,  generally 
at a designated terminal or place of lodging. Dispatchers and signal employees have 
slightly different hours-of-service requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

Individual  railroads  are  pursuing  a  variety  of  fatigue  countermeasures,  based  on 
what they’ve found to be most effective for their particular circumstances. Not every 
countermeasure  is  appropriate  for  every  railroad,  or  even  for  different  parts  of  the 
same railroad, because the effectiveness of various fatigue countermeasures depends 
on  the  circumstances  unique  to  each  railroad.  Countermeasures  that  are  used  by 
one or more railroads include: 

• Increasing the minimum number of hours off-duty between shifts. 
• Implementing  a  morning  return  to  work  time  if  off  work  more  than  72  hours. 
• Permitting  napping  by  train  crew  members  under  limited  circumstances  (e.g., 
when  a  train  is  expected  to  remain  motionless  for  a  minimum  period  of  time). 
• Encouraging sleep disorder screening. 
• Improving rest-inducing standards for lodging at away-from-home facilities. 
• Devising systems (including websites, e-mails, pagers, and automated telephone 

systems) to improve communication between crew callers and employees. 

Railroads  and  unions  have  also  agreed,  in  some  cases,  to  additional  scheduling 

tools to provide for an improved opportunity for rest. They include: 

shifts. 

from home. 

• Enhanced  emphasis  on  returning  crews  home  rather  than  lodging  them  away 
• Providing  more  predictable  calling  windows  and  rest  opportunities  between 
• Providing for a set number of days off after being available for a given number 
• Allowing  employees  to  request  an  extra  rest  period  when  they  report  off-duty. 
• Offering fatigue education programs for employees and their families, including 
individualized  coaching  to  help  employees  improve  their  sleep  habits.  The  rail 
industry  is  also  developing  an  educational  website  designed  solely  for  railroads 
and rail employees. 

of days. 

The  importance  of  education  cannot  be  overstated,  since  the  value  and  effective-
ness of fatigue-related initiatives depends on the actions of employees while off-duty. 
Many  employee  actions  while  off-duty  (for  example,  working  second  jobs)  can  con-
tribute  to  fatigue,  and  railroads  have  little  control  over  these  actions.  Employees 
must  make  proper  choices  regarding  how  they  utilize  their  off-duty  time,  and  edu-
cation of the entire family is important in encouraging sound decisionmaking. 

Railroads  support  continued  research  on  ways  to  fight  fatigue  and  will  continue 
to work with rail labor to find effective solutions to fatigue issues. To that end, rail-
roads  are  amenable  to  a  careful  reexamination  of  the  Hours  of  Service  Act’s  statu-
tory  limitations.  Changes  in  the  HSA  might  help  reduce  fatigue  in  the  rail  work-
place, but they need to be carefully considered to maximize the probability that they 
will actually attain the goals they are designed to achieve. 

Specifically, railroads do not object to several changes to existing employee hours- 
of-service  regulations.  First,  railroads  do  not  object  to  prohibiting  train  and  engine 
and  signal  employees  from  working  unless  they  have  had  at  least  ten  consecutive 
hours off-duty (up from 8 hours under existing law) during the prior 24 hours. Rail-
roads do not object to a requirement that those 10 hours should be free of non-emer-
gency  phone  or  page  communications  from  railroads.  Second,  any  employee  who 
works 12 consecutive hours on duty, and then at least 1 hour of limbo time,6 would 
receive at least 14 hours of off-duty time once he or she is released from duty. Third, 
rail  train  and  engine  employees  would  be  subject  to  a  new  monthly  maximum  of 
276  hours  on  duty,  and  even  though  limbo  time  is  not  on-duty  time,  it  would  be 
included in those 276 hours.7 Hours beyond this new maximum, which is consistent 
with permissible hours for other modes of transportation, would be a violation of the 
HSA. (Today a rail employee could theoretically work 432 hours per month and still 
be in compliance with the HSA.) 8 

Together, these measures not only significantly reduce the maximum on-duty time 
under  current  law,  but  they  also  strike  a  balance  between  the  concerns  that  limbo 

6 ‘‘Limbo  time’’  refers  to  the  time  that  crews  spend  waiting  for  transportation  and  the  time 
they  spend  being  transported  to  where  they  are  released  from  duty.  Limbo  time  counts  as  nei-
ther time on-duty nor time off-duty. 

7 KCS and CN do not agree with this position, and Amtrak abstains on the issue. 
8 In  fact,  though,  we  know  of  no  cases  where  this  has  occurred.  The  vast  majority  of  railroad 
workers  are  on  duty  each  month  for  periods  comparable  to  most  other  U.S.  workers.  Some  83 
percent of these rail workers are on duty less than 200 hours per month and more than 95 per-
cent are on duty less than 250 hours per month. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

time contributes to fatigue and the realities of the unpredictability of railroad oper-
ations. 

84 

The  above  changes  reflect  the  railroad  industry’s  preferred  approach.  Failing  use 
of this approach, railroads would support a transfer of the hours-of-service authority 
to the FRA, with reliance on FRA’s professional judgment. 

To  enable  signal  employees  to  finish  their  work  at  far-away  sites  without  having 
to commute multiple times, railroads and signal employees historically have agreed 
to  modified  work  schedules—for  example,  eight  consecutive  work  days  (ten  hours 
each  day)  followed  by  six  consecutive  days  off.  These  work  schedules  are  permitted 
under  the  HSA,  are  contained  in  collective  bargaining  agreements  with  signal  em-
ployees,  and  result  in  much  less  total  off-duty  travel  time  for  employees  working  a 
substantial distance from home. 

However,  schedules  like  this  are  not  permitted  by  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety 
Administration (FMCSA) hours-of-service regulations, which apply to the many rail-
road  signal  employees  who  drive  commercial  vehicles  to  perform  their  duties.  Sev-
eral years ago, railroads and rail labor (through the Brotherhood of Railroad Signal-
men) petitioned FMCSA to allow the HSA to take precedence over FMCSA’s hours- 
of-service requirements. To date, FMCSA has refused. This problem can be rectified 
if  it  is  made  clear  statutorily  that  hours-of-service  requirements  for  rail  signal  em-
ployees  under  the  HSA  shall  not  be  subject  to  hours-of-service  restrictions  imposed 
by another government agency. 
Highway-Rail Grade Crossings and Trespassers 

Collisions  at  grade  crossings,  along  with  incidents  involving  trespassers  on  rail-
road  rights-of-way,  are  critical  safety  problems.  In  2006,  these  two  categories  ac-
counted  for  97  percent  of  rail-related  fatalities.  Although  these  incidents  usually 
arise  from  factors  that  are  largely  outside  of  railroad  control,9 and  even  though 
highway-rail  crossing  warning  devices  are  properly  considered  motor  vehicle  warn-
ing devices there for the benefit of motorists, not trains, railroads are committed to 
efforts aimed at further reducing the frequency of crossing and trespasser incidents. 
Much  success  has  already  been  achieved.  In  1980,  according  to  FRA  data,  10,611 
grade  crossing  collisions  resulted  in  833  fatalities  and  3,890  injuries.  According  to 
preliminary  data,  2,908  collisions  in  2006  (down  73  percent)  involved  366  fatalities 
(down  56  percent)  and  1,006  injuries  (down  74  percent).  The  rate  of  grade-crossing 
collisions  per  million  train-miles  fell  76  percent  from  1980  through  2006,  and  has 
fallen  every  year  since  1980.  And  because  total  exposure  (train-miles  multiplied  by 
motor vehicle-miles) has risen sharply over time, the reduction in crossing incidents 
and casualties per unit of exposure has been even higher. 

9 A June 2004 report by the U.S. DOT’s Office of Inspector General (OIG) confirmed that mo-
torist behavior causes the vast majority of grade crossing accidents. According to the OIG report, 
‘‘Risky  driver  behavior  or  poor  judgment  accounted  for  31,035  or  94  percent  of  public  grade 
crossing accidents’’ from 1994–2003. The remaining accidents included such circumstances as ve-
hicles stuck, stalled, or abandoned at crossings. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

The Section 130 program, a national highway safety program created by the High-
way  Safety  Act  of  1973  and  expanded  most  recently  in  SAFETEA–LU,  is  a  major 
reason for the impressive grade crossing safety gains. Under the program, funds are 
apportioned  to  states  each  year  for  the  installation  of  new  active  warning  devices 
such  as  lights  and  gates,  upgrading  existing  devices,  and  replacing  or  improving 
grade  crossing  surfaces.  The  rail  industry  commends  and  thanks  the  members  of 
this committee and others in Congress for their support of this critical program. 

Railroads  continue  to  work  hard  to  improve  grade-crossing  safety,  including  co-
operating with state agencies to install and upgrade grade crossing warning devices 
and signals (and bearing the cost of maintaining those devices); helping to fund the 
closure  of  unneeded  or  redundant  crossings;  and  supporting  the  national  Operation 
Lifesaver grade crossing and pedestrian safety program. Railroads spend more than 
$250 million annually to improve, operate, and maintain grade crossings. 

A recent initiative that will result in improved safety is the use of ‘‘stop’’ or ‘‘yield’’ 
signs along with crossbucks at grade crossings. The National Committee on Uniform 
Traffic  Control  Devices  has  recommended  revising  the  Manual  of  Uniform  Traffic 
Control  Devices  (MUTCD)  to  require  the  use  of  stop  or  yield  signs  in  conjunction 
with  crossbucks  to  make  it  clear  what  is  expected  of  motorists  at  crossings.  The 
AAR  strongly  supports  amending  the  MUTCD  as  recommended  by  the  National 
Committee and follow through on the installation of signs. AAR also supports FRA’s 
recommendation,  included  in  its  May  2006  report  to  Congress  on  emergency  notifi-
cation  systems  for  grade  crossings,  that  signs  comply  with  the  MUTCD  rec-
ommendations. 

grade crossings on the National Highway System. 

The  report  to  Congress  also  recommended  that  Class  I  railroads  continue  their 
emergency notification programs, which provide the public with telephone numbers, 
posted  at  grade  crossings,  that  can  be  called  in  the  event  of  grade-crossing  emer-
gencies. AAR’s member railroads will continue these programs. 
Comprehensive Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety Agenda 

A  comprehensive  agenda  of  engineering,  education,  and  enforcement  actions 
should  be  implemented  so  that  further  improvement  in  crossing  safety  can  be 
achieved.  Congress  and  the  Federal  Government  should  adopt  and  implement  the 
following set of grade crossing safety and trespasser prevention initiatives: 

• Adopt a uniform national grade crossing closure process, combined with a freeze 
• Require  the  adoption  of  highway  design  standards  that  ultimately  eliminate 

on the overall number of grade crossings within each state. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
R
A
A
2
2
5

86 

• Redefine  ‘‘private  grade  crossings’’  in  such  a  manner  that  all  grade  crossings 
that  are  routinely  accessible  to  the  general  public  are  eligible  for  Section  130 
funding. 
• Fund  a  research  and  development  program  to  design  effective  low-cost  active 
warning  systems  for  grade  crossings,  and  continue  evaluations  of  the  effective-
ness of more advanced warning device systems such as four quadrant gates. 
• Enhance  grade  crossing  traffic  law  enforcement  by  requiring  grade  crossing 
safety as part of commercial driver’s license educational curricula and by main-
taining tough grade crossing traffic violation penalties. 
• Initiate active enforcement programs with local police agencies—e.g., encourage 
video enforcement and establish and fund a program for state and local law en-
forcement  officers  to  serve  in  FRA’s  regional  offices  as  liaisons  for  grade  cross-
ing and trespassing matters with state and local law enforcement organizations. 
• Require  a  minimum  set-back  or  physical  safety  barrier  between  active  railroad 
• Continue  to  fund  the  national  Operation  Lifesaver  grade  crossing  and  pedes-
• Increase  Federal  liability  insurance  requirements  for  contractors  whose  funded 

tracks and adjacent parallel trails and paths. 

trian safety program. 

projects interface with or impact a railroad. 

Trespassers 

For many years, significantly more fatalities on railroad property have been asso-
ciated with trespassers than with highway-rail grade crossing accidents. It is an un-
fortunate  reality  that  too  many  people  inappropriately  use  railroad  property  for 
short  cuts,  recreation,  or  other  purposes,  sometimes  with  terrible  results.  Railroads 
are engaged in ongoing efforts to educate the public that, for their own safety, they 
should stay off rail property. 

Each year, scores of people tragically choose to end their life by stepping or lying 
in front of a train. To help prevent the tragedy of suicide, railroads support the Sui-
cide  Prevention  Action  Network  (SPAN  USA),  a  charitable  organization  dedicated 
to  preventing  suicide  through  public  education  and  awareness;  community  action; 
and  Federal,  state,  and  local  grassroots  advocacy.  In  addition,  through  its  Railroad 
Research  Foundation,  the  AAR  is  researching  the  prevalence  of,  and  underlying 
causal factors for, rail-related suicides. Such understanding could facilitate counter-
measures to reduce suicides on railroad rights-of-way. 
Performance Standards 

There  are  two  general  approaches  to  workplace  safety  regulation:  design-based 

standards and performance standards. 

Design-based standards specify the precise characteristics of facilities, equipment, 
and processes a firm must use in the manufacture or delivery of its product or serv-
ice.  The  FRA  relies  overwhelmingly  on  design-based  standards  in  regulating  rail 
safety. Design-based standards are costly for both railroads and the FRA to admin-
ister and maintain. They also tend to impede innovation by ‘‘locking in’’ existing de-
signs, technology, and ways of thinking. 

The  discolored  wheel  rule  provides  a  classic  example  of  a  design-based  standard 
that discourages new technology. This FRA rule required railroads to remove freight 
car  wheels  that  showed  four  or  more  inches  of  discoloration,  on  the  grounds  that 
such discoloration could portend wheel failure. However, research demonstrated con-
clusively that discoloration in new heat-treated, curved-plate wheels did not portend 
failure.  Despite  this  evidence,  the  FRA  took  more  than  a  decade  to  exempt  such 
wheels  from  the  requirement.  During  this  period,  railroads  had  to  discard  perfectly 
safe wheels at a cost that reached $100 million per year. 

In contrast to design-based standards, performance-based standards define the de-
sired result, rather than mandate the precise characteristics that a workplace must 
exhibit.  Performance-based  goals  focus  attention  and  effort  on  the  outcome,  not  the 
method. 

Under  one  type  of  safety  regime  based  on  performance  standards,  each  railroad 
would  have  goals  for  train  safety  (e.g.,  accidents  per  million  train-miles)  and  em-
ployee safety (e.g., injuries per 100 employees) as part of a comprehensive risk man-
agement  plan,  based  on  targets  established  by  the  industry  and  approved  by  the 
FRA.  If  a  railroad  failed  to  meet  these  goals,  it  would  come  under  increased  FRA 
scrutiny, be required to specify how it planned to correct the problems, and eventu-
ally  be  subject  to  monetary  penalties  or  even  a  return  to  design-based  regulation. 
While some (but not all) of the old regulations would be suspended under a perform-
ance-standard regime, the FRA would retain the power to conduct safety audits and 
to impose emergency directives at any time to protect public safety. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

Under  safety  performance  standards,  railroads  would  have  the  opportunity  and 
incentive  to  achieve  safer  operations  as  efficiently  as  possible.  Performance  stand-
ards  would  rely  on  the  superior  knowledge  of  railroads  and  their  employees  and 
would  give  railroads  the  discretion  to  experiment  with  new  technologies  and  proc-
esses to improve safety. The result would be superior safety performance at a lower 
cost to railroads and their customers. 

Risk-based  performance  standards  represent  a  reform,  not  an  abandonment,  of 
safety  regulation.  Except  in  emergencies  or  after  continued  failure  to  meet  targets, 
the  FRA  would  no  longer  specify  how  a  railroad  would  achieve  its  safety  goals.  In-
stead,  the  FRA  would  oversee  and  validate  the  goal-setting  process,  ensure  that 
measures and data are accurate, and impose any necessary sanctions. 

Railroads  have  proposed  a  performance  standard  pilot  project  focused  on  loco-
motive inspections. In addition, the standards the industry committee issued in De-
cember  2006  for  anhydrous  ammonia  and  chlorine  tank  cars  incorporate  perform-
ance  standards.  The  committee  standards  mandate  tank  thickness,  head  shields, 
and  top-fittings  protection.  However,  tank  car  owners  or  builders  can  petition  the 
Committee to accept a tank car that, in lieu of the specified tank thickness and head 
shields, achieves the same safety improvement. 
Conclusion 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify on this critical topic. The railroad indus-
try  is  committed  to  working  with  its  employees,  Congress,  the  FRA,  its  customers, 
and others to ensure that rail safety continues to improve. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  very  much,  Mr.  Hamberger.  Mr. 

Timmons, we look forward to hearing from you. 

STATEMENT OF RICHARD F. TIMMONS, PRESIDENT, AMERICAN 

SHORT LINE AND REGIONAL RAILROAD ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  TIMMONS.  Well,  good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate 
the  opportunity  to  appear  this  morning  on  behalf  of  the  American 
Short  Line  and  Regional  Railroad  Association.  Nationwide  there 
are over 550 Short Line Railroads operating nearly 50,000 miles of 
track, employing just over 23,000 individuals. 

Like the Class I railroads, the Short Line industry is proud of its 
safety  record  and  believe  that  the  trends  over  the  last  10  years 
demonstrate the commitment we have made to improving safety. In 
the  last  10  years  our  total  accidents  and  incidents  has  declined  by 
44 percent. And our employee injuries have declined by 58 percent. 
I’m particularly pleased to tell you that in 2006, we had 206 Short 
Line  Railroads  without  a  single  personal  injury  and  another  77 
Short  Lines  with  personal  injuries  below  the  Short  Line  Industry 
average. 

We  know  that  any  accident  is  one  too  many.  And  tireless  effort 
is required to improve our record. But the trend line for small rail-
roads  has  been  heading  in  the  right  direction  for  some  years  now. 
I’d like to briefly touch on a number of things that will help us fur-
ther improve our record; and a number of items that will not. 

First,  we  take  safety  training  very  seriously.  In  2005  the  Short 
Line Association entered into a new partnership with the National 
Academy  of  Railway  Sciences  to  facilitate  Short  Line  use  of  this 
outstanding  training  facility.  Short  Line  attendance  has  increased 
steadily since the new partnership was announced. And we believe 
that  the  higher  more  intense  level  of  training  will  contribute  to 
safer Short Lines. 

Greater  access  through  the  Internet  is  on  the  way  making  this 
training even more useful and effective for the Short Line industry. 
Additionally we are partnering with the Federal Railroad Adminis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

tration  in  putting  on  seminars  in  drug  and  alcohol  training,  engi-
neer certification and track and bridge safety standards. 

Second,  improving  our  infrastructure  will  improve  our  safety 
record. The Short Line industry puts nearly one-third of its annual 
gross revenues into track and equipmenting improvements, a high-
er percentage than any other industry in the country. Every dollar 
we invest in upgrading track makes our railroads safer. 

The  Federal  Tax  Credit  that  Congress  enacted  in  2004  has  al-
lowed  Short  Line  to  increase  that  investment.  It’s  also  leveraged 
significant  additional  investments  by  railroad  customers  and  state 
and local governments. That credit expires at the end of 2007. And 
Senators  Blanche,  Lincoln  and  Gordon  Smith  have  introduced  S. 
881  to  extend  that  credit  for  another  3  years.  Enacting  legislation 
which  maximizes  infrastructure  investment  is  the  single  most  im-
portant measure Congress could enact to enhance Short Line Rail-
road’s safety. 

The  Railroad  Rehabilitation  and  Improvement  Financing  Pro-
gram  or  the  so  called  RRIF  program  is  another  way  the  Federal 
Government  can  leverage  significant  investment  in  track  improve-
ments.  This  program  provides  loans  to  railroads  for  a  variety  of 
capital  purposes  including  track  and  equipment  rehabilitation.  It 
provides  loans  at  ‘‘cost  of  money’’  to  the  government  for  25  year 
terms. 

Short  Line  Railroads  cannot  secure  this  kind  of  funding  in  the 
private markets. And the program should serve as one of the most 
cost effective public/private partnerships in the transportation field. 
These  are  loans  that  must  be  fully  repaid.  There  is  absolutely  no 
cost to the Federal Government. The loans are secured by collateral 
equal  to  100  percent  of  the  loan  value  plus  the  payment  of  a  so 
called  ‘‘credit  risk  premium’’  that  covers  the  risk  of  default.  This 
program could go a long way toward upgrading the Short Line sys-
tem  at  no  cost  to  the  Federal  Government,  unfortunately  it  is  not. 
Since the program was initiated in 1988 only 15 loans have been 
approved.  Now  I’ll  not  take  your  time  this  morning  explaining  all 
the reasons for this failure. And indeed I am not sure I understand 
all  of  them  myself.  But  if  this  Committee  could  get  to  the  bottom 
of that problem, you would be making an enormous contribution to 
railroad safety. 

As has been referenced here today the House Transportation and 
Infrastructure Committee is currently considering safety legislation 
in  H.R.  2095.  There  are  a  number  of  provisions  in  that  legislation 
that  will  reduce  the  amount  of  money  Short  Lines  are  able  to  in-
vest in track upgrades. And will do so without any measurable im-
provement in safety. 

Let  me  comment  on  these  very  quickly.  And  then  if  you  wish, 
spend  time  on  them  in  the  question  and  answer  portion  of  the 
hearing.  The  legislation  mandates  regulations  we’re  requiring  on 
main  lines  in  non-signal  territory.  A  system  that  would  warn  a 
train in advance of a misaligned switch or an operating policy that 
trains  be  operated  at  speeds  that  will  allow  them  to  be  stopped  in 
advance of misaligned switches. 

Short  Line  Railroads  have  well  over  15,000  switches,  as  a  con-
servative estimate on non-signal main lines. The cost of this provi-
sion  would  be  well  beyond  the  resources  of  the  Short  Line  Rail-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

roads. Moreover, such a provision would provide a strong incentive 
to  remove  under-utilized  switches  to  the  detriment  of  our  smallest 
customers and communities. 

The  legislation  also  places  signal  contractors  under  the  Hours  of 
Service Act. Short Line Railroads use these highly specialized peo-
ple for the majority of their signal work. They are an efficient and 
cost  effective  group  of  workers.  Subjecting  them  to  the  Hours  of 
Service  Act  will  increase  their  costs  and  those  increases  will  be 
passed  on  to  the  Short  Lines.  I  might  add  that  since  the  Railway 
Worker  Rule  went  into  effect  in  1996,  no  Short  Line  Railroad  has 
ever had a railway worker fatality. 

And  the  legislation  changes  the  emergency  work  provision  for 
signal  employees  by  providing  that  it  can  not  be  invoked  for  more 
than  3  days  during  a  period  of  seven  consecutive  days;  and  pro-
viding  they  can  not  be  invoked  for  routine  repairs,  maintenance 
and  inspections.  This  is  going  to  be  particularly  harmful  for  small 
signal  contractors  who  will  have  to  hire  additional  full-time  em-
ployees to cover what will be an occasional event. 

The Short Line Railroad Industry understands the importance of 
safety and has made a substantial investment in making our prop-
erty  safer.  It  is  good  for  our  business.  And  it  is  the  necessary  and 
right  thing  to  do  for  our  employees.  We  stand  ready  to  work  with 
the  Federal  Government  in  its  efforts  to  continue  making  progress 
in this important area. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  this  opportunity.  And 
I’ll  be  glad  to  address  any  questions  the  Committee  may  have  at 
the appropriate time. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Timmons follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD F. TIMMONS, PRESIDENT, AMERICAN SHORT LINE 

AND REGIONAL RAILROAD ASSOCIATION 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee.  I  appreciate  the 
opportunity  to  appear  this  morning  on  behalf  of  the  American  Short  Line  and  Re-
gional  Railroad  Association  (ASLRRA).  Nationwide  there  are  over  500  short  line 
railroads operating nearly 50,000 miles of track and employing over 23,000 individ-
uals. 

Like the Class I railroads the short line industry is proud of its safety record and 
believes  that  the  trends  over  the  last  10  years  demonstrate  the  commitment  we 
have  made  to  improving  safety.  In  the  last  10  years  our  total  accidents  and  inci-
dents has declined by 44 percent and our employee injuries have declined by 58 per-
cent.  I  am  particularly  pleased  to  tell  you  that  in  2006  we  had  206  short  line  rail-
roads without a single personal injury and another 77 short lines with personal in-
juries below the short line industry average. 

We know that any accident is one too many and tireless effort is required to con-
tinue to improve our record. But the trend line for small railroads has been headed 
in the right direction for some years now. 

I  would  like  to  briefly  touch  on  a  number  of  things  that  will  help  us  further  im-

prove our record and on a number of items that will not. 

First,  we  take  safety  training  very  seriously.  In  2005  we  the  Short  Line  Associa-
tion, entered into a new partnership with the National Academy of Railway Sciences 
to facilitate short line use of this outstanding training facility. Short line attendance 
has  increased  steadily  since  the  new  partnership  was  announced  and  we  believe 
that  the  higher  more  intense  level  of  training  will  contribute  to  safer  short  lines. 
Additionally, we are partnering with the Federal Railroad Administration in putting 
on seminars on drug and alcohol training, engineer certification, track safety stand-
ards and bridge safety standards. Greater access through the Internet is on the way 
making this more useful and effective for Short Lines. 

Second,  improving  our  infrastructure  will  improve  our  safety  record.  The  short 
line  industry  puts  nearly  one-third  of  its  annual  gross  revenues  into  track  and 
equipment improvements, a higher percentage than any other industry in the coun-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

try.  Every  dollar  we  invest  in  upgrading  track  makes  our  railroads  safer.  The  Fed-
eral tax credit the Congress enacted in 2004 has allowed short lines to increase that 
investment. It has also leveraged significant additional investments by railroad cus-
tomers and state and local governments. That credit expires at the end of 2007 and 
Senators Blanche, Lincoln, and Gordon Smith have introduced S. 881 to extend that 
credit  for  another  3  years.  Enacting  legislation  which  maximizes  infrastructure  in-
vestment is the single most important thing Congress could do to enhance short line 
railroad safety. 

The  Railroad  Rehabilitation  and  Improvement  Financing  Program  or  so-called 
RRIF  program  is  another  way  the  Federal  Government  can  leverage  significant  in-
vestment in track improvements. This program provides loans to railroads for a va-
riety  of  capital  purposes  including  track  and  equipment  rehabilitation.  It  provides 
loans  at  ‘‘cost  of  money’’  to  the  government  for  25  year  terms.  Short  line  railroads 
cannot  secure  this  kind  of  funding  in  the  private  markets  and  the  program  should 
serve  as  one  of  the  most  cost  effective  public-private  partnerships  in  the  transpor-
tation  field.  These  are  loans  that  must  be  fully  repaid.  There  is  absolutely  no  cost 
to the Federal Government. The loans are secured by collateral equal to 100 percent 
of the loan value, plus the payment of a so-called ‘‘credit risk premium’’ that covers 
the risk of default. 

This  program  could  go  a  long  way  toward  upgrading  the  short  line  system  at  no 
cost to the Federal Government. Unfortunately it is not. Since the program was ini-
tiated  in  1998  only  15  loans  have  been  approved.  I  will  not  take  your  time  today 
explaining  all  the  reasons  for  this  failure,  and  indeed  I  am  not  sure  I  understand 
all  of  them  myself.  But  if  this  Committee  could  get  to  the  bottom  of  that  problem 
you would be making an enormous contribution to railroad safety. 

As  has  been  referenced  here  today,  the  House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure 
Committee  is  currently  considering  safety  legislation,  H.R.  2094.  There  are  a  num-
ber of provisions in that legislation that will reduce the amount of money short lines 
are able to invest in track upgrades and will do so without any measurable improve-
ment  in  safety.  Let  me  comment  on  these  very  quickly  and  then  if  you  wish  spend 
time on them in the question and answer portion of the hearing. 

1. The legislation mandates regulations requiring on main lines in non-signaled 
territory  a  system  that  would  warn  a  train  in  advance  of  a  misaligned  switch, 
or  an  operating  policy  that  trains  be  operated  at  speeds  that  will  allow  them 
to be stopped in advance of misaligned switches. Short line railroads have well 
over  15,000  switches  on  non-signaled  main  lines.  The  cost  of  this  provision 
would  be  well  beyond  the  resources  of  the  short  line  railroads.  Moreover,  such 
a  provision  would  provide  a  strong  incentive  to  remove  under-utilized  switches 
to the detriment of our smallest customers. 
2.  The  legislation  places  signal  contractors  under  the  Hours  of  Service  Act. 
Short line railroads use these highly specialized people for the majority of their 
signal  work.  They  are  an  efficient  and  cost  effective  group  of  workers.  Sub-
jecting  them  to  the  Hours  of  Service  Act  will  increase  their  costs  and  those  in-
creases will be passed on to the short line. I might add that since the Roadway 
Worker rule went into effect in 1996 no short line railroad has ever had a rail-
way worker fatality. 
3.  The  legislation  changes  the  emergency  work  provision  for  signal  employees 
by  providing  that  it  cannot  be  invoked  for  more  than  3  days  during  a  period 
of seven consecutive days and by providing that it cannot be invoked for routine 
repairs,  maintenance  and  inspections.  This  is  going  to  be  particularly  harmful 
for smaller signal contractors who will have to hire additional full time employ-
ees to cover what will be an occasional event. 

Lastly,  I  would  like  to  briefly  address  the  issue  of  hazardous  material.  The  short 
line railroad record in this area is excellent. The U.S. Department of Transportation 
Hazardous Materials Information System indicates for 2004, 2005 and 2006 that no 
short  line  railroad  has  been  responsible  for  any  fatalities,  injuries,  or  hospitaliza-
tions  resulting  from  a  hazardous  materials  release.  Since  1973  FRA  has  recorded 
one hazardous material related fatality on a short line and that fatality involved an 
unauthorized rider on a freight train. 

The  vast  majority  of  short  line  railroads  would  prefer  to  give  up  this  traffic.  We 
cannot  adequately  insure  for  the  risk  and  for  most  short  lines  a  single  accident 
means  going  out  of  business.  In  the  majority  of  cases  the  short  line  does  not  even 
set the rate so there is virtually no relationship between what we earn and the risk 
we  assume.  Compounding  the  rate  inadequacy  problem  is  the  fact  that  for  short 
lines the cost to insure one car is just a much as 100 cars. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

I fully understand how difficult this issue is for Congress. There is strong special 
interest  opposition  to  a  meaningful  cap  on  liability.  Neither  the  producers  nor  the 
end-users  are  willing  to  pay  the  real  price  associated  with  this  transportation  and 
would  vigorously  and  probably  successfully  oppose  any  such  proposal  in  Congress. 
But the fact remains that some day there will be an accident on a short line railroad 
and that railroad will be put out of business. When that happens many more short 
line  railroad  owners  will  decide  the  risk  is  too  great  and  will  throw  in  the  towel. 
We believe that a realistic solution to this problem will involve some combination 
of  a  limit  on  liability,  a  greater  assumption  of  the  cost  by  the  producers  and  end- 
users  and  perhaps  some  kind  of  government  insurance  program  that  assumes  the 
risk  above  a  certain  level.  For  that  to  work  for  short  lines  however  there  needs  to 
be  some  bridge  between  our  company  insurance  and  what  will  undoubtedly  be  a 
much higher liability limit under the new mechanism. 

I  strongly  urge  this  Committee  to  vigorously  pursue  a  solution  before,  not  after, 
a  crisis  occurs.  The  short  line  industry  certainly  stands  ready  to  make  whatever 
modest contribution we can to crafting that solution. 

The  short  line  railroad  industry  understands  the  importance  of  safety  and  has 
made  a  substantial  investment  in  making  our  properties  safer.  It  is  good  for  our 
business  and  it  is  the  necessary  and  right  thing  to  do  for  our  employees.  We  stand 
ready  to  work  with  the  Federal  Government  in  its  efforts  to  continue  making 
progress in this important area. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much each of you for your 

testimony. 

I  would  ask  first,  Mr.  Wytkind,  do  you  believe  that  the  FRA 
could accomplish what the railroads and labor could not collectively 
agree upon, that is a fair and effective update to the hours-of-serv-
ice law? Do you think the FRA can accomplish that despite the fact 
that the railroads and labor could not agree upon it? 

Mr. WYTKIND. Well, let me say the Federal Railroad Administra-
tion  to  the  extent  it  needs  the  authority  to—to  try  to  address  the 
issue;  that  should  be  done.  But  Congress  needs  to  speak  on  this 
issue  and  provide  very  clear  directives  on  some  very  important 
issues. Not the least of which are how you manage this fatigue cri-
sis in the industry, how the workers are scheduled, the overuse and 
abuse of limbo time and the need to eliminate that. 

So,  I  think  obviously  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  needs 
to have a role in establishing the new standards that will be appli-
cable  to  the  railroad  industry.  But  the  Congress  has  to  speak  on 
it. We’ve spoken very aggressively on the House side. We obviously 
have expressed our views over here on the Senate side. 

And  it  is  our  hope  that  the  legislation  will  very  clearly  address 
these issues. So that you do not have, for example, a worker seeing 
its employer use six, 7 hours of limbo time on the job and then ba-
sically  run  into  this  crisis  that  you  and  the  government  panel  had 
a long discussion about which is how you manage this long residual 
effect of fatigue in the workforce. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Hamberger,  we’re  pleased  to  see  the 
robust  growth  in  the  industry.  We  look  at  profits  as  an  ordinary 
reflection of the opportunity in business. I come from the corporate 
world  and  I  know  the  profits  are  good,  but  I  hope  that  it’s  not  at 
the  expense  of  safety.  And  I  heard  you  talk  about  the  growth  and 
safe performance over the last years. How do you propose address-
ing the fatigue question in the railroad industries? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Let me—if I could just address the first part of 
your  predicate  there.  It  is  indeed  true  that  2006  was  a  good  year 
for  our  industry  and  that’s  why  we  are  re-investing  $9.4  billion 
back into the industry. We are not sitting idly by. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What are the revenues of the industry? 
Mr. HAMBERGER. About 50, so it’s about 20 percent. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Fifty billion dollars. 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Yes,  about  20  percent  going  back  into  CapEx 
and  then  on  top  of  that  a  similar  amount  for  maintenance.  So  we 
spend close to 40 percent on maintaining, expanding and improving 
the infrastructure. And frankly, if we weren’t doing that—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Forty percent of what? 
Mr. HAMBERGER. Forty percent of all revenues. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  you’re  not  suggesting  that  that  40 

percent is part of operating cost, are you? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. There’s CapEx and there’s maintenance. No, on 
top  of  that  would  be  labor  cost  which  is  about  another  35  percent 
of the revenue. So, no. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Careful,  you’re  going  to  run  out  of  profits. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. Good point. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—will not get a lot of sympathy for you. 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  And  so  the  point  is  we  are  not  sitting  idly  by. 
We are investing. And frankly, the fact is that we are growing the 
business. A little known fact is that UPS is our biggest single cus-
tomer.  They  have  very  high  demands  on  being  able  to  move  their 
containers across the system. You can’t do that if you sit back and 
let  track  become  decrepit,  as  some  have  suggested.  In  fact,  we  are 
investing  and  upgrading  the  track,  upgrading  the  signal  systems 
and that improves both service and safety. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  also  we  don’t  want  to  see  gain  based 
on  unfair  treatment  of  employees.  I  mean  the  hours-of-service  are 
just—— 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Absolutely correct. Our proposal on limbo time, 
specifically.  Let  me  give  you  our  whole  fatigue  proposal  that  we 
submitted  to  the  House.  Certainly  we  believe  that  the  8  hours  off 
is not enough. In the current statute it should be 10 hours off after 
every  shift,  both  at  home  and  away  terminals.  And  that  should  be 
uninterrupted time off. That is to say that you would not get called 
for your next turn of duty until that 10 hours has expired. 

We  believe,  generally  speaking,  there  are  one  or  two  railroads 
that  don’t  agree  with  this  but,  generally  speaking,  there  should  be 
a  cap  of  276  hours  per  month,  far  below  what  you  heard  from  the 
NTSB  with  respect  to  maritime  and  trucking.  And  with  respect  to 
limbo  time,  we  agree  that  if  limbo  time  occurs,  that  there  should 
be  additional  rest  because  the  issue  is—as  the  NTSB  gentleman 
said, you don’t want to send someone out there with a sleep deficit. 
Now,  limbo  time  occurs  because  something  has  happened  on  the 
system.  It  is  not  baked  into  our  operating  plans.  There’s  a  grade 
crossing  accident  and  all  of  the  trains  have  to  stop  while  that  is 
dealt  with  at  the  crossing.  There’s  a  washout.  There’s  an  accident. 
There  are  any  number  of  issues  that  can  cause  the  system  to  slow 
down.  And  what  we’re  saying  is  it  should  not  be  a  violation  of 
hours-of-service,  but  indeed,  the  employees  should  get  14  hours  of 
rest  when  limbo  time—when  more  than  1  hour  of  limbo-time  oc-
curs. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Wytkind,  are  you  satisfied  that  some 

show of improvement from where we’ve been for these years? 

Mr. WYTKIND. Safety in the industry? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr.  WYTKIND.  No.  Because  one  of  the  things  I  think  that’s  lost 
in the statistics is that—and if you go back actually 20, at least 20 
years,  going  back  to  the  1980s.  Every  major  governmental  inves-
tigation  report  I’ve  read  in  my  career  representing  workers  in  this 
town  has  shown  a  significant  amount  of  under-reporting;  and  very 
inadequate government data collection in understanding what inju-
ries and accidents actually occur and how many there are. 

So the fact that our workers are constantly harassed and intimi-
dated  in  an  effort  to  suppress  the  reporting  of  injuries  and  acci-
dents  and  in  our  proposal  we  say  it  goes  further  to  include  safety 
and security risks on the job. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Just for the moment and look at what Mr. 
Hamberger said about the increase in the hours for rest from eight 
to ten, is that what I—— 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Is that a positive? 
Mr. WYTKIND. Well, look. Any movement by the railroad industry 
to  try  to  address  this  issue  is  obviously  going  to  get  us  to,  hope-
fully,  a  position  where  we’re  actually  talking  to  the  employers 
about  how  best  to  address  this.  But  it’s  very  clear  to  us  that  they 
do not want Congress to prescribe much of what they do operation-
ally as railroads. 

And  from  our—in  our  judgment  for  us  to  actually  deal  with  this 
issue  in  a  responsible  way  we’re  going  to  have  to  stop  the  abuse 
of  how  you  schedule  workers.  You’re  going  to  have  to  put  very  le-
gitimate  benchmarks  in  the  law  that  prescribes  how  you’re  going 
to  deal  with  rest,  how  you’re  going  to  deal  with  the  length  of  time 
on the job. I don’t think they’re going far enough. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  don’t  want  to  place  anybody  at  a  dis-
advantage here. I’m not an arbitrator but I was just struck by one 
thing that indicated at least some improvement of, well, significant 
magnitude. 

Mr. WYTKIND. Well, yes, but Mr. Chairman, one important point 
missing  is,  Mr.  Hamberger  didn’t  talk  about  the  need  to  eliminate 
the misuse of limbo time. And the fact that workers are sitting for 
several hours in—on the job. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I  heard  and  once  again  I  don’t  pick 

favorites. 

Mr. WYTKIND. I understand. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  That  when  I  hear,  regardless  of  how  you 
identify, but a wait time or a home time, but the same rest period 
should be, the rest period should be lengthened. 

And this isn’t to say that there’s not fault to go around here, ab-
solutely.  I’m  concerned  most  about  the  safety  issue  here.  And  in 
order to make sure that safety opportunity is maximized; you have 
to  consider  the  condition  of  the  employees  who  are  running  the 
thing. 

I  mean,  look  at  our  disservice  to  the  trucking  industry  and  be-
cause  so  many  independent  operators  are  there,  it  makes  it  much 
tougher  to  manage.  And  so,  but,  Mr.  Timmons,  with  the  Short 
Lines,  business  is  growing  and  are  profits  showing?  I  don’t  mean 
to be poetic here, it’s just. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

Mr.  TIMMONS.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  trickle  down  effect  from  the 
Class  I  railroads  onto  the  Class  II’s  and  Class  III’s  is  direct.  In 
other  words,  as  the  Class  I’s  do  well,  so  do  the  Class  II  and  Class 
III  railroads.  And  over  the  last  5  years  or  so,  the  success  of  the 
Class  I  railroad  industry  has  certainly  been  felt.  And  the  smaller 
railroad  industry  is  growing  and  investing  in  its  systems,  expand-
ing and improving the infrastructure. 

Now in the last year or so we’ve seen a softening of the economy 
and  so  there’s  generally  a  flat  profile  for  the  small  railroad  indus-
try. And I think that’s probably not uncharacteristic of what’s going 
on,  at  least,  this  year  in  the  Class  I  industry.  So,  not  bad  in  the 
last few years, but we’ve hit a soft spot for the present. 

The investment in the safety piece, of course, as the Class Is be-
come  more  sophisticated  and  increase,  as  a  result  the  market 
forces,  the  weight  of  their  equipment.  The  Class  II  and  Class  III 
industry  have  had  to  adjust  and  increase  the  robustness  of  their 
track  structure.  The  tax  credit  which  was  passed  in  2005,  went  in 
effect in 2005 and 2006 and exhausts this year was one of the prin-
ciple  ways  for  us  to  facilitate  increasing  the  track  structure  to 
286,000 pounds. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  You  stated  earlier  that  the  Short  Line  in-
dustry puts nearly one-third of its annual gross revenues into track 
and  equipment  improvements.  Now,  again,  similar  to  the  question 
I  asked  Mr.  Hamberger,  you’re  not  talking  about  operating  ex-
penses in that class of expenditure? 

Mr. TIMMONS. No, sir. We are not. This is a—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. We could call them capital investments. 
Mr. TIMMONS.—capital expenditures, yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Capital  expenditures.  Now,  equipment  is 
commonly  purchased,  sold  and  leased.  I  mean,  we’ve  seen  the  air-
line industry and sometimes a purchase is made directly by the les-
see.  And  is  that  considered  debt  on  your  balance  sheet,  the  leases 
that you sign for equipment? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I’m  going  to  defer  and  get  back  to  you  on  that 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  was  curious.  There  are  plenty  of  inves-

tors who want to take title to this equipment. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  There  are  leasing  companies.  For  example,  GE 

Capital is a large—— 

sir. 

you. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I  better  leave  it  where  I  said  I’ll  get  back  to 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 

RAILROAD INVESTMENT IN INFRASTRUCTURE AND EQUIPMENT 

Railroads  are  highly  capital  intensive  and  they  commit  funds  for  infrastructure 
and equipment in three general ways. First, railroads incur operating expenses pri-
marily for repair and maintenance of both roadway and structures, and locomotives 
and  freight  cars.  Class  I  railroad  operating  expenses  for  infrastructure  and  equip-
ment during 2006 totaled $10.9 billion or more than one-quarter of all operating ex-
penses (excluding an additional $4.4 billion in depreciation expenses associated with 
‘‘writing off’’ prior long-term investments). 

The second type of spending by the railroads is capital expenditures. These funds 
are used for replenishment and expansion. Class I railroad capital expenditures for 
2006  totaled  $8.5  billion.  These  outlays  are  comprised  of  both  the  traditional  large- 
scale projects which are booked as capital expenditures and expensed over a period 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

of  years  as  depreciation  as  well  as  long-term  leases  of  rolling  stock  which  are  simi-
larly  capitalized.  Unlike  most  other  modes,  freight  railroads  own  the  infrastructure 
over  which  they  operate  and  must  build,  replace,  and  maintain  that  infrastructure 
at their own expense. Capital expenditures for wooden and concrete track ties alone 
have  totaled  over  $1  billion  for  the  past  four  consecutive  years.  To  put  the  heavy 
capital  demands  of  railroading  into  perspective,  freight  railroads’  capital  expendi-
tures per revenue dollar (17.2 percent) have been five times that of the average U.S. 
manufacturer (3.4 percent) over the past 10 years. 

Operating  leases  are  a  third  type  of  investment  vehicle  that  railroads  use,  and 
this method is employed mostly for rolling stock. Railroad leases that are capitalized 
(discussed  above)  are  reported  in  the  balance  sheet 1 of  the  regulatory  report  made 
by Class I railroads. There is no such accounting provision for the reporting of oper-
ating  leases.  The  western  Class  I  railroads  in  particular  make  significant  use 2 of 
operating  leases  to  add  new  locomotives  to  their  fleet,  and  the  financial  impacts  of 
those  transactions  are  not  reflected  in  the  balance  sheet  or  capital  expenditure 
items of the regulatory report.3 In their shareholder reports, some railroads disclose 
a ‘‘lease-adjusted debt to total capital’’ percentage, but it is considered a non-GAAP 
(Generally  Accepted  Accounting  Principles)  financial  measure.  Operating  leases  are 
quantified  or  valued  by  stating  them  on  a  net  present  value  of  future  lease  pay-
ments  basis.  The  Association  of  American  Railroads  estimates  that  new  operating 
leases  represented  a  Class  I  railroad  investment  commitment  of  over  $1  billion  in 
funds in 2006. Any difficulty or inconsistency in accounting for operating leases and 
their  impact  on  balance  sheets  is  currently  being  addressed.  On  July  19,  2006,  the 
Financial Accounting Standards Board announced a new agenda item to ‘‘reconsider 
the  current  accounting  standards  for  leases.’’  Some  believe  that  potential  changes 
to  the  current  accounting  standards  for  leases  could  cause  almost  all  leases  to  be 
capitalized. 

The  Association  of  American  Railroads  (AAR)  will  sometimes  refer  to  infrastruc-
ture  and  equipment  ‘‘outlays’’  or  ‘‘spending’’.  This  is  a  measure  of  capital  expendi-
tures  plus  related  operating  expenses.  Because  depreciation-generated  amounts 
apply to prior capital expenditures, depreciation expense must be deducted from the 
capital  expenditure  and  expense  sum  total  to  avoid  double  counting.  Class  I  infra-
structure and equipment spending for 2006 totaled $19.3 billion. 

The  AAR  will  also  sometimes  refer  to  ‘‘capital  commitments’’  for  infrastructure 
and equipment. This is a measure of capital expenditures plus the net present value 
of  new  operating  leases.  The  AAR  does  not  have  a  report  to  directly  retrieve  the 
value  of  operating  leases,  but  some  figures  can  be  found  in  railroad  presentations 
and reports to shareholders, investors, and stock analysts. Although the AAR origi-
nally projected capital commitments for 2006 to be $8.6 billion, we now believe that 
they may exceed $9.0 billion. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Hamberger,  safety  technology  is  mov-
ing at a rapid pace in other industries. New cars that can self-park 
and others that have a collision warning system to warn drivers of 
impending obstacles and stop the car if the driver doesn’t react. Ac-
cordingly  locomotive  cab  alert  systems  and  automatic  devices  that 
stop trains have been in place for, in portions of the railroad indus-
try,  for  many  years.  Why  is  it  taking  so  long  for  the  industry  to 
further implement the PTC? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Well, one of the issues and you put your finger 
on  it  earlier,  is  indeed  capital  and  where  do  you  put  that  capital. 
We  are  putting  it  into  upgrading  the  infrastructure.  For  example, 
new track and new signal systems, new locomotives, new cars, new 
capacity to serve the customers. 

1 Annual Report Form R–1, Schedule 200, Line 43. The Surface Transportation Board requires 

every Class I railroad operating within the United States to submit the Annual Report. 

2 Union  Pacific  Corporation  lists  the  net  present  value  of  its  new  operating  leases  for  2006 
as  $443  million  on  page  4  of  its  2006  Analyst  Fact  Book.  A  similar  amount  can  be  concluded 
for  Burlington  Northern  Santa  Fe  based  on  their  Capital  Commitments  slide  used  in  presen-
tations to stock analysts. 

3 Therefore,  ‘‘debt’’  is  somewhat  underrepresented  in  the  balance  sheet  of  carrier  reports  to 
the  Surface  Transportation  Board—although  the  figure  reported  is  accurate  by  the  rules  of  ac-
counting. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

At the same time, we were in a 5 year program with the Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  and  the  Illinois  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  to  try  to  prove  that  technology  south  of  Chicago.  Former 
FRA  Chief  Jolene  Molitoris,  sent  a  report  to  Congress  indicating 
that a PTC system at the time would be about $6 billion to imple-
ment with about $2 billion worth of benefits. And so, that cost ben-
efit ratio wasn’t there. 

What’s happened in the interim because of that work done in Illi-
nois  is  that  some  of  these  suppliers  have  developed  a  less  costly 
and  effective  system  as  opposed  to  a  fail  safe  system.  One  of  our 
members  has  gotten  approval  from  FRA  to  implement.  Others  are 
testing  it  and  I  think  that  it  will  be  rolled  out  in  the  next  several 
years across the industry. 

One  of  the  things  that  we’ve  got  to  make  sure,  of  course,  is  that 
it  is  interoperable.  That  is,  we  have  so  many  trains  that  run 
from—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What about the improvements being made 

now and even contemplated further with the tanker cars? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. We have implemented a new tank car 
standard  effective  January  1,  2008.  It  will  reduce  the  likelihood  of 
leaks if an accident occurs. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Rupture. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir, by 63 percent. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And that’s further thickening. 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  It’s  further  thickening  of  what  is  called  the 
head shield, the ends of the tanker as well as the sides of the tank-
er  and  a  new  design  of  the  top  fittings  where  the  chlorine  or  the 
anhydrous ammonia goes in. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It’s not dissimilar from the double hull? 
Mr. HAMBERGER. It’s not specifically a double hull, but—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I understand. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. The concept is the same, yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Timmons,  you  folks  are  looking  at 
PTC,  I’m  sure.  What  other  technological  improvements  are  the 
Short Lines looking at in order to improve safety? 

Mr.  TIMMONS.  Well,  sir  the  ability  for  us  to  enhance  and  cap-
italize on detectors, weight size detectors for hot bearings journals, 
GPS  for  tracking  hazardous  materials;  better  dispatching  and  re-
porting systems that are done electronically. 

There  are  about  556  small  railroads,  many  of  which  are  very, 
very  small,  measured  in  less  than  ten  mile  increments.  Some  are 
very,  very  sophisticated  and  are  seven,  eight  and  nine  hundred 
miles. The very, very small railroads are marginally profitable. And 
so  the  challenge  for  them  and  the  challenge  for  us  is  to  provide 
technology solutions that will permit them to interface and connect 
with  the  major  railroad’s  systems  and  their  Class  II  and  Class  III 
brethren. 

So,  there’s  a  whole  host  of  both  electronic  reporting  measures 
and  safety  measures  that  would  give  us  an  indication  of  the  serv-
iceability and the reliability. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Those are included in the plans for the in-

dustry these—— 

Mr. TIMMONS. Yes, sir, indeed they are. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

97 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  wanted  to  get  back  to  something  that 
Mr. Wytkind raised because from the research that we’ve done. We 
hear  that  there  are  lots  of  complaints  in  the  area  of  harassment 
and intimidation of employees. Now, Mr. Wytkind, do you see FRA 
doing  what  it  can  or  as  much  as  it  can  do  to  prevent  harassment 
and intimidation and to punish those who violate FRA regulations? 
Mr. WYTKIND. No, I don’t see them doing enough. Mr. Chairman, 
I do not see them doing enough. There are a number of reports that 
I’ve read that we’ve provided the Committee that provide overviews 
of  specific  instances  where  workers  are  harassed  and  intimidated 
in cases involving, for example, personal injuries on the job. 

But  I  believe  the  only  way  that  this  is  going  to  be  addressed  is 
if Congress speaks very forcefully with strong whistleblower protec-
tions, as you have in many other pieces of legislation up here over 
the  years.  And  make  it  very  clear  that  if  a  worker  deals  with  an 
injury, a security risk or a safety risk on the job; he or she will not 
face  intimidation,  harassment  or  any  employer  reprisal  as  a  result 
of speaking out on these issues. 

The  Federal  Railroad  Administration  could  be  far  more  vigilant 
about  it.  They  unfortunately  are  not  unless  a  specific  case  is 
brought  to  their  attention.  And  then  they  go  through  their  inves-
tigative  process.  But  the  bottom  line  is  we  think  Congress  has  to 
speak on this issue. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I have several other questions which I will 
submit in writing. I close with this one for general response. There 
are lots of retirements. We’ve heard that for a long time about rail-
road  employees.  And  what  suggestions  do  we  have  for  improving 
training  for  the  railroad  employees  that  are  new  and  ensuring  an 
adequately trained rail workforce? That’s the critical issue. 

Mr. WYTKIND. Well, one of the things that I’ve been working on— 
I appreciate that question, Mr. Chairman, is over many years we’ve 
tried  to  get  workers  more  training.  By  giving  them  true  classroom 
style, on the job training, not just this one-size-fits-all or send them 
home  with  a  video.  Which  I  think  was  a  big  issue  we  discussed  in 
this Committee in the aftermath of 9/11. 

And  I  hear  very  specific  reports  from  my  member  unions  that 
workers  are  not  receiving  real  training  in  the  way  that  you  and  I 
would  think  real  training  is.  A  worker  comes  on  the  job  and  the 
railroad industry relies on his or her peers to get that worker ready 
for the job that he or she performs. We think there have to be very 
specific,  very  specific  mandates  that  this  training  be  comprehen-
sive,  that  it  be  uniform,  that  it  not  just  simply  rely  on  the  worker 
to  worker,  kind  of  peer  training  program  that  workers  are  allowed 
on the job to be given true classroom style training. 

And if you pivot that to the security arena that becomes a really, 
really  important  task  because  if  you  have  workers  that  really  do 
not know what they are supposed to do if there is a security breach 
on  the  job;  which  I  hear  all  the  time  from  my  member  unions  and 
their  local  people  then  you’ve  got  a  real  problem.  That  this  indus-
try, despite its profit, isn’t dealing with, I believe, adequately. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Are you comfortable that FRA is the agen-

cy to monitor these complaints and criticisms? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  I  think  that’s  fine  as  long  as  the  Congress  puts 
very  specific  requirements  in  the  law  that  allow—establishes  such 
standards under which the FRA—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  can  write  the  laws—enforcement  of 

laws that we write is often a question. 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  Well,  and  I  think  they  don’t  have  enough  inspec-
tors,  which  is  what  I  said  in  my  submitted  testimony.  We  believe 
the  hiring  of  more  inspectors  is  needed  systemwide  at  the  Federal 
Railway  Administration  which  would  help  in  monitoring  a  lot  of 
the safety compliance questions. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hamberger, you look like you want to 

comment on this. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I’m  not  much  of  a  poker  player.  This  is  about 
the fifth time, Mr. Wytkind and I have testified next to each other 
this spring. And I sometimes believe we’re in parallel universes. 

My  members,  of  course,  do  not  believe  there  is  a  culture  of  har-
assment and intimidation. And in fact, just the opposite that there 
is  a  culture  of  safety.  There  are  rules  on  the  books  for  whistle-
blower protection. And when a case comes up and if a manager has 
made  a  transgression  that  manager  is  reprimanded  and  punished. 
With  respect  to  training  there  are  training  regimes  that  have  to 
be  submitted  to  the  FRA  for  engineers  that  the  FRA  can  and  has 
to  review.  And  UTU,  the  conductors  on  the  locomotive  have  a  6- 
month  training  program  that  was  developed  with  UTU  involve-
ment. 

And  again  when  we  talk  about  the  new  employees  coming  into 
the  industry  the  facts  tell  you  that  they  must  be  trained  properly 
because  our  accident  rate  continues  to  improve.  Our  employee  in-
jury  rate  continues  to  improve.  With  respect  to  security  training, 
we  have  developed  through  Rutgers  University,  a  fine  university, 
I might add, and the National Transportation Institute modules for 
security  training.  We’ve  submitted  that  to  the  FRA,  to  TSA.  They 
have approved it. 

I  believe  the  Rail  Security  bill  has  training  in  it.  You  know, 
great.  You  know,  we  want  our  people  to  be  trained.  We  do  believe 
that the training that we do will meet the requirements of TSA and 
FRA. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  thank  you.  Mr.  Timmons  we  won’t 

close you out, your response. 

Mr.  TIMMONS.  Give  me  just  a  moment,  sir.  And  let  me  say  that 
I  think  this  is  a  good  news  story  for  the  small  railroad  industry. 
And  as  you  are—as  you  commented  and  are  precisely  correct,  by 
2012  there  will  be  a  large  reduction  in  railroad  eligible  retirees; 
80,000 will reach 60 years of service—60 years of age and 30 years 
of service. 

The  good  news  for  the  Short  Line  industry  is  that  there  is  some 
trickle  down  in  that  regard.  As  they  retire  from  the  Class  I  indus-
try  many  of  those  people  migrate  into  the  small  railroad  commu-
nity.  In  addition  to  the  training  initiatives  and  there  are  three  or 
four of them that are afoot. Primarily the Class Is do a lot of train-
ing,  formal  training  of  small  railroads  through  their  programs  as 
their interchange partners. 

The Short Line Association as well as the FRA has partnered in 
a  number  of  training  programs  on  an  annual  basis  both  specific 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

99 

programs  and  broader  based  programs  related  to  safety  and  haz-
ardous  material.  And  of  course  we’re  partnered  with  the  National 
Academy of Railway Sciences. Along with Internet-based programs 
we  believe  that  we’ve  got  a  fairly  reasonable  approach  to  training 
new  employees  coming  into  the  industry  and  capitalizing  on  those 
that  are  actually  retiring  at  age  60.  More  to  be  done,  a  lot  more 
seminar  work  that  we’re  engaged  in  on  an  annual  basis,  but  I 
think  it’s  a  reasonably  good  story  considering  the  size  and  the 
tempo of our organization. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you each. We’ll be considering your 
testimony very seriously as we start to do a new FRA reauthoriza-
tion. Thank you. 

[Whereupon, at 12 p.m. the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

JO STRANG 

Question  1.  If  given  the  authority  to  set  hours-of-service  standards  via  the  rule-
making  process,  what  reason  do  you  have  to  believe  that  the  Administration  will 
be  able  to  devise  a  standard  that  will  improve  safety  and  withstand  judicial  chal-
lenge, unlike the hours-of-service approach in the trucking industry? 

Answer.  Section  307  of  the  Administration  bill  would  insulate  regulations  issued 
under that section from judicial review. (In particular, please see proposed 49 U.S.C. 
20158(d)  in  section  307(c)  of  the  bill.)  We  have  requested  that  language  to  avoid 
delays in implementing this important initiative. 

However,  even  in  the  absence  of  this  restriction,  we  would  pursue  implementing 
this  important  initiative  if  given  the  authority.  Several  reasons  lead  FRA  to  firmly 
believe that the agency will be able to devise a standard that will improve railroad 
safety and, we hope, will withstand judicial challenge. 

First,  if  the  Secretary  is  granted  railroad  hours-of-service  rulemaking  authority, 
FRA in exercising that authority would, of course, have the benefit of hindsight. In 
any future hours-of-service rulemaking, FRA would be able to use past adverse deci-
sions to avoid similar alleged procedural pitfalls. 

Second,  we  have  proposed  to  use  FRA’s  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee 
(RSAC)  to  fully  involve  all  concerned  stakeholders,  especially  labor  organizations 
and  the  carriers,  in  the  rulemaking  process.  Under  this  process,  all  affected  stake-
holder groups are expected to reach consensus on the proposed rulemaking, increas-
ing  the  likelihood  of  acceptance.  This  consensus-based  process  should  result  in  an 
effective  hours-of-service  regulation  that  will  allow  flexibility  within  railroad  indus-
try to adjust individual fatigue risk management systems as times or conditions, or 
both, change. 

Third,  standards  developed  in  the  RSAC  process  will  be  based  on  a  detailed  con-
sideration of the science that underlies circadian rhythms, sleep, and alertness spe-
cific to the railroad industry, thereby reducing the likelihood that any judicial chal-
lenge could be successful. FRA has accumulated a considerable body of scientific in-
formation  about  work  schedules,  fatigue,  operator  performance,  technology  to  man-
age  fatigue,  and  accidents  in  the  railroad  industry  over  the  past  10  years.  This  in-
formation  will  help  the  RSAC  make  informed  decisions  about  how  to  balance  the 
operational needs of carriers against operators’ need for adequate rest and the pub-
lic  safety.  More  detail  about  available  research  can  be  found  on  the  FRA  website 
at—http://www.fra.dot.gov/downloads/safety/fatiguewhitepaper112706.pdf. 

Fourth,  FRA  would  propose  to  take  a  fatigue  prevention  and  management  ap-
proach to this task—focusing on education and awareness, as well as hours-of-serv-
ice.  Again,  this  will  ensure  that  the  regulatory  process  is  well  aligned  with  the 
science of fatigue management. 

Question  2.  In  your  opinion,  what  is  preventing  Class  I  railroads  from  imple-

menting Positive Train Control systems nationwide? 

Answer.  FRA  recognizes  that  it  may  seem  that  it  is  taking  a  long  time  for  rail-
roads  to  implement  Positive  Train  Control  (PTC)  systems  on  their  properties.  The 
fact is, however, that a great deal has been done and is currently being done toward 
this end. Also, ongoing development and implementation of these systems continues 
to  increase  at  a  quicker  pace  as  more  is  learned  and  experience  is  gained,  making 
development and implementation of the systems less onerous a task, as well as var-
ious  benefits  are  realized.  FRA  believes  continued  and  perhaps  more  aggressive 
growth  in  the  implementation  of  these  systems  is  highly  likely.  A  summary  of  the 
existing projects follows below: 

• There are currently 12 different PTC system projects. 
• They  involve  a  total  of  eight  different  railroads  and  are  located  in  15  different 

states. 

(101) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

102 

track miles. 

Management System (ETMS) on 35 subdivisions. 

• Current test projects consist of a total of 2,333 route miles and a total of 2,618 
• BNSF Railway Company alone has plans for implementing its Electronic Train 
• The Union Pacific Railroad Company is looking at its PTC system being imple-
mented  initially  on  four  major  subdivisions,  with  longer-term  goals  of  its  being 
expanded systemwide. 
• The  Northeast  Illinois  Regional  Rail  Corporation,  or  Metra,  is  planning  a  PTC 
• CSX Transportation, Inc., the Norfolk Southern Corporation railroads, the Alas-
ka Railroad, and the Ohio Central Railroad Company are all involved in the de-
velopment of PTC systems on their lines. 

system on it Rock Island line. 

It  should  be  noted  that  PTC  is  a  reality  on  much  of  the  Northeast  Corridor,  in-
cluding  all  segments  where  train  speeds  exceed  125  mph,  under  an  FRA  order.  Be-
tween  New  Haven,  Connecticut,  and  Boston,  Massachusetts,  all  trains  (intercity 
passenger, commuter and freight) run equipped with the Advanced Civil Speed En-
forcement  System  (ACSES)—which  is  integrated  into  the  automatic  cab  sign  and 
automatic train control system. Amtrak continues to develop the capabilities of that 
system, but its fundamental elements provide for full PTC functionalities. Amtrak’s 
Incremental Train Control System currently supports operations up to 95 mph, and 
Norfolk Southern freight trains on the line are also equipped. 

Additional  details  are  available  on  the  ‘‘Positive  Train  Control  (PTC)  Project 

Chart,’’ which I would like to submit for the record. 

On  the  other  hand,  some  of  the  main  reasons  that  progress  has  not  been  faster 

are as follows: 

can be captured by other, less costly technology; 

• the costs of PTC, which far exceed its safety benefits; 
• railroads’ limited funds available for capital investment; 
• the belief on the part of many in the industry that the business benefits of PTC 
• the absence of interoperability (e.g., locomotives equipped with one type of PTC 
that  works  on  a  line  equipped  with  that  type  of  PTC  cannot  use  their  PTC  on 
certain other lines equipped with a different type of PTC); and 
• the concern that systems may not be reliable and thus could exacerbate conges-

tion. 

The  impediments  to  implementation  of  PTC  are  described  in  somewhat  greater 
detail in DOT’s views letter on Section 601 of H.R. 2095 as introduced; that section 
would in effect mandate implementation of PTC systems on the main lines of Class 
I  railroads  by  the  end  of  2014.  Although  as  reported  by  the  full  House  Transpor-
tation and Infrastructure Committee, the Section allows the Secretary to extend the 
implementation  deadline  for  up  to  24  months,  FRA  thinks  that  the  proposed  man-
date  may  still  be  premature.  In  particular,  DOT  continues  to  have  three  main  con-
cerns about the provision. 

First,  as  reflected  in  the  FRA’s  report  to  the  Committees  on  Appropriations  enti-
tled  Benefits  and  Costs  of  Positive  Train  Control  (August  2004)  and  in  FRA’s  letter 
to  Congress  dated  May  17,  2000  (enclosing  the  RSAC’s  report  entitled  Implementa-
tion  of  Positive  Train  Control  Systems  (September  8,  1999)),  the  direct  safety  bene-
fits of PTC systems would fall far short of justifying the large investments required 
to  deploy  the  technology.  Business  benefits  will  be  required  to  support  the  invest-
ment,  and  if  they  are  there,  no  mandate  should  be  required.  If  they  are  not,  then 
the  process  of  technology  integration  has  not  matured  to  the  point  that  it  should 
be mandated, there being insufficient justification related to safety. 

Second,  as  described  in  these  reports,  the  Department  has  actively  supported  de-
ployment  of  PTC  through  research  and  demonstrations,  technical  assistance,  and 
issuance of performance-based regulations, and the railroads have been actively ex-
ploring  the  use  of  such  systems,  but  much  work  remains  to  be  done  in  developing 
the  systems  and  in  improving  standards  for  interoperability.  We  believe  strongly 
that the technologies that make up PTC should be deployed as they become market- 
ready, and not before. 

Finally, much of the benefit of PTC is expected to come from equipping passenger 
trains and routes. However, these benefits are unclear, as is whether these benefits 
would outweigh the costs of implementing the system, which are also unknown. 

It should be noted that recent months have brought new optimism that the major 
freight railroads will move forward with deployment of interoperable PTC. There ap-
pears  to  be  a  convergence  of  major  freight  railroads  around  the  basic  technology 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

103 

that  supports  the  BNSF  Railway’s  ETMS.  As  you  know,  this  past  December  FRA 
approved  the  Product  Safety  Plan  for  ETMS  Configuration  I  as  well  as  informa-
tional  filings  to  test  for  several  of  the  other  PTC  projects  ongoing.  (See  49  C.F.R. 
part  236,  subpart  H.)  The  next  steps  for  further  deployment  of  PTC  are  for  FRA, 
the railroads, and the product vendors to continue to work in a cooperative manner 
toward  development  of  successful  safety  documentation  supporting  continuing  im-
plementation  of  PTC.  Major  technical  obstacles  still  must  be  overcome,  including 
management  of  radio  frequency  spectrum  so  that  system  functions  in  a  timely  way 
and supports the necessary complement of on-board and wayside units. 

Question  3.  The  NTSB  has  said  the  Home  Valley,  Washington  accident  was 
caused  by  the  failure  of  the  railroad  to  respond  to  reports  of  ‘‘rough  rides,’’  which 
is a sign of defective track conditions. Are railroads allowing their own track inspec-
tors enough time to perform inspection duties? Is this a problem in the busy North-
east Corridor? 

Answer.  In  the  case  of  the  April  3,  2005,  Home  Valley,  Washington,  derailment, 
some  local  personnel  of  the  BNSF  Railway  Company  ignored  multiple  notifications 
that  the  track  was  deteriorating.  Train  crews  had  reported  the  location,  a  carrier 
geometry car had marked the location, and an FRA inspector had noted the location 
while riding an Amtrak train several days before the accident. Interviews taken fol-
lowing the accident show that the local personnel did not take any action to correct 
the conditions. The personnel involved were terminated following the accident inves-
tigation. The track segment involved in the Home Valley accident normally receives 
four  inspections  per  week,  a  frequency  that  exceeds  the  FRA  minimum  inspection 
requirements. These inspections would provide the inspectors with adequate time to 
locate and properly identify noncomplying conditions and then bring them into com-
pliance  or  notify  the  proper  carrier  management  for  any  follow-up  actions,  or  both. 
The  railroad  industry  has  been  having  increased  traffic,  requiring  the  railroads 
to be more efficient in their use of available track time to inspect, repair, and main-
tain  track,  as  well  as  bridges  and  other  wayside  structures.  The  railroads  are  uti-
lizing  automated  inspection  technologies  to  increase  their  inspection  efficiency  and 
focus their track inspector’s activities. The technologies include track geometry cars, 
internal rail defect test cars, gage restraint measurement systems, and vehicle/track 
interaction  monitors  mounted  on  locomotives.  In  addition,  new  technologies  are 
being  developed  to  assist  in  focusing  the  inspector’s  activities,  such  as  high-speed, 
high-resolution  optical  systems  to  detect  failed  joint  bars  and  connections,  and 
ground-penetrating radar systems to detect developing subgrade problems. 

The Northeast Corridor is considered a high-speed corridor, and the track and ve-
hicles  are  treated  as  an  interacting  system.  The  FRA  Track  Safety  Standards  re-
quire the track to be manually inspected twice a week. The manual inspections are 
accomplished  by  inspectors  walking  or  riding  a  hi-rail  vehicle  over  the  track.  FRA 
inspectors periodically accompany the railroad inspectors and indicate that adequate 
inspection time is available. 

Because  the  higher  speeds  require  that  the  track  and  vehicle  be  treated  together 
as  a  system,  the  Track  Safety  Standards  also  require  that  the  high-speed  track 
classes  (Classes  6–9,  track  used  for  the  operation  of  passenger  trains  and  certain 
freight  trains  at  maximum  speeds  ranging  from  110  mph  to  200  mph)  receive  var-
ious forms of automated inspections depending on the track class. Among the auto-
mated inspections required for high-speed track classes are inspections using— 

wheels; 

carbody and trucks; 

• An  instrumented  car  measuring  dynamic  vertical  and  lateral  loads  on  the 
• An  instrumented  car  measuring  dynamic  vertical  and  lateral  loads  on  the 
• A track geometry measurement system; and 
• A gage restraint measurement system. 
The  combination  of  manual  and  automated  inspections  allows  Amtrak  to  identify 
and  focus  inspection  and  maintenance  resources  on  deteriorating  areas  before  they 
reach the point of noncompliance. 

In  addition,  all  passenger  vehicles  operating  on  Class  7–9  track  (from  125  mph 
to  200  mph)  are  required  to  have  a  permanently  installed  lateral  accelerometer  on 
each  truck  frame  for  purposes  of  measuring  truck  hunting  accelerations.  Truck 
hunting can result from car suspension wear or track anomaly or both. This instru-
mentation  assists  the  track  inspector  in  locating  possible  deteriorating  track  condi-
tions. 

Track time to conduct inspections is finite. As train traffic increases, the available 
inspection time will constrict. Quality inspections to identify deteriorating conditions 
are crucial for safe train operations. Therefore, we expect to see railroads implement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

additional  technical  improvements  that  will  help  the  railroads’  inspectors  to  focus 
their efforts to accomplish their duties. 

104 

Question  4.  I  understand  that  the  FRA  is  reviewing  safety  procedures  to  protect 
pedestrians  at  rail  locations  where  there  are  multiple  at-grade  crossings,  especially 
those  near  train  stations.  What  is  the  status  of  this  review,  and  how  close  is  the 
FRA to developing safety standards to protect pedestrians? 

Answer.  Under  the  DOT  Grade  Crossing  Safety  Action  Plan  (Action  Plan)  issued 
in June 2004, FRA has the responsibility to develop and make available a compila-
tion  of  pedestrian  warning  devices  in  use  at  grade  crossings  of  all  types,  including 
pedestrian-only  crossings  over  railroad  tracks.  (I  should  note  that  FRA’s  activities 
in  this  area  are  intended  not  to  establish  safety  standards  but  instead  to  provide 
a  tool  to  be  used  by  local  authorities  when  addressing  pedestrian  safety  issues  at 
crossings;  local  authorities  are  best  placed  to  make  the  decisions  necessary  to  en-
hance  safety.)  FRA  has  worked  to  gather  information  on  any  signs,  signals,  pave-
ment markings, or other devices used to enhance the safety of pedestrians at grade 
crossings.  State  DOTs  and  rail  transit  operators  have  made  several  submissions, 
which have included background information and illustrations. These are presented 
in  the  draft  compilation  so  that  the  larger  grade  crossing  safety  community  might 
benefit  from  the  work  of  others  in  this  important  area.  A  draft  of  the  compilation 
of  pedestrian  warning  devices  has  been  completed  and  been  fully  reviewed  within 
FRA.  The  compilation  should  be  published  and  available  before  the  end  of  Fiscal 
Year (FY) 2007. 

Meanwhile,  the  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee’s  Passenger  Safety  Working 
Group  has  also  established  a  task  force  to  address  general  passenger  safety  issues, 
including  boarding  and  alighting  from  trains  and  moving  safely  in  passenger  sta-
tions.  That  task  force  is  currently  working  on  the  issue  of  platform  gaps,  but  the 
task  force  intends  shortly  to  take  up  the  issue  of  pedestrian  safety  at  pedestrian- 
only  crossings  in  relation  to  ‘‘second  train  incidents’’  in  and  around  passenger  sta-
tions. A ‘‘second train incident’’ involves a situation in which a pedestrian is injured 
or  killed  when  trying  to  cross  two  or  more  sets  of  railroad  tracks  at  a  pedestrian- 
only  crossing  because  of  the  movement  of  a  ‘‘second’’  train  traveling  on  one  track 
typically after the ‘‘first’’ train has stopped and already activated the crossing warn-
ing  system.  Initially,  the  task  force  intends  to  document  the  extent  and  nature  of 
the  problem  and  to  evaluate  best  practices  that  can  be  brought  to  bear  to  reduce 
these incidents, including the use of ‘‘second train coming’’ warning systems and pe-
destrian awareness efforts. 

Question  5.  What  are  FRA’s  plans  to  begin  working  with  the  other  four  states 
(CA, IL, IN, OH) identified by the Inspector General that continue to have the most 
grade crossing collisions and when FRA will start doing so? 

Answer.  First,  as  background,  FRA,  the  Federal  Highway  Administration 
(FHWA),  and  the  State  of  Louisiana  have  already  developed  and  put  in  place,  a 
state-specific crossing safety plan for Louisiana, and FRA and FHWA are currently 
working  with  the  State  of  Texas  to  develop  a  crossing  safety  plan  for  that  State, 
which should be completed by the end of FY07. 

Let  me  address  the  four  States  mentioned  in  your  question.  FRA  has  had  initial 
discussions with the Illinois Commerce Commission, which has agreed to participate 
in the development of a plan for that state. Formal planning meetings with Illinois 
agencies will begin before the end of FY07. Based on experiences with the previous 
plans,  it  is  anticipated  that  the  Illinois  plan  will  be  completed  by  the  end  of  FY08. 
FRA  will  approach  the  appropriate  State  agencies  in  California  and  Ohio  no  later 
than  the  second  quarter  in  FY08  to  solicit  support  for  the  development  of  plans  in 
these  states.  The  state  agency  in  Indiana  will  be  approached  when  the  State  plan 
for  Illinois  is  completed.  This  should  be  toward  the  end  of  FY08  or  the  beginning 
of FY09. 

Question 6. How does FRA plan to proceed in working with the FHWA to develop 
model legislation for states that will address all types of sight obstructions at grade 
crossings, especially those that are not protected with automatic gates and flashing 
lights? 

Answer.  FRA  and  FHWA  will  establish  a  joint  working  group  to  develop  model 
State legislation addressing sight distances at grade crossings equipped with passive 
warning  signs.  The  joint  working  group  will  review  existing  State  statutes  that  ad-
dress  sight  distance  to  determine  the  best  practices  in  place.  The  model  legislation 
would  be  developed  using  the  best  practices  and  would  be  distributed  to  all  States, 
with the goal that they consider the legislation and take appropriate action as a re-
sult. 

Question 7. In the FRA’s written response to the Inspector General’s grade cross-
ing  report  that  was  issued  on  May  3,  the  Subcommittee  would  like  to  know  FRA’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

105 

plans  to  ensure  that  railroads  have  consistently  issued  a  violation  and  assessed  a 
civil  penalty  each  time  a  railroad  fails  to  report  a  grade  crossing  collision,  as  re-
quired? 

Answer.  FRA  plans  to  amend  its  Statement  of  Agency  Policy  at  title  49  of  the 
Code of Federal Regulations (49 C.F.R.) part 209, appendix A, the agency’s General 
Manual,  and  the  agency’s  Operating  Practices  Compliance  Manual  to  make  obliga-
tory the submission of violation reports for each detected violation of 49 C.F.R. part 
225, when the violation in question is a clear-cut failure to report (i.e., not involving 
any  question  with  regard  to  interpretation  of  the  regulation  or  sufficiency  of  the 
facts  constituting  the  alleged  failure),  subject  to  application  of  considerations  man-
dated by the Small Business Regulatory Enforcement Fairness Act (SBREFA) where 
relevant. 

Question  8.  I  understand  the  FRA  has  expressed  reservations  about  assessing  a 

civil penalty each time a railroad fails to report a grade crossing collision. Why? 

Answer.  Since  mid-2004,  FRA  has  had  in  place  a  verbal  instruction  that  each 
clear-cut violation of an accident/incident reporting obligation—whether it relates to 
a  crossing  collision,  employee  injury,  or  train  accident—should,  absent  special  cir-
cumstances, be the subject of a proposed civil penalty. 

However,  it  should  be  noted  that  use  of  civil  penalty  authority  is  subject  to  the 
general guidance contained in 49 CFR part 209, appendix A, which specifies criteria 
to  be  applied  in  making  these  determinations,  and  appendix  C,  which  addresses 
small  entities,  as  required  by  the  Regulatory  Flexibility  Act  and  SBREFA.  So,  for 
example,  should  an  FRA  inspector  encounter  a  single  mistaken  failure  of  a  small 
railroad to report a grade crossing collision (e.g., out of confusion with the monetary 
threshold  required  for  rail  equipment  accident/incidents),  and  should  the  railroad 
immediately  file  a  report  as  required,  FRA  might  omit  use  of  a  civil  penalty  out  of 
deference  to  the  Congressional  policy  related  to  small  entities  and  in  recognition  of 
the fact that the circumstances are unlikely to be repeated. 

It also should be noted that FRA has the right to cite a railroad for each day that 
a  violation  continues.  This  can  represent  a  potentially  very  high  liability  for  each 
accident/incident  not  timely  reported.  FRA  will  utilize  this  mechanism  (citing  for 
multiple  days)  to  assess  more  substantial  penalties  where  railroad  conduct  is  per-
sistent and without substantial justification. 

ATTACHMENT 

PTC Projects Nationwide 

[Current and Proposed] 

FRA Region 

State Location 

RR 

System Name 

1 

Total 

2 
3 

Total 

4 

Total 

5 
6 
7 
8 

Total 

Route 
Miles 

177 
27 
204 ## 
356 
273 
120 
393 

Track 
Miles 

376 
54 
430 ## 
356 
273 
120 
393 

74 ** 
120 
132 
34 
358 
205 
175 
0 
531 
168 
153 
852 
2,545 

84 ** 
120 
132 
75 
409 
217 
367 
0 
541 
198 
153 
892 
3,066 

MA, RI, CT, NJ 

DE, MD 

Amtrak 
Amtrak 

SC, GA, TN 

6 
OH 

SC 
3 
MI 
IL 
IL 
IL 
2 

NE 
— 
AK 

6 
21 

TX, OK 

WY, WA, ID 

ND, MT 

1 

OCRS 
CSX 
NS 
2 

Amtrak 

UP 

BNSF 
METRA 

4 

BNSF 

UP 
None 
Alaska 

UP 

BNSF 

3 
8 

ACSES/ATC 
ACSES/ATC 

1 

Train Sentinel 

CBTM 
OTC 

2 

ITCS 

NAJPTC# 
ETMS I 
ETMS 

4 

ETMS II 

CBTC–VTMS 

CBTC–VTMS 

ETMS I* 

— 
CAS 

3 
13 

Grand Total 
# This system moved to the Transportation Technology Center, Inc., at Pueblo, CO, for further development. 
## Currently  in  revenue  service,  supporting  speeds  up  to  150  MPH.  Two  additional  ACSES  segments,  engi-

neered but not funded, are not included. 

* Upon planned installation on BNSF’s Hettinger Subdivision. 
** Assuming  that  ITCS  is  extended  another  eight  miles  to  Indiana  State  line.  ITCS  is  currently  installed  on 

66 route miles (76 track miles). ITCS track miles include six controlled sidings totaling 10 miles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Acronyms for PTC Systems in Chart 

106 

trol 

ACSES/ATC—Advanced  Civil  Speed  Enforcement  System/Automatic  Train  Con-

CBTM—Communication Based Train Management system 
OTC—Optimized Train Control system 
ITCS—Incremental Train Control System 
NAJPTC—North American Joint Positive Train Control system 
ETMS I—Electronic Train Management System configuration I 
ETMS II—Electronic Train Management System configuration II 
CBTC–VTMS—Communication  Based  Train  Control-Vital  Train  Management 

System 

CAS—Collision Avoidance System 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. ROBERT L. SUMWALT 

Question  1.  Given  the  trucking  hours-of-service  experience,  shouldn’t  there  be 
some  limitations  on  the  authority  given  to  the  Administration—to  prevent  them 
from weakening the hours-of-service rules currently in law? 

Answer.  Minimum  periods  of  undisturbed  rest  time  and  maximum  on  duty  time 
alone  do  not  take  into  consideration  other  factors  that  can  contribute  to  both  acute 
and  cumulative  fatigue,  such  as  scheduling  practices,  shift  rotations,  and  the  nat-
ural  circadian  rhythm.  The  Federal  Railroad  Administration  needs  the  authority  to 
regulate train crew fatigue by using scientifically based research. 

Question  2.  In  your  opinion,  what  is  preventing  Class  I  railroads  from  imple-

menting Positive Train Control systems nationwide? 

Answer.  Requirements  for  the  installation  of  positive  train  control  systems  have 
been  on  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board’s  list  of  Most  Wanted  Transpor-
tation  Safety  Improvements  for  17  years.  Positive  Train  Control  systems  provide  a 
safety redundancy to override human mistakes. In the past 10 years, we have inves-
tigated  52  train  collisions  and  over-speed  accidents  that  could  have  been  prevented 
if  positive  train  control  systems  had  been  installed.  We  do  not  believe  that  there 
are  obstacles  preventing  Class  I  railroads  from  implementing  positive  train  control 
systems  and  believe  that  it  is  time  to  establish  mandates  for  the  installation  of 
these systems. 

Question  3.  The  NTSB  has  said  the  Home  Valley,  Washington  accident  was 
caused  by  the  failure  of  the  railroad  to  respond  to  reports  of  ‘‘rough  rides,’’  which 
is a sign of defective track conditions. Are railroads allowing their own track inspec-
tors enough time to perform inspection duties? Is this a problem in the busy North-
east Corridor? 

Answer. Certainly, track time, inspection techniques and the number of inspectors 
available are all factors that can affect the adequacy of inspection activities. During 
our investigation of the Home Valley, Washington accident, we learned that because 
of  the  high  amount  of  train  traffic,  approximately  57  trains  a  day  over  58  miles  of 
the inspector’s assigned territory, the track inspector said that he had about 1⁄2 hour 
or  less  to  get  from  station  to  station  while  inspecting  track  from  a  hi-rail  vehicle. 
Stations  were  about  10  to  15  miles  apart.  The  track  inspector  stated  that  on  occa-
sion he conducted a walking inspection of the curves but that it had become too dif-
ficult after he lost his helper. The Safety Board determined that the BNSF Railway 
Company’s  response  to  multiple  reports  of  rough  track  conditions  was  inadequate 
and  recommended  that  the  BNSF,  as  part  of  its  track  inspector  audit  program,  de-
termine  whether  inspectors  are  provided  adequate  track  time  to  perform  their  du-
ties and take corrective action if necessary. 

The  Safety  Board  has  not  investigated  any  accidents  on  the  Northeast  Corridor 

where track time for inspectors was found to be a safety issue. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

KURT W. HYDE 

Question.  Your  office  reported  to  the  full  Committee  that  railroads  should  take 
measures  to  ensure  railroad  police  forces  are  used  in  ways  that  do  not  harass  and 
intimidate employees. The Class I railroads have stated they are in compliance with 
your  recommendations.  Do  you  agree  that  they  are  in  compliance?  Can  you  check 
and report back to us? 

Answer. In response to the question, OIG’s Chicago Office reached out to John F. 
Wetzel,  Vice  President,  Association  of  American  Railroads  to  ascertain  information 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

107 

regarding  the  Class  I  freight  railroads  implementation  of  OIG  recommendations. 
Wetzel provided the following summary response: 

• All  Class  I  freight  railroads,  BNSF  Railway,  CN,  Canadian  Pacific,  CSX,  Kan-
sas City Southern, Norfolk Southern, and Union Pacific—have adopted ‘‘specific 
guidelines  for  the  conduct  of  . . .  investigations’’  involving  their  employees,  as 
recommended  in  the  November  2004  OIG  report.  In  addition,  Amtrak  had  pre-
viously adopted such guidelines, as your report noted. 

• With respect to the two smaller railroads studied, Wetzel related it was his un-
derstanding  that  the  Florida  East  Coast  has  adopted  such  guidelines,  although 
that  railroad  is  not  a  member  of  the  AAR.  He  added  he  will  continue  to  reach 
out to the Indiana Harbor Belt, also a non-AAR member. 

Based  on  this  response  and  the  supporting  information  provided  (see  attached), 
we  feel  the  that  all  AAR-member  railroads  have  taken  the  steps  recommended  in 
the  IG’s  report.  Additionally,  we  will  reach  out  to  the  non-AAR  members  to  deter-
mine at what level they have or intend to implement the OIG recommendations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

EDWARD WYTKIND 

Question 1. Do you believe the FRA could accomplish what the railroads and labor 
could  not  collectively  agree  upon—that  is  a  fair  and  effective  update  to  the  hours- 
of-service law? How else do you propose to address employee fatigue in the railroad 
industry? 

Answer. It is a well-established fact that fatigue is a cause of accidents in the rail-
road  industry.  Labor  organizations  and  government  witnesses,  including  the  FRA 
and  NTSB,  have  testified  before  Congress  on  numerous  occasions  to  this  end.  The 
core  purpose  of  the  FRA  is  to  regulate  safety  in  the  rail  industry.  As  such,  we  do 
believe  it  is  necessary  to  grant  the  FRA  the  authority  to  regulate  fatigue;  however, 
the  statutory  protections  embodied  in  the  hours-of-service  law  are  important  and 
must be retained. Further, there are several areas which should be addressed imme-
diately. As transportation labor has testified, limbo time should be eliminated in its 
entirety.  Since  1996,  the  railroad  carriers  have  abused  the  ‘‘off-duty’’  time  spent  in 
transportation to a designated terminal. Similarly, railroad signal workers are regu-
larly  forced  to  work  beyond  their  hours-of-service  limits  due  to  a  routinely-abused 
four-hour  ‘‘emergency’’  extension  of  their  12  hour  work  day.  The  four-hour  emer-
gency  provision  should  be  repealed.  Additionally,  workers’  rest  time  should  not  be 
interrupted  by  communications  from  their  employers.  Despite  the  24/7  operation  of 
the  railroad  industry,  with  the  advances  in  technology  and  communication  devices 
there  is  no  reason  railroad  workers  should  not  have  advance  notice  of  their  sched-
ules and be able to plan accordingly for rest, commute and personal time. Adequate 
work-rest  periods  must  also  be  established  by  amending  the  Hours  of  Service  Act. 
Finally,  workers  must  not  face  retribution  if  they  are  unavailable  to  work  due  to 
extreme  fatigue.  Railroads’  imposed  attendance  policies  which  require  employees  to 
be on-call up to 95 percent of the time create unsafe conditions on our Nation’s rail-
roads and are egregious and unfair to employees. 

Question  2.  Many  railroad  workers  have  lost  their  lives  or  been  injured  working 
in the rail industry. As this Subcommittee begins to draft legislation on rail safety, 
what are the most critical issues which must be addressed from the employees’ per-
spective? 

Answer.  Because  the  laws  governing  rail  safety  have  not  been  reauthorized  in 
over a decade, the safety of railroad workers has been compromised. As I mentioned 
in  my  written  statement  and  in  those  statements  submitted  by  TTD  member  rail 
unions,  there  are  a  number  of  issues  that  must  be  addressed.  Any  worthwhile  rail 
safety  bill  must  include  strong  whistleblower  protections  for  workers;  stricter  en-
forcement of rail safety laws and regulations and stronger penalties against compa-
nies and employers that violate safety laws; improved and mandatory worker train-
ing programs; track safety improvements especially in the area of dark territory; re-
forms of the hours-of-service laws to eliminate ‘‘limbo’’ time and the abuse of ‘‘emer-
gency’’  time  for  signal  workers,  prevent  unnecessary  communication  with  workers 
during  rest  time,  and  require  adequate  work-rest  schedules;  and  prohibit  the  out-
sourcing  of  railroad  inspections  and  operating  responsibilities  at  our  southern  bor-
der. 

Question 3. Is the FRA doing as much as it can to prevent harassment and intimi-

dation of employees and to punish those who violate FRA regulations? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

108 

Answer. No. There continues to be a culture of intimidation and harassment that 
permeates  the  railroad  industry  like  no  other.  It  is  routine  for  workers  to  be  ‘‘dis-
couraged’’ from reporting accidents and from seeking appropriate medical attention. 
H.R.  2095,  the  Federal  Railroad  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2007,  includes  provi-
sions—which  we  strongly  endorse—to  provide  strong  whistleblower  protections  for 
workers  who  report  safety  violations  on  the  job  (Title  II)  and  increase  enforcement 
and  penalties  against  employers  who  violate  safety  regulations  (Title  V).  Further, 
we support the provision (Section 606 as amended) in H.R. 2095 which provides for 
prompt medical attention for an injured worker. 

Question  4.  Given  the  expected  impending  retirements  of  so  many  long-time  rail-
road  employees,  what  suggestions  do  you  have  for  improving  training  for  railroad 
employees and ensuring an adequately trained rail workforce? 

Answer.  Training  programs  for  basic  proficiency  and  safety  as  well  as  security 
must  be  made  mandatory  for  all  crafts  and  classes  of  railroad  workers—including 
contract  workers.  Historically  in  the  railroad  industry  it  is  on  the  job  peer-to-peer 
training rather than classroom or formal apprenticeship programs that is the norm. 
As  looming  retirements  of  an  aging  workforce  deplete  the  ranks  of  experienced 
workers,  the  industry  must  respond  by  instituting  programs  to  adequately  train 
their  workforces.  Unfortunately,  history  also  shows  that  it  is  exceedingly  unlikely 
that  the  carriers  will  institute  proper  training  curricula  without  a  legal  directive. 
Therefore, we urge you to include a training mandate for both new hires and recur-
rent programs for existing employees (and contract workers) in any rail safety legis-
lation.  Further,  certification  requirements  for  certain  crafts  would  also  improve 
overall  rail  safety.  Currently,  locomotive  engineers  must  be  certified.  Certification 
requirements  which  would  mandate  competency  standards  for  safety-sensitive 
groups such as conductors, dispatchers, signal workers, carmen, electricians and on- 
board personnel should be included in any rail safety bill. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

EDWARD R. HAMBERGER 

Question  1.  Do  you  believe  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  could  accomplish 
what  the  railroads  and  labor  could  not  collectively  agree  upon—that  is  a  fair  and 
effective update to the hours-of-service law? How else do you propose to address em-
ployee fatigue in the railroad industry? 

Answer. Railroads are amenable to a careful reexamination of the Hours of Serv-
ice Act’s statutory limitations. Changes in the HSA might help reduce fatigue in the 
rail workplace, but they need to be carefully considered to maximize the probability 
that they will actually attain the goals they are designed to achieve. 

Specifically, railroads do not object to several changes to existing employee hours- 
of-service  regulations.  First,  railroads  do  not  object  to  prohibiting  train  and  engine 
and  signal  employees  from  working  unless  they  have  had  at  least  ten  consecutive 
hours off duty (up from 8 hours under existing law) during the prior 24 hours. Rail-
roads do not object to a requirement that those 10 hours should be free of non-emer-
gency  phone  or  page  communications  from  railroads.  Second,  any  employee  who 
works 12 consecutive hours on duty, and then at least 1 hour of limbo time,1 would 
receive at least 14 hours of off-duty time once he or she is released from duty. Third, 
rail  train  and  engine  employees  would  be  subject  to  a  new  monthly  maximum  of 
276  hours  on  duty,  and  even  though  limbo  time  is  not  on-duty  time,  it  would  be 
included in those 276 hours.2 Hours beyond this new maximum, which is consistent 
with permissible hours for other modes of transportation, would be a violation of the 
HSA. 

Together, these measures not only significantly reduce the maximum on-duty time 
under  current  law,  but  they  also  strike  a  balance  between  the  concerns  that  limbo 
time contributes to fatigue and the realities of the unpredictability of railroad oper-
ations. 

The  above  changes  reflect  the  railroad  industry’s  preferred  approach.  Failing  use 
of this approach, railroads would support a transfer of the hours-of-service authority 
to the FRA, with reliance on FRA’s professional judgment. 

Question  2.  Locomotive  cab  alert  systems  and  automatic  devices  to  stop  trains 
have  been  in  place  in  portions  of  the  railroad  industry  for  many  years.  What  is  it 

1 ‘‘Limbo  time’’  refers  to  the  time  that  crews  spend  waiting  for  transportation  and  the  time 
they  spend  being  transported  to  where  they  are  released  from  duty.  Limbo  time  counts  as  nei-
ther time on-duty nor time off-duty. 

2 KCS and CN do not agree with this position, and Amtrak abstains on the issue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

109 

taking  so  long  for  the  industry  to  go  a  step  further  to  fully  implement  ‘‘Positive 
Train Control?’’ 

Answer.  Positive  Train  Control  has  been  and  continues  to  be  a  tough  technical 
challenge. Not only do systems have to be interoperable when implemented as tradi-
tional  train  control  systems  are  today,  but  they  also  need  to  improve  safety  while 
not  degrading  system  capacity  or  throughput.  The  most  difficult  task  is  to  incor-
porate predictive braking systems that are tied to current train control systems (e.g., 
signals) and do so to absolute stop (zero speed). Alerter systems are stand alone de-
vices  not  connected  in  any  way  to  the  train  control  system  and  are  much  simpler 
than  PTC.  They  rely  on  time  based  actions  from  the  locomotive  engineer  to  make 
sure  he  is  performing  a  function  to  control  the  train  and  if  not  then  the  train  is 
stopped.  With  the  PTC  system  precision  is  required  or  there  is  an  operational  (ca-
pacity)  impact  if  the  system  does  not  meet  the  precision  needed—which  can  ripple 
through the entire network. 

Developing  and  implementing  the  precision  required  for  ‘‘predictive’’  braking  sys-
tems  as  described  above  has  been  and  continues  to  be  a  very  difficult  task.  In  the 
meantime the train collisions per million train miles have dropped 86 percent since 
1980, so the fault space is much less. That improvement brings into question wheth-
er PTC can be cost effective (much smaller improvement in safety) and does not in-
troduce  risks  that  exceed  the  potential  benefit.  New  technology  always  has  some 
new  risks  when  initially  introduced.  The  FRA  rule  requires  those  risks  to  be  as-
sessed and this is not a trivial exercise. 

Question  3.  Given  the  expected  impeding  retirements  of  so  many  long-time  rail-
road  employees,  what  suggestions  do  you  have  for  improving  training  for  railroad 
employees and ensuring an adequately trained rail workforce? 

Answer.  Railroads  can  always  make  improvements  to  our  training  programs  and 
are  constantly  reexamining  them.  However,  we  believe  our  training  programs  are 
fundamentally sound. Despite the new influx of employees in our industry, our safe-
ty record is outstanding. We are pleased that 2006 was the safest year ever. Accord-
ing to FRA data, the rail employee casualty rate in 2006 was the lowest in history, 
having  fallen  81  percent  since  1980.  Likewise,  the  grade  crossing  collision  rate  in 
2006  was  the  lowest  ever,  having  fallen  76  percent  since  1980.  And  from  1980  to 
2006, railroads reduced their overall train accident rate by 69 percent. The train ac-
cident rate in 2006 was just fractionally higher than the record low. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

RICHARD F. TIMMONS 

Question 1. Aside from comprehensive Positive Train Control systems, what tech-
nological improvements are the short line railroads eying in order to improve safety? 

ities (HazMat) are in real time. 

Tracking of all Class II/III HazMat movements. 

Answer. 
• Continue to install signal equipment in dark territory. 
• Install  low  cost  AEI  wayside  readers  to  know  where  equipment  and  commod-
• Press  to  continue  to  fund  Freight  Scope  with  upgrades  for  real  time  HazMat 
• GPS  locomotives  are  in  Short  Line  service  today  permitting  real  time  informa-
tion  on  equipment  location,  dwell  time,  train  speeds,  delays,  distance  traveled, 
crew time, and alerts or problems in a specific area of railroad territory. 
• Fuel-saving  equipment  and  monitoring  devices  are  under  review  as  are  emis-
• Hybrid  locomotives  burning  biodiesel  and  propane  fuels  are  in  use  today  pro-

sions compliance technologies. 

viding environmentally sound equipment for EPA emissions standards. 

Question  2.  Given  the  expected  impending  retirements  of  so  many  long-time  rail-
road  employees,  what  suggestions  do  you  have  for  improving  training  for  railroad 
employees and ensuring an adequately trained rail workforce? 

young railroad workers. 

Answer. 
• Department  of  Labor  Grants  for  Promotion  of  the  Rail  Industry  to  potential 
• Initiatives  to  attract  former  military  service  members  into  rail  service  as  a  ca-
• Initiatives  to  attract  Hispanic  citizens  into  railroad  educational  programs  and 

reer. (Many are retiring or getting out of the military). 

training leading to a career in the railroad industry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

110 

• Grants or long term loans to those individuals interested in railroading as a ca-
reer  for  enrollment  in  railroad  company  training  programs,  or  private  railroad 
academic or tradecraft programs at universities or colleges. 
• Grants  or  long  term  loans  for  currently  employed  railroaders  to  return  to  edu-

cational institutions to enhance railroad knowledge, skills and abilities. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:57 Apr 25, 2012 Jkt 073896 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\73896.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

